Most
children acquire the same eye color or a similar shaped nose from their parents,
but I’ve inherited much more: a passion for learning and an insatiable curiosity
which has served me well throughout my academic career. My father, an
electrical engineer, taught me to explore the world with inquisitive eyes,
constantly seeking to learn more, to understand more. I watched him for hours
as he worked on elevator schematics at home, wondering what all the various
symbols and lines meant. I was fascinated by technology and wanted to know how
and why things worked the way they did. “How
does this toaster work?” “What’s inside this VCR?” I was never satisfied with the
simplified answers that my parents gave to these questions. So I discovered many
answers for myself by exploring and experimenting. My
playground was a jumble of old circuit boards, spare electric wire, and an
assortment of broken appliances. I spent hours disassembling and tinkering with
the amazing treasures I found lying around our garage. My mother, a first grade
teacher, noticed my intellectual curiosity and encouraged my childhood
explorations. She gave me piles of mind-opening children’s books, which I
willingly read. Books like “What Makes Popcorn Pop, and Other Questions
about the World around Us” allowed me to discover the irresistible appeal of
imaginative questions and their fascinating answers. I
was given a remarkable amount of freedom at a young age. When I was 8, my
parents bought an old computer for $25 from a local yard sale with the
intention of letting me loose on it. I was thrilled. Motivated by curiosity, I
delved into it at once and learned how to use each and every feature of the
computer’s antiquated MS-DOS operating system. With my father’s help and an old
programming book by my side, I even created simple videogames for my younger
brother to play. My
parents taught me to be independent and self-motivated by providing me
opportunities to learn by trial and error. I recall an episode where my parents
bought a new microwave when I was just 10 years old. As they unpacked the
microwave, I caught sight of the owner’s manual and asked to see it. After reading
the 40-page text front-to-back, I learned one very important thing: how to use
a feature called “child lock,” or as I saw it, “parent lock.” By pressing a
special sequence of buttons on the microwave, I disabled it, thus protecting my
parents from the dangers of using the appliance without my supervision. Until
this day, the first thing I do after buying a new gadget is read the entire
manual, in search of nifty features. My
intellectual curiosity is the result of a unique combination of early
influences and childhood experiences which have fueled my passion for learning
inside and outside of the classroom -- learning from everything I do. I hope to
continue applying this curiosity to all aspects of my life, exploring the world
through the eyes of my childhood persona. By refusing to accept the obvious
explanation, refusing to settle for a superficial understanding, and refusing
to endure the status quo, great American innovators like my role model Benjamin
Franklin created new knowledge, new technologies, and new innovations. I strive
to do the same. It’s part of who I am, and what drives me to become successful
and happy. 









Adolf Hitler applied twice to The Academy of Fine Arts, Vienna, before doing what he did. Hitler’s application did not just turn into a rejection, both times. It changed world history. 1st September 2008: MP Israrullah Zehri comments on the killing of five women for choosing their own spouses. About forced marriages he said, “These are centuries old traditions and I will continue to defend them”. Abhorred by this statement, I lulled myself to sleep and had a dream: I dreamt of an acceptance from Stanford where I came in contact with an extremely gifted population of individuals, nourishing my public service experience. Going back to Pakistan I found the state of women no better than what I had left it. Struggling with the patriarchal tyrannical traditions that men conveniently and wrongly term as Islamic, all I could see in the eyes of women was destitute. And so, I dreamt of a change- a revolution. Educating and inspiring women, I aroused in them the feminism that crawled its way through fields as diverse as literature, religion and politics, penetrating every household, echoing in the cry of every woman rallying for her rights. Materializing this approach of upholding ideals in the female population, I dreamt of a land where every woman is free, equal and where I have fulfilled my responsibility. Then I had another dream. A rather disturbing one. A nightmare actually. I dreamt of a rejection letter from Stanford. Disappointed, I joined the Pakistani Army. Won Pakistani military honour “Nishan-e-Imtiaz”. I formed my own party “National Feminist Pakistani Workers' Party”, became the first woman president of Pakistan and formed what they called “The Fourth Reich.” The rest… Too violent for words. Dreams are bizarre. Aren’t they? But they say dreams can serve as Divine inspiration or a prophecy… Whatever it is, when you are making the decision of my admission, just remember that you just might be changing the course of history. The only question remains, which dream do you want to see come true? 









Most children acquire the same eye color or a similar shaped nose from their parents, but I've inherited much more: a passion for learning and an insatiable curiosity which has served me well throughout my academic career. My father, an electrical engineer, taught me to explore the world with inquisitive eyes, constantly seeking to learn more, to understand more. I watched him for hours as he worked on elevator schematics at home, wondering what all the various symbols and lines meant. I was fascinated by technology and wanted to know how and why things worked the way they did. "How does this toaster work?" "What’s inside this VCR?" I was never satisfied with the simplified answers that my parents sometimes gave to these questions. So I discovered many answers for myself by exploring and experimenting. My playground was a jumble of old circuit boards, spare electric wire, and an assortment of broken appliances. I spent hours disassembling and tinkering with the amazing treasures I found lying around our garage. My mother, a first grade teacher, noticed my intellectual curiosity and encouraged my childhood explorations. She gave me piles of mind-opening children's books, which I willingly read. Books like "What Makes Popcorn Pop, and Other Questions about the World around Us" allowed me to discover the irresistible appeal of imaginative questions and their fascinating answers. I was given a remarkable amount of freedom at a young age. When I was 6, my parents bought an old computer for $25 from a local yard sale with the intention of letting me loose on it. I was thrilled. Motivated by curiosity, I delved into it at once and learned how to use each and every feature of the computer's antiquated MS-DOS operating system. With my father's help and an old programming book by my side, I even created simple videogames for my younger brother to play. My parents taught me to be independent and self-motivated by providing me opportunities to learn by trial and error. I recall an episode where my parents bought a new microwave when I was just 8 years old. As they unpacked the microwave, I caught sight of the owner's manual and asked to see it. After reading the 40-page text front-to-back, I learned one very important thing: how to use a feature called "child lock," or as I saw it, "parent lock." By pressing a special sequence of buttons on the microwave, I disabled it, thus protecting my parents from the dangers of using the appliance without my supervision. Until this day, the first thing I do after buying a new gadget is read the entire manual, in search of nifty features. My intellectual curiosity is the result of a unique combination of early influences and childhood experiences which have fueled my passion for learning inside and outside of the classroom -- learning from everything I do. I hope to continue applying this curiosity to all aspects of my life, exploring the world through the eyes of my childhood persona. By refusing to accept the obvious explanation, refusing to settle for a superficial understanding, and refusing to endure the status quo, great American innovators like my role model Benjamin Franklin created new knowledge, new technologies, and new innovations. I strive to do the same. It's part of who I am, and what drives me to become successful and happy. 









 You’ll be dead in a month. I walked out of the doctor’s office. Disoriented. Disbelieving. Distraught. I was going to die. I was 14 years old, and I lived in hell. I have been blighted with eczema my whole life, but it was different when I was younger. At the age of 14, I did not have eczema. It had me. It had me in a crushing vice-grip, its clawed fingers choking away. It tore me from school for 18 months. My friends abandoned me. I could only sleep an hour at a time. I lay in bed at night, writhing in unimaginable pain. Ironically, I could not even hydrate my parched body. Water seared my raw skin, and I would pass out from pain every time I stepped into a bath tub. I tried everything. I traveled to three continents. I saw dermatologists, hepatologists, allergists, psychologists, homeopaths, acupuncturists, Chinese herbalists, spiritual healers, hypnotists. I listened to their diagnoses, I took their medicines, I followed their advice. And I returned to their offices with a loss of bone mass, tremors, and sun-scorched skin—but no improvement. It was in one of those offices that a doctor told me something. “You’ll be dead in a month,” she said. I refused to accept the reality of my fate; I wanted so desperately to say that she was wrong. But I was too tired. Too tired of nothing working, too tired of having nothing to look forward to each day. Too tired of climbing uphill but going nowhere. Yet whether I chose to accept it or not, destiny had thrown me into the ring with my greatest adversary—my own body. Quite literally, I had to fight for my life. And so the fight began. I fought my disease, I fought my own biology. And, in the beginning, I lost. Every single day. I would cry and scream, claw at my flesh, and hope that somehow, in some way, my body would respond to my fervent plea for respite. Days melted into months, months melted into years, and years melted into an eternity. Nothing changed. Yet I still fought. And it was almost impossible. I didn’t eat out for 18 months. I didn’t even leave the house for 18 months. Cloistered away, I forgot what my neighborhood looked like, what my school looked like. I forgot what other teenagers looked like. For 18 months, I saw no one but my mother, my father, and my brother. I sacrificed my entire life to beat my disease. Finally, I won. My stamina returned to normal. I once again had energy. The pain faded. I was back. I had been thrust into a furnace of disease, smothered by flames of agony and pain. My being had been crushed, its fragments scattered like dust into a void of solitude. My life had crumbled around my ears. Yet I had not been defeated. In the fires of my suffering, within the abyss of my loneliness, amidst the wreckage of my existence, I was forged, sintered, and rebuilt stronger than I had ever been before. I returned to the life I had left an eternity ago. It was the same. Same places, same people, same problems. Yet I was different. I did not buckle. I did not bend. I had mastered my own body; I could easily take on anything life threw at me. I could do anything. I could do anything. But would I? Today, I am a dietary consultant at a gastrointestinal clinic, and offer advice to many patients. I am the Chief Information Officer for a 501(c)3-registered non-profit organization, Project AP , dedicated to providing healthcare services to underserved and financially disadvantaged populations in the Indian state of Andhra Pradesh. I am a member of an eczema support group based out of Rady Children’s Hospital, and regularly speak at their meetings. I volunteer in the nursing ward at a local assisted living center. I was fortunate enough to triumph over my illness and come out the other side. There are those who are not so fortunate, and to them I offer myself — my words, my capabilities, and my experiences — in the hope that they too, can one day taste of wellness as I have tasted. Comments: Pros: Narrative style lends itself to easy reading; not overly syntactically complex Intensely subjective retelling Cons: Overly disjointed; might throw off the reader 









Dreams are shaped by ideals and families shape the beliefs we grasp so strongly. Someday I want to save and change lives through a medical career. Because my family has taught me that change can be positive and radical in altering lives, I hope to hold that ability someday. I seek the power to improve my life as well as the lives of those around me. And most of all because of those who have raised me I dedicate a path of personal improvement and the formation of a dedicated individual who promotes good character. My father was a doctor in Argentina, but when we immigrated to the United States his chance to shape a brighter future was inhibited by his limited mastery of the English language. My greatest yearning is to keep his dreams alive and to be someone like my father who raised my brother and me after divorcing my mother. I watched my father's future fall apart, I watched his zeal and ambition be held back, I watched and could do nothing. Now I dream of reviving those dreams he once dreamt. With the fire that fuels me I want to become as great and as inspiring as my father is to me. I aspire to building a brighter future for my family, as well as myself, because I was clay and theirs were the artist's hands. My father taught me the gratification of hard work, and because of that I respect him whole-heartedly even if he isn't as wealthy as other men. My brother taught me the lesson of change, because he has become a better person right before my eyes. And the rest of my passing influences have taught me to care for those in need and to see the world through the eyes of others. Also I strive to build a self that I can be proud of and others can look up to. The hope to be a decent individual flows within me, the hope to be a person that is caring, hardworking, inspiring, and influential. I want to be someone who tries to change the world and succeeds in changing someone's world. Because of my family I once attended church and what I learned was the Golden Rule. Today I shape my actions around it and believe in honesty wholeheartedly. People change, it's to be expected, but I hope that when I change it is only for the better. I have much to owe to my family and I will repay all they have given me through all I accomplish and who I become.The shattered dreams of my father will be pieced together in my inexperienced hands. The future that I dream of will solidify into reality as I step closer with the faith of those who love me, and I will not relent in this mission as long as they are here to inspire me and urge me on. The me that exists today isthe one they helped to shape, and the me that comes forth in the future is the me that I owe to my family: the light that guides my path in the stormy seas of the world. 









I
am an Internet entrepreneur. Since age 12, I have coded and designed websites
-- for my school, the local community, and as a personal hobby and pastime. In
fact, I started my own Internet business in 2004 and was hired as a webmaster
by Intel Corporation this past summer. I also volunteer my free time to run the
website of the largest community service club at my high school, Key Club. My
interest in Internet technology started out as a mere curiosity and casual
pursuit, but has steadily evolved into a central part of who I am today. When
I first signed onto the net at age 10, I felt a curiosity and passion unlike
anything I had felt before. The net was my new toy and I wanted to know what made it tick. Thus began my quest for answers. I
learned HTML, the basic building blocks of every website. Next, I taught myself
JavaScript, Cascading Style Sheets . . . and the list goes on. By
age 14, I considered myself a seasoned web design veteran. That year, I started
an Internet business called FreeTheFlash Entertainment. The website,
(http://www.freetheflash.com), is a multimedia entertainment portal that
collects user-submitted videos, flash animations, and games from all over the net.
Originally created to host my own creative work (short movies I made with my
friends, funny home videos, etc.), the website has grown exponentially and now
serves the entire online community. In the process of starting and maintaining
this website I’ve learned leadership, communication, and business skills that
literally define who I am today. I’ve learned that innovation and new ideas are
crucial in creating anything successful and worthwhile in today’s rapidly
evolving technological landscape. I’m
proud of my web development talent because it allows me to share my creativity
with the world, while providing others a vehicle to share their creativity as
well. In the last year alone, my website reached over 620,000 visitors who
viewed over 3 million webpages. I’ve even made a deal with an advertising
company. My dream is to push the envelope of Internet technology past its
existing boundaries and limitations. I’m not afraid to break tradition; to do
things better than they’ve been done before. I like the idea of creating
something that has value to those who use it. There is still a lot to be
learned about software and the Internet, and I plan to be on the forefront of
new developments. I have a strong background in leadership as well as exposure
to the high-tech industry and I desire to continue my higher education in the
fields of electrical engineering and computer science. 









Violent staccatos of the jackhammer coupled with rhythmic pounding of nails and muffled obscenities comprise the symphony of the construction site that has been my father’s accompaniment more than half of his life. While initially a position as a laborer seemed appealing to a junior in high school, strenuous physical labor loses its glamour to a man eclipsing fifty with a son about to enter college. As I battled through high school, I always found myself using my father as a blueprint to build me into the person I am today. If I could have only one friend for the rest of my life, I would choose my father; he has taught me lessons that I will never forget as long as I live. My father will be the first one to admit that he regrets postponing college and has always instilled in me the importance of education. I see the importance of education every night in the scratches and calluses on his hands and the ache in his knees. After every scholarship or award I receive, my father firmly shakes my hand and I tacitly promise to ease his pain. As I fill out my college applications, I officially become the first member of my family to apply to college immediately after high school. I broke the chain because while my friends spent summer at the beach, I worked to save money for my future. While my friends honed their wakeboarding skills, I discovered my passion for politics on the campaign trail. I never faltered because every night I gazed into a set of the proudest eyes before I went to bed. I remember that several weeks after my parents attended my middle school graduation, I had the enormous honor of congratulating my father after he realized his dream and got a college diploma, albeit 30 years overdue. My father’s college diploma reminds me that, no matter how bleak a situation may appear, I have the power to better it through diligence. As a freshman, my school resembled more accurately a 3 year-old construction site with tradition and identity yet to be established. However, rather than become discouraged, I took the initiative to pioneer Mock Trial, Speech and Debate and Junior State of America—things of which my father nor my school had never heard. In a school stained with prejudice, I co-founded Unity Through Diversity to advocate tolerance of all races, sexual orientations and faiths. In a community bitterly divided by political affiliation and marred by apathy, I spearheaded the Junior State of America to promote intelligent political discourse and activism. In a school with zero football victories, our freshman Mock Trial team gave the school championship trophies and pride. My father is not only a member of my family; he is a friend who I can talk to after a tough day. With the clock ticking down until I leave home for college and my father working longer days and weeks, I relish every moment with him. However, I also realize that I must stand on my own. It is not my father’s responsibility to make sure that I get what I want out of life; I must do this independently. As I say my final farewell to my father, I will forever remember that he has given me tools, but it is my job to use them to craft my future. 









Mirrors exist to show our outer appearance but nothing beyond that. Only our actions, words, and ideas could possibly represent the personal qualities that matter. The true worth of a person is revealed in those glimpses of light in the midst of adversity and darkness. Those traits that are highly admired are also learned and acquired in those dark moments. More than any other trait, the one I hold most precious isthe quality of honesty. Honesty is to tell the truth, to believe the truth, and to act the truth when the opportunity arises. But most importantly integrity matters when it is difficult to act nobly. I learned to be honest by admitting that I did not know what the truth was or by choosing to appear ignorant rather than condemning. When I was young I always was quick to judge and blame, but soon I learned that my assumptions without proof were the same as lies. By hurting others in those dark moments of doubt and injustice, I learned to tell the truth as I saw it and not as I wanted it to be. The best part of honesty is that ifyou see yourself as you truly are then you can shape who you will become. I believe that I am honest with myself because I assess my actions objectively and strive to change accordingly. Pride swells within me because I believe the most sought after quality in most individuals is honesty. Since I strive to bring change I believe that the change needs a starting point, and I volunteer myself as an advocate for integrity. The Golden Rule taught me that in order to expect honesty from others it is required for me to be true to myself and those around me. My real character shows through my beliefs and actions and the smiles of the people that I've met along the way. Honesty has allowed me to create a future based on my past, without the repeat button being held down. Only the few who learn from their past are not doomed to repeat it. And I hope to never relapse to my days of pointing fingers because there was need for a scapegoat to ease my paranoia. Honesty is the essence of personal responsibility. And as a human being I am responsible for the future I shape because even one single individual can shape the world, like a single seed unleashes the existence of a tree that can nurture fellow saplings or even inhibit their growth through excessive shade. I look within the mirror and see myself. Each one of us has the potential, a seed within, and only we can decide what kind of trees we will become. 









 Sometimes in life it is best to take a step back and look at the big picture. With all the demands and commitments that life can put on a person, it is sometimes easy to lose the essence of “the me”… whether it’s a mother trying to balance a job, a family, a house, shopping, meals and a husband; or a student with the pressure of school, sports, clubs, community service and friends to name a few. Where is the time for hobbies, interests and self-exploration? Where is the time to get to know “the me”? Looking back at freshman year, my life was like a cityscape, busy and vibrant. I was just another young soul eager to meet life’s challenges. I proudly reached certain goals that defined the student I wanted to be: made it into the science institute: check, varsity soccer: check, a nationally ranked soccer team: check, clubs: check, job: check, volunteer work: check. Am I forgetting anything? Sleep, food, friends, downtime… Who needs it? It turns out the answer is ME! In this busy canvas, life’s commitments became the artist and I became just a stroke of paint getting stretched too thin. I felt tired, over committed and ineffective. I knew I would need to regain control to balance the colors within my portrait. Sometimes when we put in so much time and effort but do not see the desired results, it is hard not to see this as a personal failure. That is how I felt by the end of sophomore year. I decided to scrap the old canvas and begin anew. Junior year, I became the artist once more, and I chose the palette of my interests. I left the science institute, changed travel soccer teams, and chose volunteer work that I really enjoyed. With a less crowded landscape, there was so much more focus and time for “the me” to emerge. Newfound interests and talents became a part of my life that I never had time for before. I was able to keep the original colors on my canvas: school, soccer and everything that made me, me before. However I was able to add new ones such as art, photography and become a more out outgoing individual. I was passionate about everything I was doing and much more effective in each aspect I took part in. Stepping back and looking at the big picture taught me to make decisions that were best for me, and not for those around me. I am able to create a picture that, to me, is a masterpiece even if others see it as painted colors. The emergence of “the me” is a life long work in progress as we are always adding color, dimension, and interests as we grow. Sometimes by choosing the colors of our picture more carefully, more depth can be added to the picture that clarifies “the me”. Whether you choose to create your canvas as a cityscape, a peaceful park, or a leaf blowing in the wind, be sure to be the artist that defines the colors of your “ME”. 









I wended my way through the first through fourth grades mostly without speaking. My presentations during that time went in two parts: a stilted “My name is ---,” then some sort of pantomime. So I was surprised when I got a part in the class play, notwithstanding that everybody got a part. I played the part of Ernest Hemingway without uttering a word. Perhaps my fifth grade teacher wished to show Hemingway’s taciturn spirit. Perhaps it was that playing the Hemingway part consisted of two appearances: walking through the stage like an old man, holding an aquamarine paper C, and giving a tearful farewell to some bare arms. Seven years later, I was to convince two hundred and twenty members of the Torrey Pines NHS that I should be their secretary. Mr. Chess, the club advisor, had warned the members not to clap, since there were five other applicants for the post of secretary alone. We did not have the time — only twenty-five minutes in the lunch hour — needed to get this over with. I compressed my planned speech, compressed my motions until I could drown out that throng’s roar. Mr. Chess ended up standing up and clapping, too, in the end. More important than results, though, is the process of how I learned to speak and enunciate: Stick a pen in your mouth. Hold it like a dog holds a bone, with the ends sticking out. Preferably a pen which you own. Dijyoo duwit? Chan’t enunsiate, khan yoo? Read a speech without taking it out. Breathe through your gaping mouth and enunciate, even though you cannot. If you can do this impossible thing, you can enunciate while making a normal, unencumbered speech. Your mouth opens wide, enough to fit your hand into. That’s the basic point of classical technique, the kind that preachers and other unamplified orators practice. It can deafen the back row. There is a second part, though, in this technique. The Pen Drill cannot truly be done alone. It needs to be done in front of people who laugh at the ridiculousness of the drill, because then the second realization comes— those people are not laughing at you. They laugh at the spectacle, the absurdity of the stretched mouth, and if you laugh at it too, you laugh together. Laugh together. If you can do this impossibility, you can look at any audience and stay composed. It took more than The Pen Drill™ to turn myself into a presenter. One time practicing is not enough. One technique, one drill is not enough. I inserted “banana” in words, declaimed upside-down holding up weights, and excised the word “um” from my vocabulary permanently. Then the practicalities: I had to write speeches and make speeches. I practiced making an entrance, making an exit, marking a beginning and curtly finishing. I saw the music in the words, realized the limited but infinite range of pitch and tone that a speaker can command. Most of all, however, I laughed. 









"Place yourself in the middle of the stream of power and wisdom which
animates all whom it floats, and you are without effort impelled to
truth, to right and a perfect contentment." ~Ralph Waldo Emerson,
Spiritual Laws
 
						 As a transcendentalist, Emerson found inspiration in places where "the
stream of power and wisdom flow" – where the truth is not sought but
omnipresent – like his woodland cabin at Walden Pond. As a surfer, I
find my own form of "truth" and "contentment" amidst the swells and fog...
 
						 It is my belief that paddling out into the lineup through a bank of heavy
mist and suddenly finding yourself unable to see the shore is among the
most surreal and inspiring experiences a person can have. Emerging from
the thickest part of the onshore fog and into the realm of brighter
sunlight outside is like crossing the border into a parallel world
utterly isolated from our daily, land-lubberish lives. The feeling must
be akin to that which drove the ancient Polynesians to their outrigger
canoes, Shackleton to the Antarctic, Emerson to his leaps of insight in
the face of rugged beauty. It is the euphoria and mystery that greet
those who dare to leap where no one has ever looked, who realize that
there is no emotion truer than that which comes from floating adrift in a
flimsy, tiny capsule through a chaotic universe unimaginably larger than
they. It is only when we are lost that we finally find ourselves.
 
						 When surfing in the fog I am directly prompted to think philosophically.
I inevitably ponder the counterintuitive truism in quantum mechanics
stating that all that is unseen could be - and in fact is - anything and
everything it can be. As fellow wave riders - strangers and friends -
wink out of my sphere of sight and consciousness, as the steadfast
constructs of society become transient and melt into the muffling
grayness, all standards for comparison and preconceptions of perspective
vanish and my thoughts branch out unfettered. As I ride (or duck beneath)
the waves that silently materialize before me, concepts that have long
eluded me suddenly coalesce. The parallel pathfinding algorithm
underlying my project for the Intel STS came to me not in a laboratory or
classroom but as I watched the branching rivulets of water find their way
down my surfboard as I emerged from underneath a wave (I saw how signals
splitting and rejoining as they propagate through a network can simulate
the shortest path problem in computer science). Often, I find it more
productive to open my mind to the vast ocean's meditative lull than to
study.
 
						 Sitting at peace in the stillness between the hollow waves is but one
tributary of the vast "stream of power and wisdom" that animates me, the
great river of physical and spiritual truth that emanates from nature.
Running my hand along the ice-glazed needles of the fallen pine, inhaling
the green-diffracted God-thought-breath of the morning forest, laughing
as I hold wide my windbreaker and lean euphorically into the rushing
torrents of the rain: this timeless rapture is my inspiration, this
intricate, organic splendor a sanctified model for my thoughts. This is
why I paddle out, never knowing exactly where I'll return to shore. 









Last night I was thinking about ink. When rain falls on a handwritten page, the ink spreads out a bit, loses its crispness. It’s rarely pleasant. But every now and then, hidden colors emerge. Suddenly you discover that simple black ink is green and shades of blue and a fragile pink edge. If some being creates us or writes the stories of our lives, this ink crafts it all, and in just the right rainfall all the colors resurface. That was my passing thought as I lay waiting for sleep. So I wrote it down. Too many good ideas occur and get forgotten and disappear without a chance to bloom; I choose to capture mine, and pursue them. The notebook next to my bed has no theme beyond that – the ideas set down in it range from business strategies to quickly sketched designs for artwork, tech products to personal goals, quotations to… just about anything. Schematics for a “digital highlighter” succeed a note regarding stocks, while other sheets host sculptural designs inspired by lines in the palm of my hand. Satires of various family members flood nine pages. One idea asserts the optimum way for a restaurant to serve ice cream sundaes. Now it may be I never build the fountain I’ve imagined – one with spoons oriented to catch streams of water and fan them out like umbrellas. (I’d certainly like to, but who can say for sure?) But here’s the thing: I don’t wait around when creative thoughts seize me. I leap at them impulsively, intuitively, and as I bore into them my senses hum vibrant-alive. The moment after an idea for an essay or book pierces me is the moment I open Microsoft Word; I scramble for pen and paper the instant I see a ripple or twist of light for artistic depiction. And once entangled in a complex problem I attack it, Hercules wrestling serpents, marbled Laocoön in defiance. I rage against the physics or calculus problem that stumps my classmates (they who go gentle into the night), and more often than not I emerge victorious. I assail the New York Times’ 7x7 KenKen every Sunday. In AP Language last year, I elected to write my final project (a persuasive speech) satirically. Though I had never written a satirical argument before, I undertook to entertain my audience while presenting a rock-solid argument in favor of tenure. I drafted, cut, and reworked text for twenty-eight hours to forge my fifteen-minute speech. I ultimately asserted that tenure countered the American tradition of grossly underpaying teachers; that the tenure-sheltered free will of teachers was preventing states from homogenizing and force-feeding patriotism to citizens (actions that Huxley and Orwell demonstrated are the keys to any ideal civilization); that only under the academic freedom of tenure may teachers spread “lies” such as evolution and the Holocaust. The class loved my speech. I loved working for it, feeling the thrill of a true challenge. If I am composed of ink, the black conglomerate shows that I’ve been an outgoing leader and academically successful. A hundred hundred inks look no different. Yet diffract me: the shades of blue are my ever-branching interests, the rippling surging rivers of my curiosity, kneaded by the rushing winds of the world. The emerald green glow is my pulsing energy, like bright coals and strong bellows, at once flames and inflammatory: my vigorous passion to create and my ceaseless drive to achieve. And my pink edge – that’s the secret key, the most hidden yet most integral, the uniting, driving force behind it all. It’s my enjoyment. I love finding possibilities that no one else sees, improving something as no one else did, solving problems that no one else knew existed. I won’t tell you when I’ve done so, nor explain why I was up until two in the morning when to you nothing seems changed – but I’ll know. I would have gotten an A on that paper anyway, sure; but I knew it wasn’t right, and moreover, I knew how to make it right. To me, pursuing the solution to a complex problem is the most fulfilling thing. That’s when I’m happiest. And that is my edge. Perhaps I seem at first a nondescript black – but wait until my hues shine through. 









I am fascinated by the brain. I always have been. I remember when a neuroscientist arrived at my first-grade classroom to give me and my classmates a lecture: an introduction to the human brain. What it was, where exactly in our bodies it was located, and what exactly it did. According to him, it was a wrinkly, gray blob that resided in our heads and helped us think. After he had finished speaking, I immediately raised my hand. I wanted to know more. “Where is the thalamus of a chicken typically located?” I, however, never got to hear his answer, because the teacher sent me outside for “interrupting” and “asking nonsensical questions.” My interest in the brain has since evolved from a simple curiosity about its structure and function to a profound amazement at its complexity. The most complicated organ in any living thing, the brain is not simply the biological command center of the human body; it has served, at one time or another, as the seat of every idea and construct in this world. Quite simply, everything that has ever been spoken, written, or created by humans was, is or will be a product of the brain. The gravity of this concept, to me, is staggering. Yet the most salient aspect of my current interest in the brain is a burning desire to study its workings; to discover something new about the execution or organization of even one of its untold number of processes. I want to be a neurolinguistic researcher. Cornell University is the school with the courses, professors, and resources to make my aspirations a reality. I intend on double-majoring in biological sciences with a concentration in neurobiology and behavior as well as in linguistics. I want to take classes like BIONB 4230: “Cognitive Neuroscience,” BIONB 4440: “Neural Computation,” and LING 6634: “Philosophy of Language.” I want to be inspired by professors in whose interests I see mine mirrored, like Andrew Bass, whose research emphasizes the neural basis of the production and encoding of vocal signals; like Sandra Vehrencamp, who studies the evolution of vocal signals using bird song as a model; like Draga Zec, who studies phonology and the phonology-syntax interface. I want to work in places like the Phonology Laboratory under Dr. Zec. I want to study neuroscience and linguistics because they truly and deeply fascinate me, but I also want to use the knowledge I gain at Cornell. I want to get involved with the Cornell Undergraduate Linguistics Colloquium. I also intend to contribute to the city of Ithaca. I want to provide mentoring in a college discovery program through the Ithaca Youth Bureau, helping close the achievement gap in the Ithaca City School District and making college accessible to all students. Also accepted to UChicago, Washington U in St. Louis, Cornell, Dartmouth, Wesleyan, Carnegie Mellon, University of Michigan, top UCs (variant) with this essay. 









Last Sunday I realized, again and more fully than ever, why I want to immerse myself in engineering. I awoke in the midmorning, still drifting yet well-rested. In those dreamlike moments before opening my eyes, fragments of thought, old and new, began to coalesce into ideas that I immediately felt an urge to implement. First, I mused, it would be interesting to write an RSA encryptor (the same sort of computer program that makes credit card data secure online) in the scientific programming language Mathematica, and then see how Mathematica's algorithms and our school's parallel computer would fare at cracking the keys. As I lay still, the practical details of its implementation unfolded in my quietly fascinated mind. My thoughts continued to branch. Presently, my awareness turned to the micro-architecture of the computer chip I had developed for the Intel Science Talent Search. I considered for a moment, and began to work out new, more efficient logic. The Verilog code for a more powerful design was at the tips of my fingers, when suddenly I realized, somewhat dejectedly, that I should instead get up and finish my art history homework and revise my college essays. It was then, I saw, that although I deeply enjoy these non-engineering activities -- art history is one of my favorite classes and college essays are both fun and revelatory -- they are distinctly secondary to what I love most: that is, conceiving and carrying out scientific projects. Lying in bed and suddenly finding myself infused with a desire to go and build something last Sunday reminded me of the effortless, exulted inspiration that had, since elementary school frequently blazed up in my rested mind. It was this intense passion for discovery and creation that had over the years driven me to build robots, conceive biology experiments, and craft algorithms for naught but the sheer excitement and wonder of the experience. Now, as the day grows late, I want to again coax flames from these potent embers I have discovered to yet glow hot within. Studying science and engineering will encourage and empower me to do this more deeply than ever before. At Duke specifically, I would be surrounded by many of the world's top thinkers and innovators, both expert and student, and this amazing camaraderie would inspire me to greater invention. Even beyond this, Duke is special among research institutions for its lengthy track record of developing paradigm-bending innovations. What I've been most impressed with is the school's willingness to push the limits of what humans believe possible: metamaterial "invisibility cloaks," ultrasound imaging, microfluidic systems, and smart materials are but some of the "straight-out-of-science-fiction" developments to have come from Pratt. Duke researchers not only proved these once-unimaginable concepts possible, but in the process of doing so have developed entirely new fields of technology that are now influencing everything from the way we build microchips to how we assay biosamples. This mentality -- that limiting preconceptions can and should be broken -- is something that I cannot resist wanting to be a part of. To me, there is no feeling more electrifying than that which comes from gazing through my closed eyelids into an untouched glen of new knowledge, and then from its fruits, creating something previously believed impossible. That is the root of my fascination with science, that is why I wish to study engineering, that is why I want to go to Duke. 









 “—ington, party of thirty, your tables are ready,” announced the hostess. After being seated at three large white round tables with folding white chairs, the real Clam Bake began. We attacked the buffet tables, buttered our lobsters, and still had room for dessert. While devouring New England’s hearty fare, “remember when…” stories started flying across the tables, laughs were spreading like the common cold, and obsolete dance moves were being dusted off by the older generations on the slippery floor. Fourteen little rug rats rushed up to me to be the first one to ask me to dance. Unabashedly, all of the sixteen grandchildren shimmied and sang until the music died with the last song, “American Pie.” I secretly love this crazy and embarrassing family. All the while, my cute little grandma was sitting quietly, watching her six sons and one daughter continue the tradition of love that she instilled in our family, while wearing what Van Morrison calls a “saint-like smile” on her face. Grandma is the matriarch of the Harrington Family. Coming from a large brood herself, the only girl of six children, she understands the responsibilities that having a family entails. Her ingredients—determination, devotion, and optimism created a formula for an indestructible bond. Confidently striding in her size six shoes from the Atlantic Rayon Corporation to the Industrial National Bank, she worked two jobs to support her family. Every morning, she awoke early in her small home in Cranston, Rhode Island, to prepare seven brown paper-bag lunches for her children. Many people within the community can still remember the image of my grandma rushing to catch one of her son’s games in her work attire. Although Grandma could not supply her children with material things, she was able to provide them with positive attitudes, fearlessness, and love. These values can only be felt through life’s experiences. The peewee games became Ivy League baseball, hockey, and football games, and Grandma cheered on the sidelines as all of her children attended college, the first generation of Harrington’s to do so. I admire the characteristics that Grandma has imprinted upon the Harrington name. The dedication that she selflessly showed this family also resides in me. I am always supportive and excited for my family’s and friends’ success. I have developed a work ethic that has enabled me to flourish throughout the years. My initial struggles have now become my strengths. I am always willing to work hard to achieve my goals; effort is never one of my regrets. And, I am able to accomplish my dreams because my positive attitude mirrors that of my grandma’s. Now, Grandma glanced at her family dancing, eating, and laughing together. She sat perched in the folding white chair, clapping her calloused hands to the rhythm of the music. Her face reflected her disbelief at her childrens’ and grandchildrens’ success. She was not impressed by the superficiality of the beautiful golf course, but that her values had successfully passed from one generation to the next. We all, like Grandma, took pleasure in being together. As the redolent summer night neared an end, my grandma’s voice surfaced in my head. I wanted to thank her, but the thanks would have to come in the form of deeds, not words. It was not the words that my grandma has said, but rather the words that she did not say that has impacted me most. I hope to deliver my own gratitude for her, as well as for others in the same manner. For every visible leaf and branch, there is a root, a foundation. I will not forget where I come from. I want to embrace the fearless determination and love that my grandma sought to define the Harrington Family. 









At the corner of each eye lie little crinkle lines, tip-offs to her mood: they might be laughing, or exhausted, or some days furious and fed up with people. If she’s worried about her own affairs she tries to hide it, but rarely can. She never hides her anger, her glee, or her fierce, well-deserved pride. She never hides her opinions. Kim Grant began in South Africa, on a farm. It was a four-hour drive to tennis, and she never missed a practice. She fought all the way to Wimbledon, to number 76 in the world. Then she moved to the United States and built a tennis academy from scratch. Before I began training with Kim, my motivation depended strictly on my interest. If I found my class interesting, I worked at it. When an idea intrigued me, I pursued it. But I avoided working for some theoretical “later.” Kim made me want to change that. I wanted her discipline and motivation. I yearned to know the agony of fighting for something month after month, the drive necessary to dive into something and claw all the way through without ever pausing for breath. I dove into tennis. If Saturday morning Kim wanted me at 7:45, I was there. If Wednesday night she wanted me past 8:00, I texted my parents to have dinner without me. Every day I played tennis I fought to develop Kim’s drive, and after four years I caught hold of it. Paradoxically, this led me to quit tennis. I had always played because I enjoyed exercise and the thrill of competition. I loved the people involved and the work to improve myself. Yet finding the discipline to truly achieve forced me to reconsider my goals: what did I plan to achieve? Kim became a professional athlete, but that wasn’t my aspiration. So for now, I’m working on my school’s food drive. I’m focusing on my classes; I’m tutoring; I’m drawing a lot. I’m searching for my next pursuit. When I find it, I’ll fight for it – and no matter how long it takes, I’ll get it. The course of my life may not be altered by what I learned of tennis, but the dedication, respect for work, and purpose in action I learned under Kim will resonate always. Occasionally she still calls to ask if I can help her out, moving furniture into the office or driving kids to other courts. People tell me I’m crazy for doing it, and crazier still not to let her pay me. But I think back to every morning Kim let me hit when there wasn’t a clinic, or freed a court so I could practice serving. I think of everything Kim taught me. I do not grant loyalty freely, but when I grant it, I give it completely. Kim has been my tennis coach, and I am thankful for it; but Kim has also been my mentor, my role model – and I am forever grateful for it. 









 While looking through my stacks of pictures, I realize
how important the memories in my all-school photos are to me. One particular picture, from ninth grade, is
especially significant not because I like to look at what my classmates or
teachers looked like, but because it reminds me of how much my life has changed
since the beginning of high school. For
years, school has been a part of almost everything I do and, except perhaps for
my parents, has shaped my future more than anything else. High school has not been the only cause of
change for me in the last three years, but it played a pivotal role. Not only did school teach me math, English,
and lots of other subjects, but it also changed my outlook on life in ways I
now realize aren’t immediately obvious, even to me. When this picture was taken, the only real activity I did
after school, other than homework and my own projects, was tutoring other
students once a week. As with almost
everything at my school at that time, the tutoring program was disorganized
(the school was new then), but that didn’t matter, and I found it particularly
enjoyable to know that I was helping other people. While I’ve never had problems with classes,
it frustrates me to see others fail, and I like to help them whenever
possible. To this day I still tutor
students after school, and not only is the tutoring program better than it once
was, but my tutoring skills have improved as well. While I’ve continued with student tutoring, since my
ninth grade picture was taken I’ve also expanded my horizons by starting an
Electronics Club. For several years now
I’ve wanted to start such a club because of my own interest in building
gadgets, and because I thought other students might be interested too. My club has only had a few meetings, and only
has a few members, but people are coming back for more, even though I don’t
think I’ve been making the meetings as interesting as I could have. My hope is that I’ll not only be able to
teach club members the basic theories behind electronic design, but also
introduce them to my own interests, so that they’ll consider electronics not
only as a hobby, but also as a possible career. Of course, school is only part of life. While I may not immediately associate a school
picture with what I’ve done outside of school, especially with my own
interests, the principle of looking back to see what has changed still
applies. For years, I’ve focused some of
my own time on designing and building electronic devices. In ninth grade, I was still finishing what
was, at the time, the most complex project I’d done, an odd radio-controlled
device designed to fill the neighborhood water tank, which is useful at my
house because I live beyond the reaches of the city water system. I personally never thought that the device
worked too well, though the neighbors were impressed. Now, while I’m still working on plans for a
better version, and while I realize that I have more experience now, I still look
back and wonder, “Why did I do it that way?” At the time the picture was taken, although I did
projects for the neighborhood, I was not very involved with the greater
community. Since then, I’ve realized
that helping the community can be much more than simply fulfilling a school
requirement. So, while history has never
been my favorite subject, I decided to assist the docents at the local history
museum both because I knew the museum needed help and because I really did want
to know more about the history of where I live—an area on the central coast of
California once dominated by loggers and short-lived boom towns. While working at a museum is not always
entertaining, it is both fascinating to see the old photographs and rewarding
to know that the history of the area will not be lost. Looking back through the binders of old
photos is especially interesting because the pictures show how much has changed
since the days of horses and buggies, just as my school picture shows how much
has changed for me since the beginning of high school. A picture is simply a snapshot of one instant, but a
stack of pictures can, like a movie, describe the progression of my life. And, as I said before, I mainly look at these
pictures not because I want to see what my friends or my teachers looked like
then, but for the memories of what has happened and changed in my life
since. When I consider the array of
pictures as a whole, it becomes even clearer how much I’ve learned and changed,
and on closer inspection, how much of this was because, directly or indirectly,
of my generally excellent school experience. 









In grade 9, I started messing around with Google Sketchup. It began casually and soon blossomed into an obsession – I would refuse repeated calls for dinner, intent on figuring out the placement of a room or object. I remember trying to virtually remodel our apartment when my brother looked over my shoulder and remarked, “It looks like a really large, really complicated toilet.” Comforting. Far from deterring me, however, the comment actually pushed me further in my pursuit. There wasn’t a tougher, longer, more fulfilling summer than the one I spent working at Studio Cria Pvt. Ltd. It didn’t matter that I was the only one who hadn’t studied architecture, it didn’t matter that I didn’t know a single person in such a prestigious firm. It didn’t even matter that my designs weren’t always incorporated into the floor plans. I was working on something I loved so much. Coffee runs? Sure, if it meant I could analyze the client’s plans with the other architects. Copy girl? Definitely, as long as I could draw up my own plans too. The Chief Architect was astonished when I presented her with five different floor plans for a client who had come in two days earlier. I hadn’t had the time to work on them in the office, so I’d gone home, sat up until one o’clock trying to finish the work. This wasn’t expected of me – I was just an intern. So why was I throwing myself into this with so much enthusiasm? My interest thrilled her, and although those plans weren’t incorporated into the official ones, others eventually were. I still beam with pride when I walk past the private residence (currently under construction) based partly on my designs. It’s an indescribable feeling to know that a solid, tangible proof of my passion exists. The environment is something I’m very passionate about – so much so that in high school, my friends and I pioneered an initiative to keep the city’s streets clean. Called “My School Road”, we got students of different schools to clean the streets surrounding their school (within a 1km radius) twice a week. We started it off ourselves – 6 am on Wednesdays and Saturdays saw twenty adolescents diligently sweeping the street and collecting non-biodegradable trash separately for recycling. The effort went on to gain significant media coverage within a month or two; encouraging more schools to participate in the campaign. So when the time came to choose where I would study, I knew without doubt that my institute would have to encourage sustainable development just as enthusiastically – and the TC Chan Center is proof enough that I will cherish my time at Penn. The TC Chan Center for Building Simulation and Energy Studies effectively combines my two greatest interests– environment conservation and architecture. At Penn, I’m confident that my attempt to create a more sustainable living environment for the future will be wholeheartedly supported by the university. Despite trying, I’m lost for words to describe the profound happiness I gain from architectural design. I’d hate to lose this joy during my studies, which is another reason why Penn is perfectly suited for me. Its enticingly rigorous program will see me produce some of my best work while ensuring that my passion for the field continues to grow boundlessly. To me, architecture is more than a profession – it’s a way of life where everything is creative and anything is inspiration. It’s my two cents towards a world where buildings represent positive change, where ‘eco-friendly’ is no longer a necessary prefix to the word ‘design’, where things of beauty truly remain joys forever. 









"Thank God for Starbucks," I mutter under my breath when I spot the all too familiar siren inspired logo as we walk into the hotel lobby. With my mocha in hand, I set about exploring the Marriott Copley Square, home of United Synagogue Youth's International Convention 2012. Slowly but surely, the caffeine kicks in, lessening some of the exhaustion I feel after the redeye from Sacramento. Kids from across North America begin trickling in, and my friends and I are posted in the mezzanine directly above the lobby, monitoring all new arrivals, looking specifically for the friends we made at last year's convention. Just as I finish the coffee, I feel my best friend Lauren's elbow in my ribs. "Look!" she yells, causing our hideout to be discovered. "They're here!" After weaving our way through throbbing crowds, we join in the time-honored IC tradition of screaming and hugging each other. It is both surreal and sublime to be surrounded by so much love. Everywhere I look, there are smiling kids, eager to learn your life story.The next day the USYers are released upon the malls conjoining our hotel. After I introduce my East Coast friends to the wonders of Pinkberry, we meet up with other people they know from New Jersey. Not wanting the situation to be awkward, I introduce myself to a nice-looking boy named Jason. "You're Lexi? I've heard great things about you," he says. "You're kind of famous around here, you know." In that moment, with that compliment bouncing around in my head, I know that USY IC is the best way I could have chosen to spend my winter break. The convention marches on, with workshops, inedible food, and incredible opportunities. We are taught how to advocate for ourselves and for others, and how to lead effectively. On the last full day of convention, the entire delegation sets out to march to Copley Square. There we stage a public protest against gun violence, and a survivor of the Virginia Tech shooting speaks. We make ourselves heard, and the public notices, with many people joining in or applauding as they walk by. It is an incredibly inspiring feeling. Even if it is only just for a day, we are heard, acknowledged, and respected After a crazy dance and very little sleep, it is time to leave. And as I am walking away, after about a hundred hugs and a few tears, I realize I am leaving as a changed person. Once home, I notice a shift in my perspectives and my actions. I find myself smiling at strangers instead of avoiding eye contact. Rather than dismissing my teacher's new creative lesson plans, I engage in them, and benefit greatly from it. I put my heart fully into everything I decide to do, and when I find my heart isn't in it, I either make a decision to go all in or stop entirely. Whenever I feel down or aggravated, all I have to do is look at pictures from International Convention and reconnect to that week in Boston. You get what you give, and I got much more than I ever could have asked for from this experience. 









I never intended to hire anybody. In fact, I never sought to obtain employment myself. I was too busy having fun with computers to be bothered with any of that. But as soon as you know how to hit "ctrl-alt-delete," it seems everyone wants tech support, and one thing leads to another. All I'd done was befriend the shy, thick-spectacled, computer wizard in my seventh grade multimedia class. He spent most of his time furiously typing cryptic symbols (like "preg_grep('/^[\.a-z0-9]+@/i',$r)") into his dinosaur workstation, bewitching it to run with blazing speed, perform complex calculations, and produce slick graphics. Boggled but intrigued, I asked him to teach me how to do this. He pointed me to a few tutorials on the programming language PHP and showed me how to host files on a server, and I was on my way. It turned out to be a lot like magic: you typed commands in an arcane language and shazam! The computer would produce seemingly supernatural effects, like finding all the answers to your wordsearch homework. Amazing. Sure, it took more effort to write the programs than to just do the work by hand, but then again, exploring the frontiers of this miraculous world didn't seem anything like work to me. In the process of implementing new ideas, I would happily plunge into whatever labyrinths of logic I stumbled upon. By the time I'd worked my way out, I would know significantly more not only about the specifics of the programming principles I'd encountered but about the general process of independently guiding myself through mazes. Elated by every success and educated by every difficulty, I was launched into a loop of positive feedback and my knowledge grew exponentially. Every time I grasped an interesting new concept, I would build something from it – a design, a tool, a tutorial that I could use and share. Soon, people began to ask me questions and I could answer them, or at least direct them to a solution. I felt honored that they valued my opinion. Apparently through this process word got around that I could design fairly complicated websites. Towards the end of seventh grade, a friend's father offered me a job developing the site for his biotech startup, Biomatrica; I was surprised, but I knew the material so I accepted. The site got investors interested, and since then, they've done pretty well for themselves (this year they made finals for the ABBY Award in Bio-Technology and their products are being used by major universities). Without intending to, I had entered the world of business. One client led to another; my freelance work grew. With it, slowly came experience, slowly understanding; slowly heavy reality set in. The jobs were still fun, but in an intense and more serious way. As I worked, I learned that in business, there are no excuses for lacking backups; in business, deadlines are truly dead; in business, anything you don't do properly you will have to do over. I learned all this about business because I had to learn it, because I knew that if I did not, I would soon be out of business. Thus my thinking was optimized – streamlined – by the unyielding razor of reality. Meanwhile, I continued learning more about programming, mostly by playing with it, and as a result, I was able to take the AP Computer Science AB test as a freshman in high school. This was great, but sadly, it meant that there were no more CS classes left for me, and hence no venue in which to fool around with computers. Fortunately, there were others who wanted more of the subject than our school had to offer. Often these young computer scientists were masters in certain specialized areas but lacked the complete technical and business skill-set necessary to enter the professional world. This gave me an idea. They wanted to learn what I had learned and I implicitly possessed a curriculum to teach it: I simply had to retrace the steps of my own self-education, minus the stumbling blocks. Moreover, I wanted to absorb their rich and diverse knowledge. So, sophomore year, a friend and I co-founded the Torrey Pines Programming Club, a venue in which we could both teach this material and learn from others, in an atmosphere that appeared suspiciously like a bunch of nerds (and non-nerds) having a blast fiddling with technology. By mid-second semester, we had achieved success in numerous computer science competitions, and our members were fluent in JavaScript, PHP, AJAX, XHTML, and CSS – some of the most important Web languages. All that edu-tainment turned out to be a godsend when, later that year, my schedule began to overload because I had too many clients, an alphabet soup of competitions (ACSL, USNCO, AIME, UCSD Math, SAIC, Botball, etc…), my black belt test in Karate, and 4 AP classes. The programming club offered a natural solution. I sent out an e-mail to several select members, offering to hire them. They responded with a resounding: "I'm in!" Things progressed quickly. I matched programmers to projects, touched up their training, and developed a scalable, modular, server-side framework that would allow everybody's code to cleanly interface. Over the following months, we delivered several high-end websites and applications for excellent prices. As a result of one project, I even became Chief Technical Officer of a client's company, It's a Beauty! Inc. At the same time, my workload again became reasonable, and my friends gained employment that they found more fulfilling and lucrative than their former grocery-bagging jobs. We do business together to this day, now as InSource Digital Development. But this material success is not what matters most. It's that the people I work with are now creating astounding projects of their own, on their own. It's that the clients we work for are better off for having hired us. It's that I get to share the joy of my work – which still doesn't feel like work – with the freshman coders who walk into room 114 each week. As I retrace the exhilarating steps of my own learning in order to bring them forward, I realize how much I miss the awe and enchantment of being a beginner, and how ready I am to become a freshman again myself. Comments: Though it could have been written more masterfully, especially towards the middle, this essay successfully conveyed several important facets of my personality, character, skill set, and life story. Perhaps more importantly, it harmonized with the rest of my application to create a fairly complete picture of me as an applicant. Specifically, it effectively used humor to explain achievements without sacrificing humility, but when appropriate, it naturally transitioned to more stylistic diction when it was appropriate and effective to do so. On the whole, while not particularly concise, it was an efficient use of words because it revealed who I was both through its content and structure/style. 









It’s never easy to appreciate something unconventional. Just ask the people who attended the premiere of Igor Stravinsky’s The Rite of Spring , a performance infamous for sparking a riot, reducing the proud composer to tears. Even as a passionate musician, I had trouble finding value in any of Stravinsky’s avant-garde work; that is, until I had to play it. The Firebird is Stravinsky’s other famous ballet, and the concert suite arranged from it is standard repertoire for any professional orchestra. I would often hear from other musicians how breathtaking and awe-inspiring the piece was, but whenever I took the time to listen to a recording myself, I could never get past the first movement. The theme’s variations were the worst: how could anyone be moved by random strings of notes being played in seemingly random places? This year, the conductor of my local youth symphony selected Firebird as the main piece in our repertoire. Flipping through the pages of my part, I saw exactly what I expected: it was difficult, but completely lacking in musical sense, at least to me. “Let’s start with Berceuse and Finale,” announced the conductor. Expecting the outlandish atonality I had come to associate with Stravinsky’s music, I was stunned when the room melted into a calm string accompaniment and eerie bassoon and oboe solos. Suddenly, the string section burst into a chilling melody that would contrast with the dark, resonant, beautiful French horn solo it led into. The orchestra then joined together in an ascending crescendo that exploded into a majestic trumpet fanfare and finale, booming bass drum and all. So this was the glorious Firebird I had been told about, this thrilling contrast of heartwarming lullaby and infernal frenzy and every other sensation of passion in between. I couldn’t help but smile: I had uncovered a gem of a piece from the deep trenches of my first impression. Learning to appreciate Firebird led me to The Rite of Spring (no riots were started), and then to Stravinsky’s trio of virtuosic solo pieces standard for the clarinet. Becoming more familiar with his unconventional work has not only expanded my understanding of music, but has also led me to experiment with some of my own artistic interpretation. It’s not advisable to perform an atonal cadenza, of course, assuming my goal is to please the audience, but I do try to add some individual flavor to the sometimes stagnant pieces in classical music. Even outside of music, Stravinsky has transformed me into a more open-minded and innovative person. I have come to enjoy other forms of expression: dance, fine art, literature, even dabbling in them a bit myself. I have learned to consider an unconventional approach to problems in math and science, often developing my own methods to achieve a desired result in a shorter amount of time. Most of all, Stravinsky has taught me to keep an ear out for the cacophonous and dissonant ideas I may encounter; who knows, one might just be another Firebird. 









It is incredible how social environment plays such a great role in a person’s holistic development. It is like the butterfly effect on an individual, yet grand scale. Each decision is like a ripple that spreads out uniformly, increases many fold, and eventually changes the person’s future. While one can never be sure, I am confident that the people around me – my family, my teachers, and my friends – have all influenced my life in a positive manner. Of all the factors mentioned before, my parents have undoubtedly been the most prominent source of love and encouragement. My father owned an engineering equipment manufacturing unit. As a kid who accompanied his father to work once a week after school, I was always mesmerized to see big machines come together and seemingly move on their own. Eventually, I started tinkering with whatever I could find lying around. That’s when he decided it would be unwise to leave me unsupervised, and my weekly trips came to an end. But my mother, recognizing my interest and willing to let it develop into something constructive, got me the best possible gift. It was a set of ‘Mechanix – an engineering system for creative kids’. Mechanix had everything I needed and a manual that helped me to build fully mechanical models. After some explanation and trial and error sessions with my father, I could build them myself, and eventually, I started building models that weren’t there in the manual – my own models. This was my first and early step into the world of engineering. As I grew older, I got especially interested in STEM. Luckily, I found some classmates who were just as passionate about these subjects; classmates who are now some of my closest friends. Becoming a part of their group was my ‘red pill, blue pill’ moment, and I made the right choice. It showed me where I stood against the best students in the school, and it was just a matter of time before I caught up and became one of them. In grade eleven, I was elected to the students’ council. This gave me access to the school’s resources, and something that has been yet another factor in deciding the progression of my academic career; the support of other council members. Also, since we had shared interests and were in the good books of our teachers, we seldom hesitated in talking to them (and sometimes, directly to our principal) about something we wanted to do. In hindsight, this was a huge privilege, and was only possible in a relatively small school like mine. By mid-2012, I became rather good at programming, and felt I wasn’t being challenged enough by the school curriculum. My friends had similar opinions, so we decided to form an IT club in school, which would train members for inter-school programming events. The ‘Endofline Computer Club’ was officially recognized by the school in July 2012. Subsequently, we started participating in many inter-school programming events. But for me, it wasn’t always about the trophy or cash prize – it was about interacting with fellow programmers and learning from them. Getting to meet interesting people was a great incentive for participation, and the prospect of winning was always pushing me to give my best. There are small schools - small communities, which foster better understanding and interaction between their members, give each member the chance to express their ideas and make it easier to be at the top, or even good enough to be a representative – and there are huge schools – large, rigid communities that have established institutions which admit members based on merit. These institutions are full of highly able individuals that have gone through rigorous selection procedures, and perform consistently well in their respective field. I wonder if I’d have ever found a new club at a huge school. Thankfully, my school lies right at the cusp. It is small enough for a student to receive ample attention, and has a wide-spread network of alumni as well. Throughout high-school, I’ve had opportunities to network with some of the brightest students of the country and from abroad, along with the support of family and friends, who’ve always encouraged me to follow my dreams and achieve excellence. And that’s precisely what I want to do; become an excellent aerospace engineer. 









Mr. Trupe, World History teacher and former Torrey Pines volleyball coach, was taken aback when he heard I was an athlete. "Kevin—you play volleyball? I could knock you down with my breath!" It's true—I'm 5'10" and a flimsy 130 pounds. I don't have the frame or talent of a Michael Jordan, Jerry Rice, or Barry Bonds (wait, scratch that last one), but I make up for it in spirit. I play with heart. Every kill, block, ace, "tool," "dome," "pancake," or "butter set" is met with a primal scream of triumph that belies my unconvincing stature. Even when I'm scheduled to come out of the rotation, the coach often says, "You play with so much fire...I can't bench you." A bit less energy and noise might be better, though: as a co-captain, it's rather helpful not to lose your voice for an entire tournament after one game. 









Passionate about both science and music, I find Northwestern’s exceptional undergraduate engineering and music programs extremely appealing. The unique opportunity for me to combine McCormick and Bienen into one dual-degree program is even more attractive, allowing me to receive certification from two schools both highly regarded in their respective fields. Chemical engineering, my primary engineering interest, is among McCormick’s most renowned departments. The faculty members seem to share my underlying values in science: application and innovation. Their extensive research in new and developing areas such as renewable energy and medicine is a clear indication of this overlap. These pioneers, such as Dr. Kung in environmental chemistry, can give me a glimpse of revolutionary science in the making and offer me experience working in the stellar research facilities Northwestern is famous for. I plan to immerse myself in any research opportunities I can find so as to make the most of this exceptional resource Northwestern offers. The mere presence of a school of music open to undergraduates is uncommon among colleges of Northwestern’s academic standing; having one that matches some of the world’s best conservatories is even more rare. Bienen provides numerous resources for music majors, such as solo, chamber, and large ensemble performance opportunities and regular concerts in one of the nation’s finest concert halls. The guest speakers who come to Bienen are even more remarkable; all-time jazz great Eddie Daniels recently held a master class there for clarinet, my main instrument. Being able to meet and even receive instruction from musicians of that stature would surely inspire me to work toward something special. Northwestern also features one of the nation’s largest music libraries, surely a place where I can continue to fuel my creative passion. To make the most of the exclusive opportunities Bienen can provide me, I plan on partaking in as many events as possible. Other than the undergraduate schools, Northwestern’s prominent sports culture is also inviting. Although I am certainly not qualified for Division I volleyball, I am convinced I can find a place among the popular club and intramural sports communities. I am also an avid football fan, and would welcome a chance to become a part of Northwestern’s tradition of strong school spirit. (Applied dual degree: BS chemical engineering and BM clarinet performance) 









I'm hoping to do an MS in Computer Science at Stanford so that I can become more technical and obtain the
skills I need to build the software that I want to exist, rather than just imagine it. I've had several jobs in
technology-related fields, as an investment banker and as an early non-technical employee at a startup, and
have realized that the ability to code is foundational to the career in product management or data science that I
want, even if I don't end up spending my entire career in a text editor. Though I haven't formally studied CS
except for one pass/fail introductory course in college, I have a strong technical background, excel in problem
solving and have spent the past several months teaching myself to code through various online courses.
Without much background in CS, it's difficult for me to meaningfully identify the subfield I'd like to specialize
in, but hope that I can do so as I learn more and believe that my history of novel research into the disparate
areas of economics and power systems engineering demonstrates that I would thrive in Stanford's CS
department if given the chance.
 
					 I graduated from Harvard in 2009, where I studied economics and statistics, graduating summa cum laude. My
thesis analyzed a data set of more than 350,000 mortgage offers made to borrowers during the last days of the
credit bubble that I obtained from the Federal Reserve of Boston. Through regression analysis and a few basic
data visualizations, I first showed that lenders were more sensitive to risk factors related to house prices and
less sensitive to risk factors related to ability to repay when lending to subprime borrowers, implying that they
knew these loans were only likely to be repaid if house prices continued to rise. I also similarly showed that lenders that were owned by investment banks had looser underwriting standards than independent ones,
implying that the ability to easily securitize the risk of owning a mortgage encouraged a lowering of credit
standards. Many commentators and academics had suspected this, but I was the first to show it quantitatively. 
					 After college, I accepted a fellowship to study engineering for sustainable development at Cambridge in hopes
of learning more about the technical aspects of renewable energy, which I see as one of the greatest challenges,
opportunities and responsibilities facing my generation. The program was pass/fail so I spent most of the first,
coursework-focused part of the program traveling and doing independent study as I was disappointed in how
fuzzy many of my classes were. In the latter, research-focused part of the program, this bore fruit as I was able
to write a highly technical dissertation that used a mixed-integer, quadratic program to model theoretical power
systems behavior with greatly increased renewables capacity. Faced with a difficult optimization problem and
needing to solve it for nearly 100 scenarios, I learned how to write a crude Excel VBA script that served as an
introduction to what I would later learn was object-oriented programming. My paper shows that wind and solar
farms, individually or in combination, can only practically reduce grid CO2 emissions by ~50% at a 60% – 180%
increase in cost (depending on their relative mix) despite the fact that wind and solar production have some
small offsetting variability that helps to smooth their overall production when used in combination. However,
this expansion coupled with merely a doubling of current nuclear capacity extends this limit to greater than
70% due to the stability of nuclear generation. I was delighted to receive an A+ on my dissertation as well as the
class prize for Best Poster. After presenting it, my advisor wanted to publish it going so far as to say that "it
needed to be published," but I sadly had to finish the course several months early to start my job so I did not
have time to convert it into a publication-ready form.
 
					 After graduate school, I first worked for Goldman Sachs as an investment banker, where I made presentations
and financial models for technology companies. I joined the firm thinking we'd be advising high-growth
technology and cleantech companies on their strategic decisions, but I was disappointed to find this wasn't true.
The only companies who wanted our services were mature and cash-laden and our services were often not
much more than opinions that Boards of Directors needed to shield themselves from legal risk. Further, I
wasn't working with the deeply analytical and save-the-world ambitious kind of people that I want to be, so I
left disappointed and unsure of what to do next after only 6 months. Soon after, I joined Quora, a user-
generated content site for knowledge sharing, primarily thanks to my prolific activity on the site enabled by my newfound copious free time. I thoroughly enjoyed my time with the company, especially the type of people I
was privileged to work with and the cutting-edge nature of our product and associated problems; however, I
also found my inability to code limited how much I could contribute. When my two-way trial basis internship
ended, I decided not to join full-time. 
					 Over the past year, I've spent a lot of unstructured time learning and exploring. For the past few months, I've
been spending 6-8 hours/day devouring every free or semi-free programming tutorial on the Internet I can
find, such as CodeHS, a site started by two former CS106a TAs whose curriculum is highly similar to that of the
same course. I wrote a brief Quora answer about my experience and the sites I've found most useful that has
been viewed nearly 20,000 times and was republished by Forbes's blog. For the final assignment on CodeHS,
which is nearly identical to CS106a's problem set 3, I implemented a version of the game Breakout in
Javascript, extending it to have power-ups and additional levels, which I can only hope would earn a '++' from
Prof. Sehami and his staff. Mainly for this application, I set up a web server on Amazon Web Services and
created a basic page showing off some of my writing and past projects, such as my EpicBreakout. I've also been
traveling around the country with friends, reading and writing for several hours/day and learning how to yo-yo. For money, I've been tutoring Stanford students in econometrics, local high schoolers in algebra, and users
of CodeHS in programming as well as playing poker.
 
					 My online coursework and side projects like making a Twitter bot have taught me fundamental programming
concepts and helped keep me productive, but are still not a replacement for the experience I'd get at Stanford. If
accepted, my day-to-day life might not noticeably change as I already spend 40-50 hours/week in Huang and
Y2E2, but the work I'd be doing would be more holistic, structured and interactive, though it may take me
longer to complete the program than a student with a CS background. Online coursework is skewed to web-
centered applications, the problems are by necessity typically much shorter than university problem sets and
they are frequently auto-graded so they can’t provide individualized feedback. Further, simply being in an MS
program at a selective, highly regarded school like Stanford, the undeniable heart of Silicon Valley, would
instantly give me a social group as well as collaboration opportunities that I currently struggle to find. In the
next 9 months before the program would begin, I plan to continue taking on more online coursework,
specifically, the Stanford iPhone course (CS 193P), and work on increasingly larger-scale side projects as I've
found this to be the most engaging way for me to learn now that I have some basic ability. I believe that
contemporary computer scientists are truly, to quote an inspirational YouTube video by Prof. Sehami,
"geometers in the time of Euclid" and I think this program will give me the tools I need to make my mark on the
world, maybe even a dent in the universe. 









Over the phone, my dad described what was happening as he lifted the
cover off of the viewing portal. Suddenly, he began to laugh
uncontrollably: the robotic mousetrap I had built out of LEGO Mindstorms
had actually caught a rat! On the other end of the line, my 8-year-old
self also collapsed in laughter. That was the moment when my love for
robotics and engineering became irrevocable.
 
					 I have been inventing and building things as long as I can remember;
curious investigation has always led to practical application. Often, as
I lie in bed in the mornings, fragments of thought coalesce into ideas -
like the above machine to capture marauding rodents - and I feel an
irrepressible urge to immediately jump up and implement them. Where the
young Feynman would repair radios - the technology of his day -
throughout elementary school, I would "piddle around" with robot
mechanisms and computers, building and programming fun or useful devices
out of my LEGOs, such as a crude but working photocopier or a machine to
make perfect rainbow stripes on Easter eggs. Retrospectively, I see that
this process cemented my lifelong fascination with creating nifty
devices.
 
					 In middle school, my interests expanded from this foundation: I caught
what Feynman referred to as the "computer disease" - an irresistible urge
to play with programming. Leaping out of bed and coding up algorithms -
writing an RSA encryptor or an anagram solver to beat a game - felt just
like constructing robots, except in software you never run out of pieces.
The knowledge I gained through this process empowered me to start my Web
business.
 
					 So when high school rolled around, I saw no reason to stop learning math
and science by having fun. I learned group theory by solving Rubik's
cubes and I learned Java by programming the AI for battling digital
robots. Then I joined the robotics team and applied the same class
structures I had designed for virtual robots to the real machines. Here,
I was also able to make use of my old experiences with physical
mechanisms (like differential-ratchet drive shaft bifurcators) to help
our hardware team achieve high functionality with few pieces.
 
					 The way I express my love of science, mathematics, and engineering is by
musing on interesting problems and creating cool machines - virtual and
physical. My '09 Science Fair entry - a device that can use the
environment's energy to perform desalination - came from trying to figure
out a way to quickly dry my surfing wetsuit. My Calculus BC project - a
program that uses Fourier transforms to decompose musical chords picked
up by microphone - came from an effort to generate piano sheet music from
audio recordings. Studying the background information necessary to make
these ideas into reality becomes a natural and exciting step as I journey
to create my latest contraption or work with my friends on an enticing
project.
 
					 I want to go to Caltech because everybody there has been able to answer
the same question I am answering now - that is, they have been able to
express their fascination with science or engineering in some way or
another. I want to see what talents, passions, and ideas they bring to
the table (or workstation), and join with the school's interconnected community of active thinkers as we expand our knowledge together. I want
to have fun creating our most in-depth and fascinating projects yet. 
		
	
	
		
			
				
					
					 Footnote: to see the elementary school robots I describe above, such as
the photocopier and rat trap, go to: 









 "You want to dye your head WHAT?" she screeched. I glanced around the tiled kitchen floor and shuffled nervously, avoiding my mother's incredulous stare, but I was resolute. I took a deep breath to calm my fluttering nerves and tried one more time. "Teal." This decision wasn't arbitrary. I had done months of intense research, carrying several reference pictures with me to my hairdresser after practically interrogating her and countless others about the procedure, aftercare, and upkeep. The process itself was an ordeal; bleaching my jet-black hair to a platinum blonde took several stinging attempts, and the teal dye used afterward managed to get itself all over my clothes and skin. But, somehow, after hours of persuasion and scalp pain, it was done. As soon as I walked out of the salon, though, I received looks of ridicule and sneering from passing strangers, the first showings of mockery that I soon learned to endure alongside jeers like: “When did you fall into a pit of radioactive goo?” “Who forgot to clean up their crayon box?” and (my personal favorite) "Green Lantern's in the house!" I was a bit unnerved; I had expected absolute, fawning adoration for my rebellious antics. But after a while I learned to take it all in stride, laughing along with them or firing back my own retorts. Some of the taunting even improved my mood and self-confidence. No longer did I shrink back from assaulting stares or accusing fingers. My hair was shield, gauntlet, and sword all at once. In time the compliments came too, brightening the days I was caught without an umbrella and the rain would begin to wash the vivid blues out of my hair. As a target of nearly constant needling and scorn, I started to grasp how much appearances affect our perceptions of others. I'm not as quick now to smirk at a stranger's poor outfit choices or gawk at a bad haircut. I began to question the unnecessary yet routine criticism of daily life that I was previously blind to. Why make a day harder than it needed to be? I found no point in making others' even more burdensome. I made it my goal to give at least three genuine compliments a day, beginning with my immediate family and eventually reaching out to other students. Before I realized it, this fight soon crept into every part of my life: I found myself defending strangers in the mall when my friends would poke fun at their looks, arguing in theology classes that what a women wears should not determine how she is treated or if she warranted harassment, and writing public presentations and papers on how mass media and social expectations can crush the self-esteem of countless girls and women around the nation. Although my hair might be a tiny bit damaged from one (or several) rounds of harsh bleaching, I don't regret dyeing it at all. That summer, the quiet, well-mannered, courteous girl I was transformed into the self-confident character I still am today, whether my hair decides to show it or not. 









I am very attracted to the opportunity to explore the offerings at MIT’s Mathematics and Physics Departments. Mathematics and physics have been my academic passions ever since I entered high school. Therefore, I am confident that my academic interests will involve those fields. I am fascinated by how mathematics and physics interact. Something that appeals to me is that, in today’s world, these fields are as “practical” as engineering or business. I am especially interested in understanding the language of physics and mathematics as they are reflected in the workings of the universe and their applications to the modern world. 









She wore a fluffy elf cap—powder pink, of course—and at barely an arm’s length, she already sported wispy hair and delicate fingers and toes. Still, her puffy eyes seemed too big for her tiny visage, which seemed curled into an eternal…scowl? Gingerly, I poked one chubby cheek. “Not cute at all,” I thought disappointedly as I gazed at my one-day-old sister for the first time. In my impressionable twelve-year-old mind, I’d always imagined baby sisters to be doll-faced angels, the photoshopped kind found on Huggies boxes. So my disillusionment was expected, or so I thought. I would hardly understand what siblinghood entailed until this “little bundle of joy” was long here to stay. Bundle of joy, indeed. Well, joy is wondrously nuanced, I would soon discover. It took a while, but my initial bewilderment dissipated in time as I eagerly—perhaps even too eagerly—fell into the big sister and third parent role. At first, I wanted her childhood to be seamless in ways mine was not. It was the little things I taught her at first—that Lego structures built with the smallest piece at the bottom would probably not last, that the laws of physics indicated that bicycles were meant to be pedaled or else they would topple over. I’d dreamed of someday dueting Brahms’ Hungarian Dances with my sister, and, caught up in my own fantasy, I boldly assumed that my passions were to become her passions, my unrequited dreams and accomplishments hers, my perfectionism the same driving force that would serve her as well. But despite my “teaching,” it dawned upon me that I was no match for her individuality—or her contagious mirth, for that matter. There is a certain unchecked innocence about her that could only come from one who was not infallible and did not strive to be so. I could not help but be captivated by her ability to laugh off even my sternest criticisms during a piano lesson; her carefree disposition constantly reminded me, in an uncanny, transcendental sort of way, to trust in the world and in myself a bit more. During the Perseids meteor shower, when my sister insisted on accompanying me in my childhood hobby of stargazing, I could only laugh at her childish conception of meteors to be glittery embodiments of “Tinker Bells” flashing across the sky. Yet as I watched her enraptured gaze fixated at who-knowswhere on the horizon, I realized that for her, no idea is too far-fetched, no solution too impossible. With this pervasive mindset, I’m able to approach ideas from a new angle, to take risks when caught in an experimental muddle, to concoct unconventional designs in the newspaper. It is with this candid and inquisitive mentality that I ask “why?” to questions with no answers, to be earnest, to live. Because of my sister I’ve learned to love bread crusts, the ends of ice cream cones—and everything else that needed to be consumed in her wake. Because of my sister, I bypassed moody teenagerhood. Because of my sister, I realized the beauty and simplicity of a child’s reality. And from that first day I saw her, I have not scowled since. 









I have a disease, an ambiguous disease that coerces me into festering in a ridiculous situation until it’s even more ludicrous resolution and compels me to exacerbate the event by my own capricious nature. With neither cure nor vaccination for this disease, it can develop at any age. Its symptoms range from negligible to severe, including showing up to a non-costume party dressed as a nun, showing up to a costume party dressed as myself in a push up bra, winking at strangers and soliciting wayward boyfriends. Though lacking formal diagnosis, I am undoubtedly suffering from Compulsive Living for the Story Syndrome (CLSS.) I began to suspect that CLSS had its talons in me the first time that I used a suggestive pickup line on a church elder. However, I did not realize that I was irrevocably infected until one fateful afternoon during a trip to China. I had been trekking through Asia and just arrived in Shanghai.The hotel’s amenities were plentiful, including a spa, an intoxicating asset, as the hikes through the villages of my grandparents had rendered me craving a massage. Within minutes of entering, I was already at the spa service counter playing a manic round of charades with the non-English speaking employees. I kneaded the air’s neck and sensually karate chopped its lumbar region while wildly chanting,“Need Massage. Pay good money. Shower today. Promise.” After fitful and fruitless moments, they understood-- but only when I performed the necessary violation of leaping over the desk barrier and fervently massaging every one of them before pointing back at my pitifully pouting self as if to say, “You do dis to me!” Eventually,I was led to a dimly lit room and left without a word of instruction. Suffering from abandonment and seduced by boredom, I got naked. Nude and crude, I stared in the mirror with a brew of amazement and disgust at the enterprising “Shanghai 17 pounds” that had recently invaded the prime corporal real estate of my lower abdomen and inner thighs. I was mid-thigh jiggle when the door revealed the masseuse, a young Asian who could have doubled as a boy band performer. Lying anxiously, I waited for the hum of gongs to permeate the air. The gongs never sounded, but the piercing buzz of Chinese television did. The massage itself was an entirely different breed of insanity. Forgivably distracted by what I could only assume was “China’s Next TopTap Dancing Toddler,” the boy band masseuse performed a myriad of experimental massage techniques including probing my ear holes, slapping my face repeatedly,drumming my head, punching my butt, picking at the small wart in between my right ring finger and pinky, pulling my hair, and fingering my bellybutton. Should I have been alarmed and perhaps put a halt to this perverse massage etiquette? Why of course, but who was I to question the ancient art of Chinese massage? Nevertheless, a prudent part of me realized that something slightly erotic but more so undeniably psychotic was happening when he started laughing at my groomed American hooha. Acknowledging his amusement, I reflected; so these are the types of wonderful calamities that occur when you are afflicted with CLSS. It suddenly became clear that if I wasn’t so driven by the thrill of having sensational stories to share, I would’ve left 30 minutes earlier and my lady part land certainly wouldn’t be under survey. Despite the debate that CLSS may just be a mere personality quirk and not a genuine malady, I wouldn’t remedy it even if it were medically possible. My inability to stop situations before they escalate to comical discomfort has not only gifted me with the most riotous experiences of my life but has also provided me with a bottomless arsenal of comedic inspiration. I truly do live for the story because if I did not--- I wouldn’t be living at all. 









I see the beauty in our natural assembly of neurons, the splendor of circuits in digital chips, and of course the undying symphony of computer code running through a compiler. As a firm believer of the values of interdisciplinary education, I embrace Benjamin Franklin's drive to create an intellectually adaptable campus dedicated to closing those traditional bridges in academia. With my own explorations in the fields of neuroscience, computer science, and engineering, I admire Penn's programs combining management with technology, international studies, and life sciences. I aspire to combine business (Wharton) with my technological musings (SEAS), in the hopes that through these mutual efforts of integration, true leaders well versed in multiple spheres will arise. I realize that these academic fields, when taken in isolation, are less meaningful to society and thus strive to focus my interests over a variety of scholastic concentrations. Yet, perhaps the most important facet of Penn education is that student's are driven by their love of knowledge; without this love for learning, one cannot enjoy the fruits of education or expand the horizons of knowledge. I am awed by Penn student's initiative to use their knowledge to solve viable problems within their community. Looking to the entirely student-run club Communitech for inspiration, I am eager to disseminate my knowledge of computers and technology to the surrounding neighborhoods. As a leader of technology clubs at my own school, I have seen how the harnessed dedication of a small group of people can elicit major changes in the community. Collaboration is the breeding ground of novelty, and when a potpourri of different disciplines is thrown into this mix, the resulting ideas can have revolutionary reverberations. One only has to look to Penn's long standing history of paving the way for new emerging technologies such as ENIAC to gain proof of these brainchildren materialized. Paying tribute to the incredible research being carried out at Penn, I look forward to taking full advantage of the resources and adding my own research in reverse engineering the human brain through a mixture of computer and cognitive science. The ground-breaking investigations in robotics at the GRASP (General Robotics, Automation, Sensing and Perception) facility at Penn is astounding, especially in its role as an affiliate for a cognitive sciences institute, and I hope to become a part of this community of tech developers. With my experiences in these fields, I intend to facilitate cross-talks between faculty and students as together we attempt to unravel the mysteries of human consciousness. With this environment of unity among diverse individuals, I long to do my part and hope to contribute to this dynamic infrastructure. Franklin's venerable legacy of advocating the harmony of the colonies against British invasion rings loudly in Penn, forming the underlying atmosphere for acceptance and tolerance. As a young Jain, I hope to join The Hindu Students Council and Young Jains of America to foster the spirit of acceptance, broadcasting those principles of peace, non-violence, and morality that are central to Penn's motto. Yet, once can't thrive on academic immersion alone. I aim to actively participate on the Penn Club tennis team in order to complement my intellectual pursuits. I hope to bring my many years of experience as both a singles and doubles player to the club. With sports such as tennis and, of course, Ultimate Frisbee, I can actively relax and at the same time maintain school spirit through friendly competition. I am ready to bring to join this energetic community of leaders, innovators, and those researchers willing to traverse unknown academic territory. I am ready to wholly engross myself in Penn's atmosphere, leaving my very own legacy in the shadow of Franklin. I am ready to make the University of Pennsylvania my new home. 









I remember one of the worst moments of being a child is when you're bursting with something to say, and your parents just don’t have the time to acknowledge you. "Listen to me!" I would roar inside my head. Perhaps they could have turned and said, "Alex, you've got no idea what you're talking so about sit down." If I could have accepted the idea that I was really just immature, then that's all it would have taken to shut me up. That never happened though, and the stubbornness inside me remained. I took up debating as soon as I realized that it was allowable, even admirable, to shout opinions under the guise of a civilized discussion. Each time doing so, I felt proud in my ability to communicate. It certainly helped me win arguments – delinquent, 7th-grade arguments in which we argued for the sake of arguing. Graded on style and content, I argued with eloquence, maybe even beautifully at times, always acknowledging that there are two sides to every conflict (but only so I could better shatter one). After a while, my mind became hardwired to scrutinize others’ words, dissecting them so that I could find some flaw that would unravel their whole argument. It didn’t matter that I hadn't actually listened . It was never an option during a debate to stop, put down my cue cards and say, "That's actually a very good point you make. I was wrong this whole time." Such options are rarely available when winners and losers are chosen. But, realizing this, debates became discussions, and discussions started to hold value. This summer I attended an engineering program at UCLA, during which the organizer described how he hoped to abolish the stigma that engineers are "nerdy and socially awkward," so that they could “better communicate”. This is critical, he believes. But I've listened, and I believe that, as it stands, too many selfish motives far from the greater good hide themselves behind poetry and rhetoric, and not enough people just listen. We all really should just listen. 









 My life is a series of intense fascinations, which I dive into headfirst. Age ten. My dad shows me a family tree, and genealogy piques my interest. I collect data about my own family, interviewing relatives whenever I can, and construct a tree spanning hundreds of people stretching back centuries. Age twelve: I discover I can program my graphing calculator. I’m hooked, and explore the limits of what other people think is a mere calculator. I write games and a Mandelbrot fractal renderer. The calculator is banned from family dinner, but my head is still filled with “if” statements and matrix transformations while my mouth is filled with spaghetti and meatballs. Age thirteen. I compete in an engineering challenge to build a tower out of one sheet of paper. I place second, but I keep designing improved towers and eventually produce one nine feet tall. Age fifteen. I create my largest web application yet, EVTripPlanner, which helps people all over the world plan road trips in electric vehicles. A woman in Italy emails me about an issue with the charger database. Hours pass as I hunt down the problem. At four a.m., I find and fix it, and go to sleep satisfied. That night, I dream of code. Later I respond to the Italian woman. She replies “EVTripPlanner is amazing. Keep up the good work!” I thrive when immersed in new subjects as I explore what can be done with each piece of newfound knowledge and acquired skill. 









 I tried to hold the canvas as close to me as possible without risking touching it. It was dry, but with oil paints you never really know. It’s painting care 101: Don’t move your painting around when it’s wet. Any artist worth her salt knows that. But if you had spent the better part of a month – sometimes fourteen hours straight a day – painting, you couldn’t wait to deliver it either. I used to assume that ‘real’ artists are passionate about the process of art: the meticulous mixing of colors in search of that right shade, the thrill of sliding down the sleek brush down the white canvas and watching the paint settle in the fibers, the smooth transformation of hues as they fuse together, the slow evolution of the picture. But not me. I’d always worried that I must be a lousy artist as far as true passion goes. My enthusiasm lasts for all of the first hour. After that every painful, imperceptible movement of the brush is an irritating itch; every line that doesn’t follow the path I dictate, every shade that changes colour without my explicit permission, and all the annoying invisible details that I have to somehow find, decipher and change (and then change again and again, like running blindfolded through a maze, hoping this time I’m on the right path) until it looks about right, is a frustrating process. But watching the picture slowly fill up the blank canvas like the pieces of a puzzle coming together is somehow fascinating. When the last inconsistency in color is glossed over, the small extra fleck of paint is dissolved and the last touch of white to make sure his eyes gleam a little brighter is duly placed, and you finally get to lay down the brush, take a few steps back and look at your handy work – that’s where the true magic lies. A bold face peeks out from his two dimensional world, his eyes following you around as if he knows who it was that sat by him day in and day out. It often feels as though the face is no longer just layers of dyes that I diligently painted but a life force that sneaked onto my canvas over night when I wasn’t looking. The enchantment of the final piece has always been incentive enough for me to chain myself to a piece of cloth for months; so I can ‘wear’ it around proudly like a badge of honor when I take it to the exhibition. Yet I often find myself trying to recall every difficult detail of the process to feel in its possession again and reestablish my identity as the artist. Because stepping away also makes everything impersonal. The flat familiar face that had become almost a friend becomes a stranger again. The connection I feel with the portrait ends with the process and I find that as much as I love my finished piece, I miss that intimacy. I miss the sheer exhilaration of figuring out what is wrong and the surge of power I feel when I can set it right. It’s a very quiet unobtrusive sort of power but to feel it, is to truly feel alive. Painting might have once introduced me to it but now I can recognize it for what it is every time I figure out a twisted physics question, or get off a podium knowing I braved every one of my demons by giving a speech: the feeling of triumph over my fears and weaknesses. I don’t worry about the authenticity of passion anymore. It’s not about enjoying every second, but loving every second enough to persevere through the boredom, frustration and fear because, inevitably, the realization dawns that the struggle is what makes the destination worth the road. And passion is just my insatiable thirst to overcome that challenge. 









Dear Jack Daniels, Bacardi, Budweiser, the other suppliers of my mother's closet laundry basket, and Edna Ferber Elementary, Thank you. It is the summer before Kindergarten. Face ashen, she stumbles toward me, the heavy footfalls syncing with my throbbing heart. I wait as she feebly attempts to push my twin brother and me into the closed door of my room, moaning incoherently about us needing sleep despite it being only four in the afternoon. My hands extend toward her, the body weaving towards my caved shoulders, and I push on her weak, useless arms, feeling the putrid alcoholic sweat that idles upon her. I release and, though my stomach protests, watch. Moments of indecision pass, her body and clouded mind arguing with gravity. Drop. She lands headfirst, knocking out one of the struts from the second-floor balcony. Despite her size, my mom's body lies limp, almost stationary on the floor, all because of my own dreadful power. Events like these are among my most poignant memories: images of my ghost-like mother, her trips to the alcohol-laden Piggly Wiggly, and her calls from the emergency room and prison. During these episodes, I blindly, frantically served the disease. I cooked and cleaned while my father was away on business trips, but I lived a robot, devoid of a true understanding of my meaning and purpose. She might have been the alcoholic, but the disease belonged to both of us. By the time I was enrolled in Edna Ferber Elementary's kindergarten class, this life had become intrinsic to my identity. Even upon the first day of school, the fear associated with leaving my mom alone created a rift between my classmates and me. While they fretted over cooties, I worried about what awaited me at home, or if anyone would come to retrieve me at all. Though I knew greater problems existed, I felt helpless. To cope, then, I ensconced myself in books, hiding my differences behind knowledge and Nancy Drew in additional fear that my peers' discovery of my mom would distort their perception of me. These novels became my obsession, and, after exhausting Miss Sell's expertise and her "endless" supply of books within the first three weeks of Kindergarten, I was allowed on lone treks to the library, granted time to peruse the aisles generally reserved for the "older kids" in a Matilda-like fashion. From twelve to three-thirty, I fell in love with discovery, uncovering global tumults and the ones trying to correct them. Many of the visionaries I had deemed perfect, I found, had also originated from imperfect childhoods. Amidst the pages of textbooks and math problems, I then discovered purpose and an outlet-a means to display my own personality until I grew confident enough to venture beyond my academics. School became a talent and passion of mine, one that the disease could not withhold from me. For one of the first times in my life, I was more than my memories. Today, I am proud to be the daughter of an alcoholic. Through the disease, I discovered aspects of myself and my passions, even my adoration for knowledge and service. After the spring of last year, I no longer live with my mother; I know now that I cannot be the one to stand between her and her alcoholism. Instead, I use my time to contribute as a leader, from captaining a team of cross country runners and skiers to guiding my forty minion-like campers every summer at Camp Ajawah to building block towers with Amani and Anubis during Tuesday childcare at Solid Ground Homeless Shelter. As I prepare to move across the nation next year, I await the opportunity to impact world relations, law, and the disease within both through my education. Yes, without my mom, I would not be the person that I am today. Perhaps, she deserves the greatest measure of gratitude of all. 









I love listening to hard rock and heavy metal music. I find these music genres liberating because they pump me up and help me release stress. I enjoy doing this so much that I am an expert at games such as Guitar Hero and Rock Band, which I play with friends or alone just for the pleasure of it. Music allows me to entertain myself when I have to do things I do not like to do. Between rock music and reading a good book I can spend a full afternoon or evening perfectly content. 









I was in 9th grade the first time I stumbled upon a copy of Newsweek. What caught my eye was its trademark title: white type, red highlight, a connotation that stories of great consequence lay beneath. Such bold lettering gave me a moment’s pause, and I was prompted to leaf through its glossy pages. To my surprise, I was instantly hooked. A new world unfolded before me. Biting social commentary. World conflicts that weren’t dumbed-down. Piquant reviews of best-selling books, controversial exposés of political figures, tantalizing tidbits on pop culture, full-page spreads of Technicolor photographs. And the prose was elegant, sharp, mesmerizing. It radiated sophistication and IQ. As I scanned the credentials of the authors, my only thought was, wow. The articles were written by worldly, ambitious people who were experts in their fields, people with PhDs and MBAs from world-class institutions, people who could write brilliantly, who got paid to give their opinions, who walked with a purpose and ran in the direction of their dreams. People I knew - then and there - I’d like to one day become. This is what education looks like , I told myself. I was young, I was impressionable. Like a child standing on the outside of a candy store, nose pressed against the glass, I hungered to be a part of that cerebral adult world. So I read that magazine from cover to cover. Twice. And with each turn of the page I felt my small-town naiveté break into smaller and smaller pieces. I remember that day as an incredibly humbling experience. I had an awkward, self-conscious epiphany: that I actually knew next to nothing about the world. There I was, cream of the crop of my middle school, fourteen years of ‘smart’ outwitted by a thin volume of paper. I was used to feeling gifted, to getting gold stickers and good grades, to acing every elementary examination placed in front of my cocky #2 pencil. I wasn’t used to feeling like I’d been living in the Dark Ages. At the same time, however, I struggled with another realization, one that was difficult for me to define. I felt… liberated. I felt as though I had taken a breath of fresh air and found it to be bracing and delicious, like it was the first breath I’d ever taken and I’d never known that air was so sweet. Talk about a paradigm-shift: somehow, reading Newsweek had rekindled my natural intellectual curiosity; it had, briefly, filled a hole in my soul that I didn’t know existed. It had also sparked something within me- a hint of defiance, a refusal to accept complacency. One taste of forbidden fruit and I knew I could never go back. Although reading a news magazine seemed like a non-event at the time, in retrospect it was one of the defining moments of my adolescence. That seemingly unextraordinary day set a lot of subsequent days in motion - days when I would push my limitations, jump a little higher, venture out of my comfort zone and into unfamiliar territory, days when I would fail over and over again only to succeed when I least expected it, days when I would build my dreams from scratch, watch them fall down, then build them back up again, and before I knew it the days bled into years and this was my life. At 14, I’d caught a glimpse of where the bar was set. It always seemed astronomically high…until it became just out of my grasp. Sadly, Newsweek Magazine went out of print on January 1, 2013. Odd as it may sound, I’ll always be indebted to an out-of-print magazine for helping me become the person I am today. 









 I step up to the starting line-palms sweating, heart racing. Three short blasts of a whistle followed by one long blast and the trembling commences. After three nerve-wracking seconds, the gun goes off. I am perfectly content when I set foot on the track. The track is where I realized that my capabilities as a human being are boundless. Track, being an outdoor sport, forces me to endure a myriad of temperatures and conditions. Some days, the air is unbelievably hot and humid and surviving practice feels like an unattainable goal. Other days its coolness strips my esophagus raw. Some days, it downpours and the vicious winds push me out of my lane. Thanks to Ohio’s unpredictable temperament, rain, snow flurries, and heat waves can occur within one practice. If I learned anything from practicing under these unpleasant conditions, it is that no matter how gruesome the weather or how arduous the workout, these obstacles can be overcome. This newfangled knowledge that I can beat all this world has to throw at me engineered a mental toughness within me and ignited a burning ambition for fearlessly tackling hardships encountered on a daily basis. The laps that I run around the track are not just a form of aerobic exercise; they are my therapy. With each stride the world around me vanishes; the one hundred point test tomorrow does not exist, the eight hour shift that I have to work this weekend is not real, and for once I do not have a list of errands to complete. The cool, spring air is intensified by a layer of sweat that covers my body, and heavy panting and the rhythmic thud of my footsteps drown out the nearby traffic. My first encounter with the track occurred at the age of fourteen. Insecure and shy, I said very little to the other girls, but luckily my talent spoke for me. As the competition season progressed, I became more aware and proud of what my body was capable of accomplishing. This realization was accompanied by a budding confidence, and for the first time in my adolescent life I felt significant. The four years that I spent on the track were pivotal in the creation of the person that I wanted to be and have become. My ability to persevere through tough workouts revealed a strength that I was unaware I possessed: determination. The confidence I gained from improving my times aided in the creation of friendships, but most importantly, I discovered a technique for assuaging life’s woeful moments. The track is not just a four hundred meter circle to me; it is the place that prompted my transition from an insecure fourteen year old girl to a strong, ambitious, and confident young woman. 









The air was that of a stagnant summer, stifling hot and stubbornly unmoving. The dirt road that snaked through the idyllic Taiwanese countryside had rattled the old, blue pickup truck for over an hour before it had shuddered to a stop. Stepping out onto the muddy riverbank, I anticipated the surprise that my eccentric uncle had promised. There it sat: a Styrofoam boat, assembled out of scraps of discarded cups, packing material and blocks. “I made it myself,” he proclaimed proudly, boarding the boat. I followed with trepidation, but it astonishingly supported both his weight and mine with ease. “How?” I asked. He turned to me, his eyes twinkling, and said “Beauty lies in the balance.” Growing up, I was always fearful of being too ‘American’ in front of my traditional family, or too ‘Taiwanese’ in front of my peers. Whenever I saw my relatives, they would always tease me about being an ‘ABC’ - American-born Chinese - the appearance of an Asian, with none of the cultural heritage. I could not follow the New Year’s traditions since they conflicted with the school calendar. I couldn’t avoid it either, because at the same time, my lunches of radish soup and stir-fried eggplant fascinated my classmates. As a child, I felt as if I had to categorize myself as either Taiwanese or American. Like a trapeze artist, I was swaying over two sides of the same line. It wasn’t until I learned about the “American Dream” that I gained insight into my definition of self. As I took note of its tenets, I realized my parents were its embodiment. My mother and my father both grew up in abject poverty. My mother’s family ate little but rice every night for fifteen years to pay for her school fees, while my father wrote his assignments faintly since pencil lead was too expensive. The American Dream, for them, was a channel that personified egalitarianism and the possibility of prosperity, in which they could better their circumstances by virtue of sheer effort. I understood then that my identity was not a question of culture, rather, it was a question of character. I could define myself by my own parameters on my own terms. Part of my identity, I decided, was my heritage, one of a purposeful stride toward my potential. Every time I return to Taiwan, back to the family farm and its ramshackle sheds, it serves not only as a proud reminder of the distances one can go with hard work, but also as an anchor to one’s beginnings. For me, the American Dream has been a philosophy I first inherited and then self-actualized. While my parents took it at face value, I tailored it to fit my own specifications. Instead of cultural labels, my identity pays homage to the optimism and ambition of the American Dream. I adopted a philosophy of diligence and commitment to the future from my parents, while still being rooted in my experiences and relishing the simple pleasures of Styrofoam boats. After all, beauty lies in the balance. 









 Mirror for purity. Gold Fish for life. Vinegar for patience. Garlic for health. Sprouts for rebirth. Oleasters for love. I love sitting by the Haft-Seen, surrounded by family, at the turn of another solar year on the first day of spring. I love listening to my dad pray for us with the Quran before him. I love the smell of our traditional foods wafting from the kitchen. For that one day I am truly an Iranian; before I revert back to the Georgian Calendar, my confused state of semi-agnosticism and… no, I will keep the Persian cuisine, thank you very much. Most of culture is patterns of learned social behaviour that in the context of the multi-cultural international community that I’ve grown up in loses its meaning. They are the flavours of life: an excuse to celebrate three ‘new year’s a year, sing two national anthems with pride, and pray with every faith. They are not so much identifiers as diversifiers. We follow them because our parents follow them and we love them because of the memories they awaken. But we don’t really identify ourselves by them anymore– at least I don’t. A few days before New Year , we were on the road. My brother was sitting protectively in the front seat next to the stereo fighting off the intruding hands from the back. My mom was a few decibels short of outright screaming as I was trying to pinch my brother into compliance while my dad threatened to throw all of us out of the car. The battle was over music. Here is a part of culture that, perhaps to my parents dismay, we don’t inherit but choose for ourselves. How many teenagers bond with each other over the bands they like or video games they play? How much of our lifestyle revolves around the hobbies we enjoy – and then again the genres of those hobbies? If each life is composed of a series of stories with different settings, each person perceives the world differently depending on their experience of it; which means none of us truly live in quite the same world. It’s a lonely thought. I find meaning in life when I can look across the gulf and know that I’m not alone. I think of the universe as a collection of stories through time and space that are lost when they go unwitnessed. Cultures are the mediums through which we share these stories. Art, Music, Literature, Movies: they are the bridges people build across the gulf, by empathy and imagination. Cultures are the windows through which we can look outside our own lives and see the rest of the universe. We choose the image of the world we want to see by choosing the window. The more windows we open, the more detailed our view of the universe will be. And what we see adds to who we are. We are living in an age that is increasingly emphasising on not defining fellow human beings by their race, gender or religion. But perhaps we should identify ourselves by what we understand, what we sympathise with, what we believe in and what we enjoy. And this makes each person a mix of a variety of cultures – a unique culture of their own. 









2 months of coding and design. Endless all-nighters. Now, the time had come. The service was set to go live the following day. 1 day later: 6 countries. 1 week later: 14 countries. 3 months later: 78 countries. My first attempt at creating an online service was the result of a desire to help those students like me who were frustrated at spending excessive amounts of time looking up long lists of vocabulary words. Fueled by this inspiration, I created EasyDefine (www.easydefine.com), a handy Web 2.0 tool that would automate the whole procedure. After enlisting the help of a friend with Photoshop, I released it into the mainstream. Within a few months, it had users from over 75 countries and over 1350 cities. I envisioned expanding this into a whole suite of Easy software, targeted specifically at the education sector. Featured in blogs such as Diigo and Reddit and bookmarked by many at Delicious.com, this service began to create a buzz not only with international youths, but also within the teaching community. It was at this point that I began wrestling with management principles. I needed to determine at what point one should start adding advertisements to the site without taking away from the aesthetic interface. Embracing this fickle nature of business, I want to be able to efficiently determine not only how to accurately gauge user response with respect to interfering advertisements but also how to produce those cutting-edge technologies bound to charm even the least technologically-inclined user. M&T classes such as Management 235: Technological Innovation and Entrepreneurship address this exact issue of broadcasting technical advances with respect to entrepreneurship. My evolving interest in business matured as I explored the vast diversity of cyber-businesses through web technologies. The initiation of my own web programming and graphics business allotted me the opportunity to learn better ways to interact with clients, increase customer satisfaction, and develop consumer loyalty. Soon I came upon a central precept: with a business it is not just about the benefits of the product, it's about offering memorable service that paves the way for more customers. The customer had to realize the unique benefits of enlisting my web-development services, so stylistically, I was prompted to develop a signature way of integrating asynchronous and client-side technologies. With Wharton's novel programs in business management, I will be able to master the fundamentals of administration, especially in a self-owned business. Combining this with Penn's engineering programs I can learn every aspect of research & development of a new product or service from marketing to operation management. Through all the robotics competitions I participated in, there was one recurring theme: while we could write thousands of lines of code, we couldn't come close to simulating the complexity of the brain. This application of computer science, neurophysiology, and engineering – imitating the human brain – truly intrigued me to the extent that I wanted to combine these three interrelated fields into a unified study. I devoted substantial amounts of time combining the fields, whether I was trying to simulate the human brain through intricate artificial intelligence or perfecting the limbs of a robot to give it more anthropomorphic qualities. The Computer and Cognitive Sciences option in the BAS program embodies this intersection of two entirely different disciplines. Under the aegis of the M&T program, I will be afforded the ability to study under multiple layers of highly specialized fields; while still learning how to integrate computer and cognitive sciences, I can also learn the principles of management of a business and even a lab. The fact that this program does not limit one to a specific business or engineering aspect, but rather offers the freedom to choose from a variety of concentrations substantiates the beauty of the interdisciplinary approach. Yet even more importantly, the assimilation of technology and management is meant to have beneficial consequences for humanity. One needs to be able to circulate these new findings, to have an ability to bring advances to the common man. As a child growing up in India and America, I have seen the vast divide between those with the knowledge of technology and those unaware of it. I hope through my studies in management that I can become a mediator and publicize new findings to bridge the technological divide. As a result, I have found it necessary to draw from several fields, technology, science and management, to accomplish many of my goals with regard to robotics and cyber-businesses. Yet, one can't overlook the emphasis given to the study of humanities, as a true liberal arts education is just as necessary to the success of these inevitable interactions as is the professional education. With Wharton's "business and more" mantra, and the SEAS' hands-on-research and practical design experience, it is evident that the integration of these two departments is a precursor for success. I hope that with the M&T program, I can realize my dreams of creating that ultimate robotics business. The key fact of the program is that it doesn't just produce intelligent individuals – it produces leaders ready to innovate and tackle the most imperative problems of our day. 









After a long school day, I frequently come home and rush straight to my piano, where I close my eyes and play out my emotions. But though I have been playing traditional piano for ten years, you will be hard-pressed to find me churning out a vigorous Chopin etude for fun; instead, my greatest joy comes from improvising covers of my favorite popular songs. When I am feeling down, playing Akon cheers me up. In my mischievous moods, I channel Billy Talent into the keys. Catch me in my happiest hour, and I am found swaying on a piano bench, eyes closed, arms loose, blasting Matt and Kim's Daylight through the house. I seem to live in a world overly concerned with certainties, and I am just glad I have music in my life to unwind, to express myself through songs I love. No sheet music, no pressure, no limitations. 









 Major: Art History I am an artist; a strange blossom of creativity sticking out awkwardly from a long lineage of electrical and later electronic engineers, like a lonely flower on a big, rigid cactus plant. Behind me, I have eight consistent years of rigorous education in the practice of Fine Arts with a private tutor, throughout which I have embraced a wide variety of styles ranging from the measured precision of the High Renaissance to the free, lively strokes of the Impressionists. My tutor always emphasized the origins of these techniques introducing me to monumental artists at a young age in the most interactive way possible. In explaining the works of Renoir she would pull apart the layers of paint down to the initial sketches, and with my own brushes I would build his paintings back up, layer by layer, just as he did decades ago; this filled me with the most incredible feeling, as if my own hands became portals to the past, and I could watch the creation of a painting that now became an irreplaceable part of history. Over the eight years, this approach to mastering painting shaped my deepest interest in the History of Art, making the pursuit of new knowledge in this inexhaustible field my passion. My pursuits became increasingly pronounced as I gained independence: since I was fourteen, I started regularly visiting the Pushkin State Museum in Moscow, frequented museums in San Francisco, visited the Louvre, Uffizi and Dresden Galleries, and much more. Constantly sketching, I rapidly advanced in fine arts, but was left with a beautiful soup of wonder and awe, peppered with loosely connected names and dates in terms of Art History. It was not until my freshman year in college that this ambiguous fascination turned into something solid and powerful. My first formal Art History courses made me glow and burn with fascination; I watched in awe as years of loved, familiar paintings suddenly snapped into a solid structure, metal rods rose out of antiquity to support all later movements, mentors linked with students and fell into their appropriate levels of this structure, each connection sparked and got welded together in my mind. The light, dreamlike veil of mystique that surrounded my idea of art evaporated in a matter of weeks, and I was suddenly awoken to see the gravity and grandeur of the things I have known for years. I visited the Pushkin State Museum 24 times that summer, filling 3 notebooks with notes, brought back 15 pounds of Art History books from Europe, and began serious independent research including online publications. Upon my return to America, I felt my mind overflowing with information and, to categorize it, came up with an extensive project which turned my room into a shrine to the world heritage of art. A long timeline ranging from 500 BC to the end of the 20th century encircles three walls of my room. It is segmented into overlapping movements, color coded for different countries, with separate lines stretching along the main timeline to show lives of artists, with small colored reproductions of their major works attached in chronological order. This timeline is thoroughly supplemented with short biographies of influential Philosophers, indications of mentor/student relations link artists, thick black lines of wars, plagues and religious reforms indicate serious shifts in ideals, and consequentially the subject matter of paintings, showing how rising and falling empires, like natural disasters, wipe out the old ways giving life to the new. The beauty of this project is that it’s forever a work in progress that can be constantly supplemented with new information. The first thing I do upon returning form a museum is print colored reproductions of one or two new pieces I saw, or add an entire new line for an artist I discovered and researched. It is a growing and moving creature, always hungry for new information, urging me to fill the gaps in my knowledge. 









Break your wrist. Feel your bone cracking, your sinew twisting, your nerves splitting. You slipped while doing roundhouse kicks and landed on your wrist instead. The paper-thin padding of the dojo does nothing to cushion the impact with the concrete beneath. The master wraps your broken wrist in the board, which you still managed to break, and some duct tape. You feel pain. The truth in that last sentence is sneakier than it looks, because pain needs someone to feel it. Comb the universe atom by atom, and you will not find a single atom of pain; it is, rather, an experience. One who gets rid of the thought of pain will be rid of the pain itself. That is why a doctor with the authoritative voice and a charismatic quack can both relieve pain: they eliminate not the nerve signals which inform the brain that a wrist is broken, but the thoughts in the brain which tell the consciousness that it is in pain. Have this delicious piece of cake. It is rich and luscious and velvety and smooth, the best piece of cake you have ever had. Have another slice. A third. A fourth. A forty-eighth. How do you feel about cake now? Anything can cause pain. But I can keep my perspective. Like Solomon looking at his ring, I remember: “this too, shall pass.” A broken wrist. A spell of vomiting. Acute embarrassment. A triumphant score on a test. All these, and more, shall pass. I can still punch a board in two. I can still enjoy cake. I can still get out in front of an audience and speak. I can still try to humble myself. And what if I do lose something permanently? I lose my wrist: I gain a topic of conversation and thought. It is not quite a Stoic philosophy. A Stoic believes that virtue, as in the improvement of moral fortitude, is necessary and sufficient for happiness. I do not believe that. A dog may be happy, and truly happy at that, with a bone. I could be truly happy with a slice of cake, eaten on a comfy couch in front of a fireplace away from a torrential rainstorm without a care in the world, like Omar Kayaam with his “jug of wine, a loaf of bread, and thou,” no matter how unvirtuous I may be.









Sweat drips onto my violin as we are filing into the auditorium. I just arrived from a basketball game, I’m not nervous. However, that changes when I realize that I still have my basketball shoes on. And that I still have a plethora of edits to make in the newspaper room. And that I have three tests the next day. Fun. --- Although it was stressful, I enjoyed every minute of juggling such diverse extracurriculars. I appreciated the many opportunities that my high school gave me, and took advantage of as many as I could handle. Thanks to these opportunities, I’ve fallen in love with various topics in different disciplines; all of which can be nurtured at Northwestern. I’d be thrilled to pursue membership in the University Singers and the Philharmonia. It would be a great opportunity to learn from nationally recognized Emily Ellsworth with the Singers. I would also love to continue working with orchestral music in the Philharmonia. The excellent humanities classes at the Weinberg School of Arts and Sciences also interest me. I’d love to pursue further education in subjects I was introduced to in high school, such as physics, psychology, and economics. Finally, I believe that I am a perfect fit for the McCormick School of Engineering and Applied Science due to its unique philosophy. The idea of “Whole-Brain Engineering” meshes perfectly with my interest in a wide array of subjects and disciplines. I have always believed in equal emphasis on logic and creativity in problem-solving situations, and an education at McCormick (and Northwestern in general) will bolster my well-roundedness. My Northwestern experience isn’t only about reaching an engineering career, but growing as a person. Such balanced growth will allow me to succeed through analyzation and innovation, preparing me to have an impact on the world. 









 Dear future roommate, As much as I had hoped our introductions would be made in person, I am just as glad that we will know each other before we even meet. Like the people around me would say, I try my best to brighten everyone’s mood. But first, I have to keep myself in high spirits in order to help others, right? So, should you see me practicing yoga, as it is my nightly routine, feel free to join me. I will show you the “garland,” the “prasarita,” and the “downward facing dog,” common yoga poses that help relieve stress and bring peace to the mind. Through these exercises, we can enter a state of positivity while familiarizing ourselves with each other. I understand that going to college without recognizing many people is intimidating, especially when friends may not be around to listen to your thoughts and give you advice, but yoga can help us bond. Also, I hope you love music as much as I do. Growing up with two instruments, the piano and flute, I have found that music helps me express what I cannot in words. Without music, I am like a shaken-up pop bottle with the pressure trapped inside; music unscrews the cap and provides an outlet for my emotions. Of course, I cannot bring my piano into our dorm, but you can always come listen to me play in the practice rooms; I will be more than happy to perform for you. And if you play an instrument, maybe we can try a duet. I am greatly looking forward to meeting you. As you can see, I am very open and approachable. Through our year together, I believe I can be a friend you trust. Sincerely, Jenny 









I told him that it was like aliens. Like flying saucers. Like Star Wars. Like
Transformers. But no matter what analogy I made, the little boy standing in front of me
could not grasp the concept of science fiction.
 
					 “Does that mean you can’t shrink this?” The little boy revealed a small, green
HotWheels car from his pocket. “Mrs. Frizzle can shrink her bus so small it swims in
your blood, and you guys can’t shrink this? This car is way too big for my ants to drive!”
 
					 He stared at me with sincere and confused eyes, and it pained me, knowing that I
would be the source of this young boy’s disillusionment. I knelt down to meet him at eye
level. “I’m sorry dude, but the Magic School Bus is science fiction,” I responded. “It’s
science fiction. It isn’t real life.”
 
					 Of all of my moments working as a salesman at Geppetto’s, a local toy store, this
one was both the most memorable and most significant to my life. While the little boy
eventually realized his quest for ant-sized cars was futile, his whimsical notions of
miniature transportation and intravascular travel lingered in my mind. I pictured tiny
submarines being driven alongside bacteria, and wondered why technology had yet to
conquer the microscopic realm. How come humans, I contemplated, who have the
intellectual capacity to send a spacecraft millions of miles to Mars, have yet to send an
explorer into our own human bodies?
 
					 In my determined search for answers, I scoured through the Internet and my AP
Biology textbook for information about transportation at the molecular level. Through
this, I discovered many different ways a nanosized vessel could be propelled, such as
flagella (twisting tails) or microfilaments (like train tracks within cells). Still, I was
stumped as to why tiny machines were not currently swimming in my veins.
 
					 I acted on my curiosity and sought out an internship at the Department of
Nanoengineering at UCSD under Professor Joseph Wang. I approached the internship
expecting to simply acquire a few insights on the mechanics of bacterial and cellular
movement. Instead, I was exposed to a whole new world of science. Comparing life as
we perceive it with life in the nanosized world, I learned, is tantamount to comparing the
Earth to the moon. In the realm of the nanomotor, water molecules become magnetic BB
gun pellets that push and pull randomly in a process known as Brownian motion. Low
Reynolds number makes moving through air or water feel like wading through honey.
And any usable momentum? Forget about it. Inertial properties are so minimized that
nanomotors are either accelerating or stopped. 
			 
				 
					 Through my research, I was able to delve into this exotic world. Because
nanoengineering is still a budding field, many of the specifics of motion and dynamics at
the nanoscale are unknown. Thus, when I was assigned to a project designing and testing
bubble-propelled microjets, I felt as if I was exploring a previously undiscovered realm.
 
				
			
		
			 
				 
					 My first days of laboratory experience were both exciting and nerve-racking.
Producing and testing nanowires while sporting a UCSD lab coat and purple nitrile
gloves made me feel like a pioneer on an ambitious search for answers. However, since I
was working with scholars that already had several years of nanoengineering experience,
I generally had little confidence in my own ideas and opinions. During our first project
meeting, however, I found inspiration in the form of children. I remembered that while
coaching a third and fourth grade basketball team and working at Geppetto’s, many of the
suggestions and ideas of the kids were, despite a certain level of simplicity, still very
interesting and thought provoking to me. Applying this to myself, I felt compelled to ask
many questions and express my thoughts and opinions, however simplistic they were,
during this first meeting. As a result, many of my ideas ended up being implemented into
the final experiment, including an idea of mine regarding a method for etching grooves
on a silver wire, which was eventually introduced as a crucial step in the procedure for
producing these bubble-propelled microjets. Thus, I evolved from an explorer to an early
settler, helping to set the foundations of a new world.
 
					 Nanotechnology is still in its nascent stages. Nevertheless, it is progressing at a
rapid rate, and I am certain that its unbelievable potential applications will manifest
themselves in the near future. It could save lives; imagine cancer-seeking missiles
rocketing through your body or microscopic capsules that release insulin upon detection
of high blood sugar. Environmental concerns could be quelled with water-purifying
nanomachines and oil-consuming robots to clean disastrous oil spills. Even more
intriguing is the notion of accelerated evolution, in which the structure organic molecules,
such as enzymes or DNA, could be edited very precisely and specifically. I can almost
hear the doctor saying, “You have a family history of sickle-cell anemia? No problem,
I’ll just send these little guys over to your blastocyst to check it out and fix it if needed.”
 
					 And to think, all my interest in nanoengineering was spurred by the simple
question of a little boy, a boy I have not seen since our one and only encounter at
Geppetto’s. He came to me with imagination and vision, and I turned him away citing the
falseness of science fiction. If only I could tell him what I have learned. That I have
witnessed first hand the bizarre physics of an alien world. That I have contributed to the
first steps of conquering a foreign field. That I have seen glimpses into the advanced,
robot-filled future. If I ever see him again, I will tell him: through the unlimited creativity
and curiosity of man, even science fiction can one day converge with reality. 









 When I tell a friend or family member that I’m going to Major in Design, they normally respond by looking slightly confused, then asking “What exactly is that?” I always immediately seek the refuge of a specific example; maybe explaining how the apps on their phone are designed or how the money in their pocket has to meet the goals of security and usability alike. Most of the time they say they’ve never really thought about it before. However, unlike them, since my childhood I have constantly thought about and tinkered with the things that permeate our everyday lives — often technology items, like phones and software. But stories, ideas and how to communicate different messages was equally of interest. My enthusiasm in both areas led me to start [redacted 1], my tech publication, in seventh grade. While running [redacted 1], I received products for review from tech giants and startups alike. Reviewing a device was a challenge two-fold; firstly, I had to evaluate the product within the correct context and then decide how to best communicate my observations in a review. During my summer internship at [redacted 2], I saw first-hand how writers, directors, editors and designers work together to tell stories from conception through completion. Unlike many teams who succumb to the illusion of having to choose between speed and quality, they consistently achieve both; and that’s a methodology I carry to this day. Later, after completing my internship at [redacted 3] in 2014, they hired me part-time and I stayed connected with their company. When they pivoted and starting working on a new idea, I became involved with the ideation and design feedback loop for their new app. This experience of generating ideas, bouncing them off people and iterating was intense — but also rewarding. Becoming involved in the creation phase after being constrained to the critique phase for so long was refreshing. Even though I wasn’t ultimately in charge, I believed my ideas had something to add and advocating for them was an exciting new challenge as well. With experience and interest in both communication and product design, I’ve found myself caught in a difficult place. At most universities, I would be required to make a choice between one of the two, and some schools are so limited, that if you pick wrong, you might be out of luck until you can transfer institutions. But, Carnegie Mellon’s flexible BDes undergraduate curriculum doesn’t force students to decide out of the gate. Knowing that for the first two semesters I will soak in Product, Communication and Environmental design is hugely attractive — it means peace of mind, and that has been been all too rare in my search for institutions. Additionally, unlike many other art or design schools, the School of Design at Carnegie Mellon is located within the broader context of a research university. The School of Computer Science and its Human-Computer Interaction Institute each offer extremely enticing minors to supplement my education at the School of Design — opportunities like that can rarely be found at traditional design schools. Finally, as someone who aims to find their self within the tech sector in the future, Carnegie Mellon’s vast ties to the technology world only serve to further underscore its appeal. Some digging on LinkedIn revealed hundreds of Carnegie Mellon graduates in design positions working at companies I would love to be part of — those numbers are, again, peace of mind. Carnegie Mellon’s uniquely flexible BDes Bachelor of Design degree, the School of Design’s place inside a fully fleshed out institution and its connections to world of tech are just some of reasons I’m so interested. I’ll be flying down from [redacted Canadian city] to present my Portfolio in-person and I can’t wait to take a look around. [redacted 1] : My technology YouTube Channel & publication [redacted 2] : A large technology publication [redacted 3] : A small california startup 









As my thoughts drifted by with snapshots of scenes of the most memorable parts of my summer, I realized more fully than ever why I love engineering: June 21st, 2014 Standing in the dim auditorium at the University of Texas in Austin, I nervously gulped as I nodded at my First Bytes computer science camp teammate. A switch was flipped, a mouse was clicked, and a dub-step version of Demi Lovato's Neon Lights began to play as the multi-colored lights on the board I held started to dance and weave patterns to the beat. When the last note and light faded away, the audience's thundering applause resonated throughout the auditorium. July 31st, 2014 "Yes!" I thought to myself, as I stared excitedly at the 'program completed!' text shown on the statistical analysis software. The graphs and data charts showing the various statistical relationships between different biomarkers and cognitive functions are strewn across the screen in victory. Exhilaration rushed through me as I looked at my months of combing through research paper and hours spent on Saturdays debugging the program come to fruition. Of course, my exposure to engineering had started far earlier than that - in fact, even before I knew what the subject was. While still toddling around, I've watched curiously as my mother drew diagram after diagram of mechanical parts as a mechanical engineer. While still in elementary school, I was already an old friend with the uniquely clean and acidic smell of the laboratory and the churning of the machines due to my father's job as a biomedical engineer. My parents' science and math aura must have affected me, as I have always been more naturally inclined towards logical puzzles and sudokus than crossword puzzles. I still loved to read, but instead of liking gushy romantic dramas like most of the girls I knew at my age, I preferred analytical mysteries. Having been exposed to engineering all my life, I had never fully realized its true beauty until personally experiencing the thrill of programming christmas lights and participating in interdisciplinary research. It is with this same undying passion for discovery and creation that I had crafted cardboard boats, programmed robots, and executed my first Gram-Schmidt. Those moments of self-fulfillment were pure happiness - yet, that intellectual thirst for discovery could not be satisfied. My mind still constantly wanders from one thought to another, seeking new answers to the problems I notice in our world. Because of the current advancements in animation and gaming, my interest in virtual reality stemmed. Because of my research in psychology and my readings, such as Columbine and The Mask of Insanity , my curiosity about psychopathy stemmed. From those two interests an idea bloomed: Why not make a therapeutic treatment for psychopaths in a virtual reality setting? To satiate my appetite for discovery and to fulfill my idea in the ideal facilities, I look to Cornell. With its world-renowned undergraduate research program in the College of Engineering, I would be able to fulfill my dream under the guidance of Professor Kavita Bak, who is well-versed in using computer graphics to model complex virtual worlds, and Professor Harry G. Segal, who focuses on psychopathology and therapeutic processes. With its unique Computer Science with Three-Course specialization feature, I would be able to pursue my interests in computer science as well as psychology. With its Diversity Programs in Engineering, famously recognized by President Obama, and its almost 1:1 gender ratio in a typically skewed engineering world, I will be able to truly fit in among one of the most diverse yet technological crowd. Last but not least, with historical alumni such as Steven Sinofsky and Marc Levoy paving the path before me and some of the most innovative and brilliant peers and faculty surrounding me and inspiring me, I know I will be able to reach further than anywhere else at Cornell. 









I never knew I’d find a second home. I guess it waltzed itself into my life the moment I timidly walked into the advanced journalism “pub,” sitting down next to the only other freshmen who had been accepted onto staff that year, a tall, ungainly-looking boy with a brilliant grin and a girl who looked almost as innocent as I. There are many such moments in life, those singular epiphanies that force one’s acknowledgment that something is at play of a far greater magnitude than what can be distinguished at first glance. But as climactic as it may seem now, there really was no defining moment when each new wave of Falconer staffers became a part of my family. Maybe it was the thrill of a 2:30 a.m. layout night, or perhaps it was the staffwide panic-induced bonding at the beginning of each month when we frantically solicit business advertising to support our newspaper, but somewhere and somehow, the three rooms of the Torrey Pines journalism staff— the computer lab, the classroom, and most of all the publications lounge, fondly dubbed the “pub”—morphed into a home away from home for me. Falconer ds love to joke that our pub is a magic portal. Usually it leads to the fantasy world of Narnia—or whatever my mind happens to dwell on when questioned by inquisitive outsiders. Yet as I’ve ventured deeper into its depths for the past three years, I have begun to realize that indeed our pub is a portal, and on the other side lies not a figment of C.S. Lewis’s imagination but an infinite dimension of the printed word, one that is as inspiring and as passionate and as real as the human experience—and the wondrous nuances of staff life that I have come to cherish. It is to the pub that an embodiment of all the athletes, the thespians, the nerds, and the rebels is somehow attracted, like butterflies to a field of wildflowers, united by our mutual passion for writing, our eye for design, and most of all, our devotion to our monthly publication. With its one wall of reflecting windows facing the exterior, the pub is a near-perfect mirror on the outside world. Sitting within this curtain of invisibility, I can see the figures of other students and teachers gliding across the silver screen as though in a silent film sequence. A girl stops, glances at her reflection in the mirror, and checks her hair and makeup; her eyes look straight into mine, yet she cannot see me. It was this mesmerizing sense of omniscience that first seized my fantasies—the moments in so many others’ lives which I can witness as a journalist, whether spoken and written in words or captured and expressed through images. It is in this familiar yet enchanted place that I have conducted many of my most enlightening interviews over the years. True, there is glamour in the notion that journalists serve as the “gatekeepers to the news,” and the opportunities I have been endowed with on a daily basis, from phone conversations with officials in the governor’s office to conferences with teen movie stars, are tantalizingly unlike any of the experiences offered to the typical high school student. Whether it is with a hot air ballooning agency struggling with increasingly strict restrictions each year or a homeless man searching for a purpose in life, interviews have led me to witness firsthand the beauty and pain of each individual’s story. It is incredibly humbling, and incredibly ironic that the resounding majority of the people I have spoken with I will never meet again, yet even as a stranger I was given the chance time and time again to share in their lives, to believe, to empathize. At first, I drank in this newfound perception and sought to shine the spotlight on the individual through my writing, struggling to freeze these transcendental moments I witnessed into the monochromatic ink of newsprint. But it was not until, in the comfort of the pub’s couches before a quaint tea-table and accompanied by a seemingly undepletable jar of Twizzler licorice candies, I was swept from the once pain-free bubble in which I dwelled into a whirlpool of emotions, that I began to realize that the quintessence of the human existence could never be captured in mere syllables. Reaching out to the parents of a student who was killed by a tragic prescription drug overdose, it was in the pub that I first learned to be sincere, to trust, to live, as the old couple’s optimism shamed the petty squabbles that had governed so much of my life until then, optimism that, though marred by regret, anger, and despair, effulged an irrepressible hope. Until that moment, I had naively believed my existence, and the existence of those immediately around me, to be that of an ethereal bliss. Never before having personally experienced sorrow so close to home, I was struck deeply by the family’s story—not only by their son’s passing, but even more by the unselfish willingness of his parents to share with me their most profound pain and most insightful reflections. Now I reach out to every soul in the sky, cry until my tears can fill an ocean, laugh until I doubt I’ll ever breathe again. Even when I walk out the mirrored doors of the pub for the last time next year in June, I know I will look back upon the portal, and, if it is 2:30 a.m. on a starlit Wednesday morning, the green glow of the LED sign at the door will blink fondly once more in the distance: PUB OPEN. It will always be open. 









I only allow myself to watch one movie in theatres every year. Although some people may view me as cheap, my frugal nature has been a strong source of my self-identity. This sense of resourcefulness is apparent throughout my family’s activities, whether it is cooking our own dinner or bargaining for a lower price, we always kept track of where our money was going. The first couple of years after we moved to the U.S. were difficult as my parents tried to establish a foothold. They hoped to realize the American dream as soon as possible, and this revolved around having our own house. More often than I could handle, they told me about the importance of being mindful with my spending. With their influence, I began to appreciate my understanding of the concept of money. When my father suggested that I help out at his new startup company, my interest of money became more concrete. Even in tasks of little importance, I learned to organize his company’s payment files, and gained my first experience in the business world. I furthered my interest by taking a management class called Introduction to Information Systems at Foothill College. The class focused on people who wanted to be knowledgeable in the art of financial management. After learning how to organize financial data for easier interpretation, I was eager to apply these skills into real life experience. When I learned about an opportunity at a company called Pelican Imaging, I quickly utilized my resources to further my interest in economics. However, on the first day, I realized I was ill prepared for the position. I knew I had no skill set required for such a high-tech company. This self-doubt and insecurity manifested into my attitude towards my assignments. Although my work was not sloppy, it lacked efficiency, and my boss quickly critiqued me. While I was there, a fellow intern offered to assist me with my tasks. She reminded me that everyone has significance within a business, and I found that I did not have to be an engineer or accountant to be able to benefit the company. Even at the company, I noticed how resourceful they were; from building their own computers to seeking out the cost-effective technical services. I witnessed that if the interns did not properly file the company’s documents, there would be a backlog of files later on. All around me I saw different divisions of people working together, trying to ensure the success of their product. It was this close knit family dynamic that I was drawn to; it reminded me of the unity our family had in order to achieve my family’s goal of owning our own house. After years of being called frugal, I have embraced my identity and my resourceful nature that fostered my interest to pursue economics. Following years of careful saving, we have finally achieved my parents’ goal of buying our own house. Also, with the internship, I learned that goals (whether personal or business) cannot be achieved without a unified team. As the very root of economics is using limited resources efficiently, my personality and ambition fit right in with this definition. After my experiences, I hope to work in an environment that will have the supportive structure and harmony as is present in my family. Not only does this type of structure welcome people from many different backgrounds, it also encourages unity among its diversity. I am confident that whatever I face in the future, I will not lose my own self-identity. 









And I stand up, my dark blue dress cascading down my legs, the last note still echoing in my ears. Silence. Then, a thunderous applause rattles every bone in my body. I bow. It gets louder. Carnegie Hall. This was supposed to be a dream, seemingly unattainable. Yet, here I am. Looking back at the piano, I see my reflection and wonder how many people have gazed through this window for expression. My mind is pulled back to times of uncertainty and apprehension. Four years ago “Jenny, you can do it. Stop shaking,” I mutter to myself. I am backstage, waiting for the announcer to call my name. My mind is consumed in dread and fear, emotions that have made a habit of inviting themselves every time before a performance. Glancing sideways, I see the formidable stage: a 12-foot Steinway sits in the center and lights shine brightly on the performer. “Please welcome Jenny Shu, performer number eight.” Startled, I take a few steps toward the stage and stumble. The bench is only a few feet away, but it seems to take me a while to walk over. With each passing step, my throat gradually tightens, my knuckles start to lock up, and my heart involuntarily begins to race. As I look up, the audience is shrouded in black, like grim reapers ready to jump at every mistake I make. Shuddering, I take a cautious seat on the bench and wait for my fingers to attack the almighty beast. Suddenly, as if I were in a dream, my eyes cloud over and I cannot find my first note. Having practiced piano since the age of four, I was still unable to enjoy the art of performance. I realized that fear, brutal and relentless, inhibited my mind and buried all rational thought. Never once did I doubt its indomitable power until I discovered the truth: FEAR is nothing but “False Evidence Appearing Real.” Believing that I would perform poorly and appear incompetent, I planted this “False Evidence” inside my mind. It “Appeared” so “Real” that I diagnosed myself with performance-phobia, an obstacle that offered fear a chance to undermine the love and joy I poured into each piece. But, I have built back the magic and beauty in my music and to even greater heights. For hours a day, the piano would have no peace as I laboriously carved each note and every melodic statement into my heart. Constantly reminding myself of my mastery and authority, I unhinged the parasitic fear leeching on my confidence. And seeking all opportunities to perform, the stage became a home as I slowly took control of my fear. The piano was tamed into a gentle creature, prepared to sing under my fingers. All the nuances emerged in a tender lullaby and each change in mood magnified. Now, I am the ringmaster and the piano is bent to my will. Entirely aware of my surroundings, I bow one more time at these “grim reapers.” But, I have nothing to fear. 









One bead of sweat splashes across the newspaper headline. Still dressed in full football pads, I sit alone in the journalism computer lab, editing copy a few minutes before 9 p.m. Three hours after football practice, my cleats, untied, remain stuck on my feet and I have barely even made a dent in the stack of pages I have to edit. When I was chosen to be Editor-in-Chief, my staff and the graduating seniors widely assumed I would quit football. The EIC rarely plays a sport, let alone one so demanding. There was no way I could pull off both, my staff said. It's too much; they're too different. But these polar differences keen my interest. Not only does the mixture add a variety to my routine, but it also stretches me in opposite directions, forcing me to reach goals I would never have otherwise. And while the distinctions between the two entice me, the unlikely similarities undoubtedly shape me. Journalism and football require so much of me, and although one entails intellectual adeptness while the other necessitates primal instincts, both subject me to me to a pressure that leaves little leeway for mistakes--forcing me to operate this balancing act to near flawlessness. This focused demand for perfection helps to consistently rank our paper at the top of the nation. My staff members and I spend hours evenly spacing designs, correcting grammar mistakes and making hundreds of other alterations that most will consider trivial. And when I toe the line against an opponent who greatly outweighs me on a Friday night, it is this same focused demand for perfection that separates me from the average football player. While perfection may not be attainable in my future, I know this pursuit will always keep me in the lab later, on the field longer or reaching further toward my goals. Sitting in the solitary darkness of the lab gives me plenty of opportunity to wade through such thoughts. I stay in my home away from home for a few more minutes until a school custodian walking down to his car sees, from the corner of his eye, a glimpse of the last light on campus. He opens the door and it is clear from his expression that I have overstayed my welcome. Practice is long over. My work in the lab is done for the time being. Now, it's time to start my homework. 









I should have been on a train back home, hours ago. Instead, I was standing under the looming flicker of the departures board, weary of the word should . Suitcases packed, stacked and shipped, I had just enough to escape. I needed, more than anything, to escape. Sharp inhale. Dial. “I’m going to Europe.” I announced. The words flowed breathlessly. The silence that followed seemed to stretch beyond speechlessness – I could hear the disbelief, the incredulity in the void. Then came the arguments and finally, the rush of acceptance. “Call us every day, okay? I mean it. Be safe. We love you.” This departure from my ordinary life defined what I have come to view as a moment of triumph. Staunchly rooted in order and routine, quiet anxiety steadily mounted and just as steadily wore me down. It crescendoed to such volumes that it became unbearable to remain in the status quo. I knew where I should have been going, but I was still perpetually lost. Maybe it was fate, or maybe it was just well-timed marketing, but as I walked to the train station, suitcases in tow, an advertisement caught my eye: “Let Yourself Go”. And so, with saved earnings, a window of free time and luck with travel regulations, the question, rather than ‘why?’, became ‘why not?’. Neither the tedium of airport bureaucracy nor the cramped seating dampened my lifted spirits. Not the type of person to pursue spur-of-the-moment intercontinental travel, I was giddy with the spirit of spontaneity. Wondering about what lies around the corner became far more liberating than knowing what rests ahead. This was freedom in the truest sense, unfettered by the limits of pragmatism. In the weeks that followed, I witnessed Europe’s effortless charm by not only seeing the obligatory sights but also by talking with the people. For the first time, I was free to explore the broadness of the world as well as examine what had been the narrowness of my life. I felt that the segue of old-world cobblestone into sleek asphalt reflected my habit of restraint and my newfound abandon: two sides of the same road, joined into one path that paves my journeys, through Europe and through life. From the warmth and kindness of strangers who extended themselves, to exercising my self-reliance and ingenuity, my jaunt abroad left me no longer suffocating, but breathless. My impromptu adventure created a haven from stress and a window into self-discovery. Kierkegaard once said, “To dare is to lose one's footing momentarily. To not dare is to lose oneself,” and my journey has enabled me to grasp the sense of his words. Mapping a life is impossible, despite my best efforts to do so. Life, in all of its glorious complexity, cannot be truncated to a Google calendar or a “to-do” list. Now, I see a day of possibilities instead of plans. By reclaiming my autonomy, I ultimately reclaimed my joie de vivre. As serendipities and misfortunes come and go without warning, a deviation from the word should brought me to unexpected places that have ultimately changed me for the better. I didn’t know exactly where I was going, but through wanderlust I found my path. Now I find myself asking ‘why not?’. 









Everyone longs to be happy. Some people seem happy regardless of whatever they are going through in their lives. Others feel secure and satisfied even when they do not have the material things that other persons have. Another group seems happy even when they are sad and depressed. This is because happiness to them is just a thought away. Happy thoughts can alter the way you perceive the world, rejuvenating the body which in turn leads to happiness. The following are happy thoughts to make you happier in just a few seconds. When you are down and feel that you are all alone, most people have successfully gone through that situation. Remember happiness is not the absence of struggles but the ability of dealing with and overcoming them. That person next to you has fought fierce battles and won. You are no exception. Others have won. Keep in mind that no one is stainless. No one is without a dark spot in their life. We all have our dark past. Do not dwell on your mistakes. Do not focus on what went wrong and where the rain began beating you. You can at best learn from the mistakes and move forward. Do not view the floods in your life negatively, at other times they may translate into future growth. Remember there is a difference between giving up and moving on. What others think about you is not essential. You cannot control other people, be it what they think about you or what they do to you. However, you can control what you think or take the things they do to you. Forget people’s feelings and thoughts about you. Think happiness. 









Ubiquity is a beautiful piece of software. With constant use, it becomes part of you. All the world’s knowledge resides in your fingers. It’s the extension of a man’s mind, the slow but inevitable fusion of the brain and the computer. But, sitting on a soft couch at a Starbucks in central Singapore, my visions of technology are not so romantic, at least not at the moment. An “Exception: Ubquity.translate() is undefined” annoys me. As I sip the hot chocolate and ignore the constant chattering, I try not to be consumed by this error. For two years, I have written this same program but each time, I have failed by forgetting the bigger picture, by getting bogged down into the details. But it’s not that details are bad. Had Da Vinci spent all his time on the smile, would the Mona Lisa be as enigmatic? The folds of her clothing may seem insignificant but they sum up to create the overall harmony. In the same way, every line of code must be perfect. But, right now, I just need to get past “Exception: Ubquity.translate() is undefined”. Engrossed in the screen, I look through 100s of lines of code trying to fix this issue. Is the software architecture completely faulty? Or is it just the parser module? Maybe, it’s just an undiscovered bug in the language itself. As these thoughts engulf my consciousness, I buy another cup of delicious Frapucinno. I scratch the table in frustration. I call my mom. I take a toilet break. I reply to a few emails. And then, a couple of mind-numbing hours later, I realize that “Ubquity” is actually spelled “Ubiquity”. How. Fucking. Trivial. At exasperating times like this, I feel like screaming out loud. I absolutely hate coding. I will never program again. But even in these moments, deep down, I know that this is what I want to do for the rest of my life. 









Had my synthesis reaction worked—yes or no? It was a simple question, but I had already spent hours trying to answer it in vain. As much as I loved chemistry, my patience was wearing thin. Midnight had come and gone three hours ago, and the long evening had taken its toll. With bleary eyes I pored over page after page of cluttered data, trying to make sense of the results. Occasionally my heart would leap as I chanced upon a promising tidbit, but no sooner would I get my hopes up than the morsel would reveal itself as a false lead. I was at once eager to move forward yet hesitant to do so: the right judgment about a piece of data could spring the analysis toward a conclusion, but the wrong judgment could push it just as far in the opposite direction. My inner pragmatist and inner perfectionist were duking it out to see who would decide my approach to the problem. At this juncture, I honestly didn’t know which one to obey. The pragmatist dangled the allure of compromise: if only I overlooked a few inconsistencies here and there, the remainder of the data would fall neatly into place. Admittedly, the conclusion might not be entirely right, but neither would it be entirely wrong. The perfectionist, on the other hand, insisted on rigor: if even one piece of data proved incompatible with a theory, then I would have to reshape that theory to take it into account. To do anything less would be an insult to science. In principle, making sense of the results of nuclear magnetic resonance, or NMR, spectroscopy called for the perfectionist’s approach. Even though the technology allowed chemists to deduce the structures of unknown molecules with more precision than ever before, reaching that high-hanging fruit required one to tease meaning from reams of data that bordered on the cryptic. Without going into detail, suffice it to say that NMR spectroscopy uses the magic of physics to transform a molecule into a line on paper. This line, called the NMR spectrum, forms a series of peaks and valleys and encodes all the information a chemist needs to reconstruct that molecule’s structure. The challenges of the interpretation process, however, meant that the pragmatist often held sway. Although each peak corresponds to a specific feature of the molecule in theory, in practice an NMR spectrum can look indecipherable: frenzied clusters of peaks vie for space and crowd each other out, producing ambiguities that riddle every step of the analysis. In particularly nasty cases, a subtle difference between two otherwise identical molecules can give rise to wildly different results. Likewise, two otherwise unlike molecules might give similar results if they share a few key similarities. Scientific instruments can also introduce artifacts—for example, by merging two separate peaks into one. Neglecting a small but telling detail often spelled woe for the unwitting chemist; the intricate nature of the analysis practically invited unwarranted assumptions. I had bogged down in the process of deciding which features to consider relevant. If I chose to ignore one detail, then the rest would form a plausible conclusion. If I chose to ignore a different detail, however, the result might well be something entirely contrary. If reconciling such possibilities had seemed like finding a needle in a haystack when I started, it now felt downright Sisyphean. The lack of progress was all the more exasperating because I had foreseen the difficulties: despite starting early and budgeting extra time, the work had still bloated into the wee hours. With each passing minute the pragmatist’s approach looked more and more enticing. The perfectionist, however, refused to give up. Just as I readied myself to take the easy way out, instinct told me to keep working. I had come so far, it said, and all the work I had invested would go to waste if I accepted a half-baked conclusion now. Reinvigorated by this new thirst for the answer, I drove onward. Four o’clock, then five o’clock, melted away as I inched toward the truth. Several times I started to stretch the facts, but each time I caught myself and forced my reasoning back onto solid ground. When the last piece of the puzzle finally fell into place, I looked up and realized, almost surprised, that the seemingly impossible task had come to an end. I checked my work one last time and knew, with great satisfaction, that my synthesis reaction had worked. Despite all the false starts, the apparently intractable data, and the conflicting data, my love of chemistry had prevailed. 









For as exclusive as it was, Copley's soloist room was rather simple, furnished with only a
piano and a bench. It was narrow too: the architect must not have considered the consequences of
claustrophobia before a solo performance. In any case, I took a seat on the bench and started to
set up my clarinet. Positioning the reed on the mouthpiece, I noticed the callus on my right
thumb, formed from having to support the instrument for so many years. I had never been
concerned about it before, but alone in the soloist's room, I continued to stare at it. I found it to
be an emblem of music's importance to me, and it reminded me of how far I had come to be
moments away from performing at the center of San Diego's grandest stage.
 
					 To be honest, I had never heard of the clarinet before I decided to join the elementary
school band. I had wanted to learn the flute, but when it came time to select an instrument, it was
clearly not an option: no boy wanted to be in a section dominated by girls; the risk of contracting
cooties was too great. I admit I was rather disappointed, but when I discovered the wondrous
squeaking sounds the clarinet could produce, the obnoxious young boy in me would not let me
turn back. In elementary and middle school, this innocent fun was what band was all about.
 
					 I then became a member of the local wind ensemble as an unassuming eighth grader who
sat near the back of the section. The focused rehearsal and advanced repertoire—Gustav Holst's
First Suite—was in complete contrast to the frivolous nature of band I was used to; yet, what I
felt was not constraint, but liberation. The Suite was a release of emotion, a perfect blend of
majestic and playful moments that uncovered in me a love for music I never knew existed.
Playing it was a cathartic uplift of spirit, an overwhelming of mind and soul with passion in its
purest form. From then on, clarinet was more a form of expression than anything else. As my
position in the band moved closer and closer to the front, I also discovered a kind of talent that I
began to cherish and hone with a private instructor.
 
					 I had been a student of the clarinet for almost half a decade before I had a private lesson;
it was a punch in the arm. The instructor pointed out bad habits I had developed in the most
elementary aspects of playing the instrument: air support, embouchure, articulation. I found it
rather shameful that he even had to demonstrate how to breathe properly. By the end of the
lesson, I was disheartened; the talent I thought I had discovered was not genuine. I reached a
point where I was ready to let music go. Then, the beacon of passion shone as intensely as ever,
and I realized that, despite the problems I was having, music remained the joyous means of
conveying emotion to the world that it once was. I resumed focused practice and became a
competitive musician. It would all culminate in the solo performance at Copley Symphony Hall I
was about to undertake.
 
					 Mind returning to the soloist's room, I looked away from the callus I had been staring at
for so long. Instead, I focused on the entire hand, and then on the other. As important as music
was to me, it was not the only passion of mine that these hands could produce. They could unfold
and recreate the laws of nature, as the AP Chemistry course I was taking revealed to me. Just as
the local band had done, the course provided me with a realization, a spark of interest that soon
became an intense flame. The wealth of information it covered revealed chemistry's intricacy, and the involved experiments allowed me to reproduce the wondrous reactions that had baffled
the world's greatest minds for so long. It was a difficult course, perhaps the most difficult one
offered at my school, but the depth and practicality of the subject developed in me a passion that
allowed me to look past the work and learn to love what I was doing. The class made some
students nauseous, but I took it a step further, participating and performing well in competitions
such as Science and Chemistry Olympiad. 
					 Passion has come to define who I am. I hope to be able to express and spread it to other
people, so that they may come to experience the same wonders that I have. I would do both later
that evening, standing at the front of the stage, pouring my heart out in music for the audience to
hear. Just as it had done to me, forming a callus on my hand for me to contemplate alone in that
room, I hope my passion can leave a lasting mark on the world that people may look at and find
meaning in for years to come. 









Sometimes all it takes is one person, or one assignment, to make an indelible impact. In my case, freshman year Western Civilization and my eccentric teacher allowed me to learn the benefit of hard work and determination. My lanky, bald, and animated instructor, who often wore various cultural outfits, taught with an enthusiasm I had never encountered. In addition to hearing this man’s stories about his journey biking across Africa, his unique teaching approach and demanding projects helped me develop a strong work ethic that has stayed with me for the last four years. Throughout the year, my class reenacted major battles from the Fall of Rome and experienced traditional Middle Eastern teatime; however learning the geographical map of the entire world was by far the most challenging assignment. A seemingly impossible task at first, we started slowly with quizzes and tests that would ask us to label anywhere from 20 to 60 countries, capitals, deserts, mountain ranges, and major bodies of water on a map. But the biggest challenge came in May of that year. The “Final Map Test” was a notoriously difficult test at my school, and my name would even be engraved on a plaque if I got 100%. When my teacher initially told my class that we would have to label at least 400 places on a map, we just laughed and thought it was a joke, especially since this man had chosen to wear a turban and billowing oriental cape that day. In the weeks leading up to the exam, I spent at least an hour each day playing geography games, filling out maps, and making flashcards. This test not only reinforced that I’m a very determined person, but it also showed me that I can be exceptionally hardworking and resilient when faced with an overwhelmingly large task. Even now, I can name a few obscure capitals and random bodies of water, and I’m waiting for the day when Jeopardy asks for the capital of Burkina Faso, because I could proudly shout out the answer. When the test day finally arrived, I shook nervously as I started labeling Samoa and the Cook Islands in the South Pacific Ocean. Spending four hours sprawled across a map almost as tall as myself was unbelievably stressful, especially once I started blanking out on the easiest countries and their capitals. How could I forget the capital of Nepal, or the name of the longest river in India? But nonetheless, when the locations on my map were counted, I had labeled 559. If this does not sound impressive, then I would ask: do you know the capital of Brunei? Or which country actually has three capitals? In the end, my success with the map not only got my name engraved on a plaque, but it also helped me foster a more diligent approach to my schoolwork. And despite the stressful year, I’m thankful for my teacher’s infectious enthusiasm. Following Western Civilization, none of my teachers have lectured on the importance of learning how to deflect a rhino attack on the Serengeti, or worn woven sandals from a market in Jerusalem on an average school day, but my zeal for learning remains. Although several years have passed, I’m still proud to possess knowledge of our world, a massive drive to excel at my schoolwork, and a lengthy list of places that I would absolutely love to visit. And for the record: Ouagadougou is the capital of Burkina Faso; Kathmandu is the capital of Nepal; The Ganges River is the longest in India; Bandar Seri Begawan is the capital of Brunei; and South Africa is the country with three capitals. 









 I am overwhelmed by the rules and precepts that are observed in the college. Harvard is a school built on strong christian foundations and this has influenced my body, soul and spirit to be in that college. I am someone who is so much concerned about my spiritual life and all the rules and precepts of the school since its birth in 1636 is geared towards the spiritual growth of the individual; examples are, Let every student be plainly instructed, and earnestly pressed to consider well, the main end of his life and studies is, to know God and Jesus Christ which is eternal life, John 17:3, and therefore to lay Christ in the bottom, as the only foundation of all sound knowledge and learning. And seeing the Lord only giveth wisdom, let every one seriously set himself by prayer in secret to seek it of him Prov. 2, 3. 3. Every one shall so exercise himself in reading the Scriptures twice a day, that he shall be ready to give such an account of his proficiency therein, both in theoretical observations of the language, and logic, and in practical and spiritual truths, as his tutor shall require, according to his ability; seeing the entrance of the word giveth light, it giveth understanding to the simple, Psalm. 119. 130. 4. That they eschewing all profanation of God's name, attributes, word, ordinance, and times of worship, do study with good conscience, carefully to retain God, and the love of his truth in their minds else let them know, that (notwithstanding their learning) God may give them up to strong delusions, and in the end to a reprobate mind, 2 Thes. 2. 11, 12. Rom. 1. 28. . Every scholar shall be present in his tutor's chamber at the seventh hour in the morning, immediately after the sound of the bell, at his opening the Scripture and prayer, so also at the fifth hour at night, and then give account of his own private reading, as aforesaid in particular the third, and constantly attend lectures in the hall at the hours appointed. But if any (without necessary impediment) shall absent himself from prayer or lectures, he shall be liable to admonition, if he offend above once a week. 8. If any scholar shall be found to transgress any of the laws of God, or the school, after twice admonition, he shall be liable, if not adultus, to correction, if adultus, his name shall be given up to the overseers of the college, that he may be admonished at the public monthly act. I can boldly say there is no college in the world that is so spiritually inclined like the Harvard College. May the soul of Reverend John Harvard rest in perfect peace 









In AP Statistics, I often utilized the Least Squares method to find correlations between two data sets. First, I would generate a curve that minimized the residuals: the differences between corresponding values of the two sets. Smaller residuals implied greater correlation, with a residual of r = 0 being optimal. The process works as long as the data analyzed is a random sample from the two sets. I will now perform Least Squares reduction, juxtaposing my traits and expectations for college with my impression of Stanford. Consider the data points below. Californian: On a scale from 1 to 10, with 10 representing the CA stereotype, I am a 9. I value the environment, I have an enviable tan, and my casual dress belies my assiduous personality. Stanford (a 10) is undoubtedly Californian due to its association with Silicon Valley and John Steinbeck. The resulting residual is r = 1. I belong in CA, and so does Stanford. Academic Balance: I excel at math and science; I enjoy writing and the arts. Stanford fosters the perfect balance of innovation and imagination. r = 0. Opportunity: I’d be delighted to explore the plethora of research and job opportunities at Stanford and in the Bay Area. r = 0. Distance: San Diego is 32N. Stanford is 37N. r = 5, close enough for me! Climate: San Fran is San Diego minus the Santa Anas. r = 0. Numeration: Stanford is currently number 1 on my list of colleges. I would love to be 1 more active student on campus. r = 0. The residuals are sufficiently small, implying a strong correlation! Normally, I’d do some number crunching at this point to find the exact correlation. However, since I have not yet experienced Stanford, I cannot guarantee the randomness of the aforementioned data. To determine the true correlation, I first require a Stanford education. 









 “Mommy, where are you? Daddy, where is mommy?” My three-year-old self is frantically running around the apartment from room to room looking for her mommy; I cannot find her anywhere. Daddy walks over and gently lifts me up, telling me everything will be all right. Time blurs together and suddenly, we have arrived at the hospital. “Look at her. She’s your baby sister.” I curiously walk over to the crib on the right of my mommy’s bed and stare down at this so-called “sister.” Suddenly, her mouth twitches as she chews on a strange object. Memories. My first was of March 2nd, 1998, the day my sister was born. Remembering the fear of not knowing where my mother was and the smell of the hospital, I can only now fully appreciate what I have witnessed and felt. The moments I have shared with my family and friends and the memories that have consequently formed are what I treasure the most. From good memories to bad memories, long distances and goodbyes do not have the power to rob me of those experiences. As my parents have made a photo album of me growing up, I, too, have started my own, of pets, friends, and family. Looking at my pictures, I can relive each moment. Memories. They teach and advise me, never letting me forget what I have done wrong to help me improve. Thinking back to when I played tag on the road, I realize the risk I had taken. My parents said I had put myself “in jeopardy,” but at that time, I did not understand how. Through my experiences, I have learned how to react in situations similar to those in the past. While the game of tag may seem insignificant, it is still a memory that has taught me the basic rules of safety. My memories, my guardian angels, not only provide a path away from harm, but also allow moments of my life that have made me happy to be replayed. Memories. They create the person I am today and lead me to become an even better individual. Like an old Chinese saying, “the remembrance of the past is the teacher of the future.” 









Every weekend after my karate class, I volunteer for an hour and a half teaching kids ages 3-12. The first class is the "Little Ninjas," who are just 3-5 years old. These are among my favorites to teach because they have no preconceptions or attitude. They look at you unjudgmentally and listen to what you have to say, and they will try out whatever you suggest. Sometimes they're timid at the beginning, but mostly they're just enthusiastic. Even though they are not usually all that skilled at doing the moves the first time around, I am always amazed to see what they can do after just a couple of weeks: they slide into shoulder rolls and throw spinning kicks more naturally than I do! It's refreshing to teach these little guys; their unbridled innocence makes it impossible for me to become frustrated or lose my smile. 









It moved timidly at first, its gears slowly churning as it felt the spark of life flow through its wires. Slowly, it turned, rotating on its treads, as it scanned the arena for any signs of movement. Its light sensors on the alert, it sensed that something was near. It nudged forward as it felt its touch sensor activated. Immediately, like the Nordic god Thor wielding his hammer, it released its plastic Lego hammer of doom with the force of two robust motors behind it. Yet, in that time, without a warning, another robot crashed into it, sending it flailing in confusion. The true robotics battle had begun. As robots thrashed each other to pieces, many were catapulted out of the arena, with their wheels ripped off, and their motors strewn across the floor. My robot engaged in its last battle, as it struggled to stay inside the boundaries, but it was mercilessly pushed out by a more vigorous, bull-dozer robot. Bearing witness to the raw force of technology applied and mechanized, I was astonished. Simple commands could transform an inanimate machine into a humanoid full of life. I loved that I could build a structure with Legos, attach some sort of a controller, write a few lines of code, and have my own robot that would follow my exact instructions. Taking everything I learned from this small in-class Lego Mindstorms robotics competition, I enthusiastically joined the school's Botball robotics team. The objective was to build an autonomous robot that could carry out a range of tasks including sorting, gathering, and moving objects. I was surrounded by a group of highly motivated students, who all shared the utmost goal of building a sensational robot. Every idea was taken into account, dissected, and analyzed for its validity. The robot had to compete against others so our goal was not only to maximize our points, but to inhibit the other robot from completing its task. Every day after school, our robotics workstation (a messy garage) became our haven as we labored to find the best design for our robot. Scattered across the floor were sheets of engineering design, details of mathematical formulas, and heaps of extra pieces as we tried to determine the best heuristic algorithm and design for our robot. Somewhere between keeping detailed reports of our work and trying to reconcile programming with engineering, I realized how much I had come to adore robotics. In creating retractable arms, and forklifts, we were essentially trying to replicate things that were so natural to us. Even though we had a physical model– the human body – by which to base our plans on, it was exceedingly intricate to think of muscles and neurons in terms of wires and Legos. Yet in this challenge I found the incentive to keep trying to create a model of humanity. Just as Victor Frankenstein labored to find the secret to life, I too wanted to make sense of our elaborate construction. Even the simplest things like teaching a robot to raise its mechanical arms took hours of tweaking lines and lines of code and experimenting with unusual Lego orientations. This fascination with trying to emulate our most primitive features kept me creating that new programmable formula or improving the robot's "eyes." After two and a half months our garage only got messier, existing in a state of perpetual frenzy. As the deadline approached, we worked faster, perfecting our designs, running test trials, and celebrating with soda when appropriate. At the Southern California competition, we received first place in double-elimination and documentation, and 3 rd overall. I hadn't yet realized the reverberations of this event, that the seeds of my future occupation had been cast and the faculties of my mind committed. Could my interest in robotics turn into a fervent enthusiasm about the simulation of a human brain in a robot? As time would tell, the ideas were already frothing, and the machinations of my wildest imaginations were set into motion. I never imagined that the brainchild of these playful explorations in engineering would ultimately lead to the development of the world's first completely autonomous robotics company, one that changed the face of mankind… 









"Take my advice, I've been here for a while." How long? What did you do? "Don't get on anybody's nerves, don't tell the doctors the truth, and don't forget to smile." The car comes to a quick stop, the kind that should have smashed my knees into the back of the seat in front of me, had they, not already been. "Okay sweetie, we're here." I get out and walk towards the front door. But stop when Officer Stancil yells, "Wait!" I turn around and she says, "Good luck." At the time, I wasn't sure what she meant by that. But I found out soon enough. "My name is Matthew Kraus, but you may call me Matt." White chocolate skin, dark chocolate hair, and milk chocolate eyes. "I work here at Holly Hill or as some call it, Disneyland." Disney or Holly Hell? "First, let's take your picture." He grabs an old Nikon from his desk drawer and says, "Look right in the middle." Unsure of whether to smile and not enough time to decide, out came a sly grin. "Okay, looks great." I think I blinked. "Now take this clipboard and fill out this paperwork. When you finish, bring it back, someone will be with you shortly." I grab a blue pen with a round tip and flexible body and start to fill out the papers. Fifteen minutes and twenty-five signatures later, I flip to the last page. As I sign my last signature, the door to my left opens abruptly. "Cameron Leonard?" I hand Matt the papers and walk towards a paper-thin man with large glasses, large ears, and a large nose. "My name is Doctor Lester. Follow me, please." We walk into a key operated elevator and stand in silence until the door opens on the third floor. The entire floor has two doors. The right door was for children ages thirteen through seventeen. The left door was for children ages eight through twelve. Doctor Lester opens the door on the right and says, "I wish you the best of luck." I thank him and try to figure out why the left door exists. I cannot believe how normal everyone is. Is this a high school or a mental hospital? Why is everybody here? I expected euphemisms: drugs, assault, and depression. Instead, I am told: meth head, attempted murder, and suicide. There were prosthetics under pants, scars under sleeves, and frowns under smiles. "Hi Cameron, my name is Patricia." Bleach blond hair and bright red nails. "I will be your psychiatrist during your time here. This is Tina she will be your roommate." Average height, average weight, pretty face. "Hey! Nice to meet you. Come with me, I'll show you around." I follow her down the hall to room 1352. "This is our shower. The water comes out for ten seconds before turning off, you have to keep pressing the button." Incredible. "This is our mirror. It's made of fake glass, you can barely see yourself in it." Amazing. "And this is your bed. It's hard, but you get used to it." Wonderful. "Take my advice, I've been here for a while." How long? What did you do? "Don't get on anybody's nerves, don't tell the doctors the truth, and don't forget to smile. That's the only way you'll survive in here." I thank her for the advice and she leaves our room. As I sit alone on the cheap mattress it all hits me. Hard. It's just day one. 









 Education is my Life. Many scholars have come up with different definitions for the concept of education. Some motivational speakers call it “the key to success”. Others refer to it as the backbone of our society. Many leaders, especially during the wake of the postcolonial Africa, urged their citizens to pursue education via all means possible. The list of prominent personalities’ opinions regarding education is endless. This factor alone goes to greater lengths to show how education is an important aspect in the life of the modern human being. To me, education has been a driving force towards the achievement of my life long dreams. During my childhood days, I dreamt of becoming a doctor. I know many people dismiss such dreams as being “invalid” but I think childhood dreams go a long way in motivating a child to attain their goals. All I did during in the lower levels of primary school were all aimed at achieving my dream- to be a doctor. Whenever I excelled in academics, I felt like I was a step closer to achieving my dreams. My dream was to become a doctor and save lives, education drove me to pursue it. I always had a feeling that education could solve the many problems of this world. I now know that the problems of the world need more than one person to solve them but I still think education is a contributing factor to finding solutions to these shortcomings. Emerging problems such as global warming, human trafficking and drug abuse can be solved using education. Once people get the knowledge regarding the negative impacts of the aforementioned factors, the problems facing us will have been halfway solved. I always think that through education, we can avert most of the problems facing us in this world. Fighting and civil wars in the world are partly to blame for lack of education. If the masses had education on the invaluable significance of peace, most of them would not be up in arms against each other. Although some people may argue that people who know the law are the ones likely to break it (in this context education on importance of peace), I still think that if these people were educated they would not be capable of doing half of the horrible things they are doing right now. Education was also a place for me to forge life long alliances. I still chat with some of my friends from back in primary school. Some of the friends I have made in the pursuit for education have helped me out when I was in a tight spot. Education thought me the importance of creating a connection with a fellow human being. I got to know what it really meant “to have your friend’s back”. In her article, the unschooled life, Astra Taylor says she preferred home schooling because the kind of education offered in schools did not suit her needs. She sites bullying and insensitivity to her disabled sister in school. I will not refute the incidences of occasional bullying- especially by the big boys- but the contribution of education to my social life outweighs these shortcomings by far. I had (and still do) a positive attitude towards education. Let’s face it, education is no easy task and neither is it fun as some people pretend it to be. However, we all know that the better things in life are not easy to come by. Apart from working hard, the least a person could do about acquiring an education is developing a positive attitude. As the saying goes, a wrong attitude is like a flat tire- you have to change it first before you can proceed with your journey. I learnt about the importance of a positive attitude towards an objective from my dad. He always told me that nothing good ever came easy, and so did education. His policy was “keep trying always no matter how many times you fail.” I remember this one time he promised to let me own a computer connected with internet if I became position one in my class. Of course I worked extra hard to become the top in my class. When the end of year results came out, it was not a surprise that I was leading in my class because I had worked hard for it. However, when I told my dad about the achievement, I made a mistake by saying, “I hate how hard I had to work for this internet.” He perceived that to be a bad attitude towards education and denied me the computer connected to the internet. I was angry for losing my chance to access adult movies but I learned the valuable lesson of having a positive attitude. My desire to gain knowledge has also affected my attitude towards education. Unlike before when I thought that education in schools was a tool meant to help us pass in our end-of-term exams, I now know the importance of knowledge. It’s through knowledge (acquired from education) that one gets the eye to observe the world. Without education/knowledge, I used to wonder why the government could not mint enough money to spend it on the beggars and homeless people on the streets. I always thought the president was sitting on his job for not thinking about such a “brilliant” idea. It’s only in secondary school that I realized how dumb the idea. Through education, I learnt that if the government did such a thing, the economy would collapse. Education gave me the eye to observe it from the government’s point of view. Now that I am in college, I feel like education is not about grades, but how good a person can obtain knowledge and apply it in the appropriate situation. As Astra Taylor says in her article ‘the unschooled life’, she enrolled in school at ninth grade and she felt the change of environment immediately. There were a lot authoritarian practices and most importantly, there was a “ridiculous” system used to determine the success of each student- grading. I am not advocating for laziness in school, but the grading system does not offer a good system for determining the success of an individual. The exams are like a commemoration competition-whoever remembers the most, is the ultimate winner. The education system should come up with a curriculum that tests how an individual can apply the education they acquired. Whoever applies it appropriately and follows the procedure precisely should be declared the winner. This kind of grading system is not appropriate for many subjects. Disciplines like accounting and engineering cannot be graded on one’s ability to remember only. Exams should extend to the workplace. Teachers need to see how well (or poorly) their students are applying the knowledge they bestowed upon them. In conclusion, my view is that education is the most valuable asset a human could possess. Unlike others, it does not depreciate or go out of style. Works cited Astra Taylor. “The unschooled life; Astra Taylor’s Story”. Popular resistance. January 16 th 2014. 









 “Happiness is better learned than known.” I scribbled those words onto a scrap of paper in early October of 2012 and quickly stuffed it into my pocket. This was and still is a frequent habit of mine, as it helps me remember my various thoughts throughout the day. As helpful as this may seem, it often just leads to a washing machine filled with soggy, ink-blotched pieces of paper. Luckily, my hastily written quote didn’t end up in the laundry and was instead tucked away into a desk-drawer and forgotten about for a year and a half. I was reunited with the crumpled note while I was rummaging through a pile of debris which had once been my bedroom. My life was drastically changed on January 6th, 2014. It was about 7 A.M. on a Saturday morning. I was awakened by the sound of an explosion. When my eyes opened I found myself suspended in the air and unable to move. Below me, the floor began to cave in and split, the ceiling started to crumble above me, even time itself came to a complete stop. The world around me became motionless, everything was absolutely still. Seconds later the great pull of time and gravity returned with a remarkable force, but I, no longer in a state of suspension was thrown violently onto the floor. Confused and incredibly frightened, I leapt up and raced towards the front door as the walls collapsed around me. Managing to get outside safely, I stood alongside my mother and stepfather, as they too were held closely by the grasps of shock and disorientation. The police and fire department arrived shortly after, explaining that the furnace had malfunctioned and created an explosion similar to that of a mid-grade bomb. As soon as the small fires were put out we were allowed into the house to collect anything we needed. I tried to salvage some clothing, but it all seemed to be lost within the havoc. It was during this time that I came across the note, stowed away in an unharmed desk. It wasn’t until I watched my childhood-home get demolished and thrown into a dumpster that I realized the meaning of the quote. It was further put into perspective when I looked in the basement, the room I had moved out of two weeks before the explosion. Instead of seeing a familiar bed in my old room, I saw a charred, mutilated mattress and a gaping hole in the wall close to where my head would have been resting. Because of this, I still debate whether or not there is a reason for everything. In the end, I discovered what it was like to lose every material possession I had ever owned. The experience was humbling and allowed me to embrace an introspective mindset due to the lack of distractions. I saw myself standing at the end of an unforgettable era called youth: simply a checkpoint on the wild, criss-crossing, twisting and turning road of life. Eventually I saw it as a sign that I had to move past the misfortunes, get my life together, and not feel sorry for myself anymore. At some point along that journey, I started to realize that finding happiness requires me to look within the positive and negative experiences and learn from them, rather than constantly seeking a quick fix for the sadness I encountered throughout my life. The six words I wrote on that piece of paper have since led me to travel all across the United States, seek out and explore the great opportunities that surrounded me, and work more effectively towards reaching my dreams and goals. The note itself is once again hidden away in my desk, but from time to time I still keep it in my pocket, just in case I ever need an extra bit of luck. 









 At the age of seven, I arose every morning to the comfort and love of my parents. When Christmas came around, men and women flooded the streets in their traditional Ethiopian white cotton garments with colored woven borders, striped in green, yellow, and red. At every street corner, the pounding bass of drums echoed loudly. At home, rich scents of exquisite spices and tastes awaited those who attended the festivals. Mothers rushed to bring together their superb dishes and guests gave their blessings as they cherished their meals. This world is a bright contrast to my current life today. On June 23rd of 2005, my family arrived in San Diego. Departing from our home in Ethiopia, we left everything behind in pursuit of a better life. Willing to start over, my parents envisioned a future for their sons, a future full of opportunities. It was always, and still is, entertaining to listen to the botched attempts of my teachers to pronounce my last name. Lost in a fusion of languages, I entered the English Language Learners Program where I felt the pressure of always being a step behind those around me. Outside of class each day was a new word, phrase, or food. On the other hand, a rich language from a country far away awaited my arrival at home. My native tongue was refreshing in contrast to the obscure utterance I experienced in public. Over the years, the pressures of relatives and repetitive holiday television commercials pushed my family to accept our new culture. One late November night, I found myself at a family dinner, celebrating Thanksgiving. At the table sat a plump turkey while the living room floor displayed an Ethiopian tradition of coffee roasting. As the rich, nutty smell of the coffee and the potent aroma of the heating turkey mingled, my two worlds collided in a cultural diffusion previously inconceivable to me. I accepted every moment of it, privileged to be multicultural. These holidays, however, were numbered. As my parents worked over sixteen hours a day, a family dinner wasn't a common activity in our household. One late night, I crumbled into pitied agony at the absence of my father. Money was tight and my parents scrambled to financially establish our family. Their absence resulted in my independence. Quickly, I became my own counselor. As a first generation citizen, I felt a constant pressure to search out information and place myself on an equal field amongst my peers.The sacrifice for opportunities took its toll, as the conditions of the students around me seemed superior to mine and the cultural barrier appeared, at times, too high to climb. Because my parents haven't been educated within the states and I will be the first within my family to attend college, I never have expected any academic assistance from my family. They instead provided a push to work hard and stay focused. With little resources, I simply relied on my day to day observations to excel in the classroom. My parents explained that many other immigrants before us had taken the same journey but failed. Aware of this history, I refused to fall into the same category of disappointment. Fueled by the passion to compete and crawl out of my current socio-economic status, I promised myself to stay resilient, as a responsible example to my little brother. While adapting to my new life, my loneliness was replaced by a drive for growth. Whether it is learning a new language, tasting my first burger, or celebrating a new holiday, I have come to be open to new ideas. In the complex culture of my new country, I have persevered and know that my family's sacrifice of coming to the States will not fall in vain. It's my goal to be the tangible representation of the American Dream and continue to challenge myself, and in the process, inspire others. Words entered: 648 









 Increase the pressure in my bow-arm. Bring the bow closer to the bridge to get a resonant sound. Pull the bow while keeping all my weight in my shoulder. Build up the slow pulsation to a swift vibrato. It is all of these motions and thoughts that lead to one beautiful note that can resonate throughout a whole room,. Playing the cello requires a disciplined mind, and I believe my musical history has influenced my lifetime goal of becoming an accountant. Most children have dreamt of becoming the President or a princess at least once in their life. For me, it was slightly different. I never had a definitive job that I saw myself doing, and it was not until I met an accountant in my church that I ever considered the possibility of becoming one. The accountant, Robert, told me that his job allows him to meet an assortment of people everyday but he also gets time to himself. His job requires him to work with a team, but everyone has their own duty. After pondering his words, I realized that much of what I do now in one day is similar to one day as an accountant Every day of high school, so far, I have gone to orchestra. Although an orchestra is comprised of individual players, each player has their own duty to go home and practice on their own time. For me, this only became a struggle in high school because I started to receive much more work than in middle school. Despite the workload, I still make time everyday to practice, and in order to practice I have to manage my time wisely. If I do not do my part as a cellist, I am affecting the whole orchestra. As first chair, I will only hurt my section if I come to class unprepared. And just as the cello section depends on me, I depend on them to contribute equally. Not only does orchestra allow me to interact with students of all different ages, it allows me to be a leader. While orchestra is a large part of my high school career, my coursework is my most important undertaking and it will be a priority in college. Having multiple Pre AP or AP classes in one year can be intimidating. Every class requires careful attention and dedication. For me, I allot several hours for doing schoolwork and studying. I can easily just watch TV or sleep, but my schoolwork will still taunt me afterwards. As an accountant, I will have many clients to assist everyday. Some will be more demanding than others, but that does not mean I will give diminished focus to the less demanding clients. Every person deserves my best work just as an in high school every class deserves the same effort. Also, two activities that benefit me as a student are calendars and planning. If I have a AP English test and an AP Environmental Science test on the same day, I allot significant focus to the AP Environmental Science due to it being a more time-consuming class for me. To further my focus, I start studying for the science test several days in advance. As an accountant, deadlines are an important thing. I will promise my client that I will have transactions ready by a certain time. Some transactions will be more complex so I will have to start them a few days earlier than other transactions due the same day. Students often feel pressured to know exactly what they want to do in their life. As soon as senior year starts, the badgering about college majors will start. Then when you get to college, the career questions start. Although my experience was no different, I never expected to realize my dream job in a conversation with a church friend. Accountants are entrusted with the financial aspects of a client’s life. By no means is the job easy. It can be stressful much of the time, but I believe that my high school career will lead me to success in the field. High school was a time for me to learn the art of discipline and prioritizing, and I fully plan on doing this throughout college. So although the accounting field contains many desirable aspects, to me the valuable thing is that I can provide confidence to people about their finances. To me, there is no better feeling in the world than seeing that my aid helps someone else succeed. 









In 2007 my school collected 30,000 pounds of food for local families in its 9th annual drive. Then it started floundering. As the drive had grown, extra processes were continuously piled on and, like Microsoft’s old operating system, overall organization and relative value were not reexamined. Nobody looked beyond small duties at the big picture. I’ve personally raised over 50 cans for every word in this essay. I’ve also worked to fix the drive. My sophomore year I improved ads and increased involvement, but it only helped nominally. So junior year I compiled five pages of changes I wanted to implement and gained clearance to restructure the drive. I’ve since streamlined our solicitation and collection procedures and facilitated communication among coordinators. This year improved tracking will be possible, the drop-off method clear, recruitment coordinated, and advertising unified. I found that the actual planning wasn’t difficult once I built the consensus and motivation to change. 









 Why are you drawn to the area(s) of study you indicated earlier in this application? If you are "undecided" or not sure which Brown concentrations match your interests, consider describing more generally the academic topics or modes of thought that engage you currently. (150 word limit) Cybersecurity is a fascinating intersection of two of my passions: computer science and political science. It is relevant to every aspect of society today, from the military to the medical sector. For example, simply typing a few lines of code can cause devastating denial-of-service (DOS) attacks that can shut down websites. Enigmatic and constantly changing, cybersecurity enchants me with the possibility of understanding it. I want to harness the opportunities that Brown offers to help investigate the political and economic impacts of cybersecurity. Through multidisciplinary classes like Cybersecurity and International Relations, I’ll have the chance to study Edward Snowden and the Sony hack. Outside of the classroom, I hope to join Brown’s Cyber 9/12 Student Challenge team, the only undergraduate team who has ever won the elite cybersecurity policy competition. With the experience and knowledge I gain at Brown, I hope to contribute to a stronger global understanding of cybersecurity. Why Brown? (100 word limit) Brown’s open curriculum will allow me to explore classes I wouldn’t usually take as a Computer Science concentration, such as The Economic Analysis of Political Behavior, in order to craft an experience that’s interesting and unique to me. When I asked one of my fellow summer interns about Brown, she told me that students and faculty in the Department of Computer Science are very close-knit and supportive. The prospect of joining a family of intellectual explorers is very appealing to me, since I work best in a team and I love to be challenged. Tell us where you have lived - and for how long - since you were born; whether you've always lived in the same place, or perhaps in a variety of places. (100 word limit) I was born in Berkeley, California, and my family lived in the nearby town of Walnut Creek. When I was four, we moved to Hinsdale, Illinois, a suburb just outside of Chicago, and stayed there until I was nine. Then, we moved back to the Bay Area of California into a neighborhood called Danville. Four years later, my parents divorced, and my dad moved to a town ten minutes away called San Ramon. Now, my siblings and I live at both houses, and we drive between Danville and San Ramon every one or two days. We all exist within communities or groups of various sizes, origins, and purposes; pick one and tell us why it is important to you, and how it has shaped you. (100 word limit) I am a proud member of a highly trained sisterhood of mental and physical warriors: my varsity volleyball team. My fierce loyalty to the other girls on my team stems not from the fact that we are athletically superior to other teams, but from the fact that we lean on each other's shoulders inside and outside of practice. For example, after my teammate told us her mom had breast cancer, we organized a team sleepover to give her a break from her stress. While the season may be over, I am proud to belong to a family of unconditional support. 









 "We are going to visit Rice today" My mom leaned back in her front row seat and said to me. Wait, is that a restaurant specializing in all kinds of rice dishes? Like fried rice, rice soup, and rice balls? My brain went into a frenzy. All other questions flooding my thoughts dissipated, however, when my eyes lay on Rice's beautiful Byzantine styled buildings with its magnificent archways and its soft sand-pink brick walls. While just outside its surroundings the thriving city life of Houston continues, Rice kept its sacred ground intimate with its relatively small campus and peaceful with its large spreads of greenery and shades. It's perfect! , said my right brain, falling in love at first-sight with the campus. My left brain, however, chastised the emotional side of me with Don't read a book by its cover. You can't just choose your true love like that! Exasperated by my left brain, I attended an information seminar. Phrases like "Passport to Houston", "Best Quality of Student Life", "Oshman Engineering Design Kitchen", and "more than 40 interdisciplinary centers" flashes by my eyes. Almost unlimited access to Houston's transportation and hangout spots? A research facility where I can group with students of all fields and work on solving real-world problems? Friendly research faculty who might allow me to continue my interdisciplinary research in psychology and computer science? My left brain finally gave in. Alright, alright. Let's go make Rice into not just a staple for food, but also education, then. 









My middle name is "Reddy." Weird, no? I'm assuming you don't know about South-Indian middle names so here's what you should know: "Reddy" is the name of a caste in India thought to have consisted of warriors who later became lords and aristocracy. This caste became part of the Reddy Dynasty, established by Prolaya Vema Reddi. This South-Indian kingdom ruled coastal and central Andhra for 100+ years from approximately 1325-1448 CE. I could go on and give you a full history lesson, but the point isn't that my middle name originates from a line of warriors and kings. The point is, though I admire my ancestry, I can't personally connect to my middle name: I'm not a warrior or a king. So I reinvented myself. On the first day of 10th-Grade Pre-Calculus I asked to be called by my middle name. My teacher asked and I'll never forget his look of sheer confusion when I told him my middle name. It's strange knowing most people have no idea what my middle name really means. But that was my intention. For me, "Reddy" no longer denotes a caste. It represents someone who serves on a first-aid squad, knows how to ride a motorcycle, has a quirky randomness about him, texts as if writing a research paper (without slang), and wears flips-flops in the morning but moccasins in the evening. Honestly, you can use my first or middle name, but whatever you do, just know that I'll be "Reddy." 









 America stepped in the twentieth century with great ambition. They already produced more of everything then the world combined and the people had better living standards than anywhere else. Little did they know that producing more things than the rest of the countries, gets you in a bigger hole then the rest of the countries. To add to problems of overproduction American industries laid off more and more workers, who in turn did not have the money to buy things. Farmers were not having the time of their life too, as they produced too much food then could been eaten or sold. Banks could care less for background checks and gave out loans to everyone left and right. Simpletons working on factories now owned af-ford-able cars, houses, shares in GM and lived a utopian life. This paradise needed to descend to Earth, and crash it did on October 24 th , 1929. Everyone was attempting to cash in on their shares left and right, causing them to drop in price. Thousands of companies and banks went out of business, and millions were laid off. They no longer could af-ford those lovely automobiles and radios. I could make a lot more jokes about the unemployed but none of them work…… The Great Depression had begun. Just as things hit ocean rock bottom, the Republic party realized things just took a turn for the Mariana Trench. A democratic candidate – a white knight on a shining steed - Franklin Delano Roosevelt won a staggering victory (by 17 %!) over Hoover. Franklin’s idea of support for the poor and hand outs for the jobless were highly acclaimed by most of the workers while Hoovers “a car in every garage and a chicken in every pot” rang hollow to the plebeians. Roosevelt first order of business was to revive American banking system by killing it. The Emergency Banking Act shut down all banks in the country for a few days and only re-opened the chosen ones. The next order of business was to set about fulfilling the presidential promises of relief for the poor and unemployed. The Federal Emergency Relief Act was a fancy name for the government giving out $500md in an attempt to please the homeless. To completely piss off the still working state people Roosevelt passed the Economy Act which cut their salaries. The Civilian Conservation Corps was the first alphabet agency that temporarily set off young Americans on a camping trip (which they got paid for!) around America to cut down trees and plant them somewhere else while the government looked for ways to find them real jobs. The new job openings were found in the Works Progress Administration which financed the building of roads, schools and hospitals as well as dams and bridges. To make more people work The National Recovery Administration abolished child labor, firing some 18% of the total working population! To make people have even less money an eight hour mandatory day was established. The most ambitious undertake was the Tennessee Valley Authority which built over sixteen dams in the Tennessee River. Farmers also were touched by the reforms and while the rest of the country was starving and poor the Adjustment Administration payed farmers to produce less food. In the end the 19% of people that lived off their land, being farmers, who were never hungry in the first place, became also rich; while the rest of the population was still in an ugly place (being Hoovervilles). By the end of his first term Roosevelt achieved staggering results! More than two millions (out of twelve) were employed! Seeing as this was not enough, the Social Security Act provided pensions for the widowed and maimed, who now wanted to get jobs even less. American plebeians were grateful to Roosevelt. Seeing as they could get even more hand outs, he was re-elected for three more consecutive terms. The only people that still stood tall and proud were the Supreme Court of America. They disapproved with many of Roosevelt’s “free money” methods. This angered Roosevelt so much that he threatened to replace some judges with his own (which he literally had no power to do). In the twelve years when Roosevelt was in post, and out of seven being without World War II, he accomplished marvelous heights! More than eight million people out of twelve (66%) were still unemployed! Ultimately it was the World War II and the wartime productions and job openings that ultimately got America out of The Great Depression. Not a “single other president” could have done what Roosevelt did! But perhaps if it was not for him, America would be too republican and right wing! Sometimes we all need to be a little social! 









Bare skin meets raw iron. Such a relationship can only be found in this exact situation. The focus is so intense that nothing else matters. Pure concentration and expression translating into perfect execution - it's a physical marvel. It's the art of the perfect lift. Each time I grab the stretch of metal, I feel a sense of euphoria. It's as if there is nothing in the entire universe other than me and the bar. It's as if the safety of the world relies on my ability to get this bar off the ground. Each time I grab the stretch of metal, blood rapidly pumps through my veins. The tension at the top of the movement feels like that of a rubber band, waiting to explode. As the tension is released, my muscles begin to feel the worst pain they ever have. Maintaining perfection in the lift becomes harder and harder as time progresses. Eventually, failure seems imminent. My entire nervous system is screaming for mercy. I begin to feel like I am being punished for every wrongdoing in the history of mankind. -- Only in the gym can human limits be tested so intensely. Only in the gym can every single muscle in the human body be activated. Only in the the gym can such strain be placed on the mind through the necessity to adapt to the infinite amount of variables that come with each individual repetition. Only in the gym can both the yin and yang of the homo sapien be tested so fiercely, and so equally. Weightlifting is an art form. Just as music or literature, it is a tool for self discovery and experimentation with human potential. On the surface, it seems so simple. However, as one delves further and further into it, its complexity is revealed. While executing a lift, there are thousands of things to be kept track of. In a deadlift, one must keep the back straight, chest up, triceps locked, head up, hands outside the shins - the list goes on and on. However, these things are learned through experience, I have learned new guidelines during every trip to the gym. There are always new things to be learned, whether it's learning new strategies or perfecting the old. As I have learned more and more about each particular exercise, I have developed a better understanding of how all of these minute details connect; a better understanding of how they come together to build an ideal lift. Lifting at the gym has improved my ability to not only pick up heavy things, but to perceive on an exponentially deeper level. Humans aren't physiologically designed to lift such heavy weight on a regular basis. Therefore, the mind-muscle connection I develop to make these lifts strengthens my ability to understand my own body on a deeper level. Through lifting, I've been able to activate muscles that an average person will never even recognize. This connection is magnified by the isolated nature of lifting, allowing me to achieve a sense of clarity in its purest form. The harnessing of both the body and mind is unexpected, and such activation is unmatched. This makes the outcome that much more wonderful to experience; that much more beautiful. -- Henry David Thoreau lived in the woods in order to "live deliberately". The gym is my personal forest. I have the opportunity to take human expectations, and destroy them. I'm able to focus on the most minuscule of muscles without interruption. I'm granted solitude in this world of constant distraction. Today's world and its complications seemingly don't allow such control. It's only thanks to the woods that I am permitted to experience it. 









Often, people look back on their failures and obsess over how they could have prevented their mistakes. They ask themselves, "What could I have done differently?" The answer is not worth discovering. Focusing on unforeseen outcomes hinders our ability to pick ourselves up and move forward with strong broadening steps. I, however, view these failures as fundamental life lessons that have shaped my life in a plethora of ways. As I entered into the fifth grade, I was unaware of the depleting health status that my life would encounter within that year. Soon, my wide, beaming smile would dwindle into a firm line across my face. Food became less enjoyable, and it started to scare me. All of the small, trivial aspects of being a child were not enjoyed. I stood out, but for reasons that none of my peers could understand. Anorexia Nervosa controlled my day like a clock. At 7 a.m., I would run up and down the staircase; climbing each step became laborious. Then, I would perform abdominal and strength exercises until my limbs felt like limp noodles. My usual breakfast of two waffles with syrup and peanut butter slowly diminished to filling a bowl with whole-wheat cereal and refusing to eat it. My mind started to whisper to me that I should just surrender and leave the world behind. The mirror became my greatest scoffer, telling me that I wasn't thin enough. "Just five more pounds and I'll look skinnier," I murmured in front of the mirror. Rib bones protruded from underneath my skin, but I still did not view my body as “fit” or thin enough. I was four feet and nine inches—64 pounds. I was twenty pounds less than when I had graduated from the fourth grade. I could no longer focus in a class and plucked away the fine brown hair from my eyebrows. My soft shiny hair became coarse and brittle, lacking the fullness and liveliness it once had. Simple trips to the store resulted in nearby customers questioning my mother what was wrong with me and why I looked emaciated. Within a month of my eating disorder, my parents were scared for my life and took me to Womack Army Medical Hospital to be treated for Anorexia Nervosa. “We're here to help you conquer this and live the life you deserve,” my psychologist Dr. Edenfield sincerely stated. These words echoed in my mind and were the driving force for eradicating my eating disorder. I instinctively dug down deep into my soul, for I had a purpose in this life; failure was never a viable option nor should it be my gravestone. Both Dr. Edenfield and my nutritionist worked closely together to monitor my food intake with daily journals. Each week, I walked straight to the scale, slipped off my shoes, breathed a heavy sigh, and told myself I wanted to live. I needed to gain this weight. I wanted to defeat this laughing devil that was constantly taking the life out of my crystal blue eyes. By the end of those eight months, that devil was crushed and vanquished from my life. I returned back to a healthy 88 pounds and one and a half inches taller; doctors considered this close to a miracle since I had stunted my growth dramatically. When my life was in the deepest pits of despair and failure seemed unavoidable, there still remained a thirst for life. As I kept drinking from the fountain of strength, I found success. In order to fully defeat failure, I had to discover bravery, untold courage, and faith within myself. As I reflect on my battle with Anorexia Nervosa, I realize that it never consumed my life but rather shaped me into a better person, one who was unshakable by the slightest of miseries. 









​In 7th grade, a classmate told the table that all East Asians were either really hot or really ugly. It won a few agreements, but I sat stunned. “What am I?” I demanded. His face scrunched up a little. At the time, I was 12-years-old, and I was plain. He, however, had summed up people who share my basic facial features as either the supermodels he saw in advertisements or the nameless mass of pinch-faced Chinese mobsters in movies. Eventually, he called me ugly. Between “ugly,” “hot,” and “what I said was stupid, sorry,” insulting me was the least embarrassing response for him. In 9th grade, some boys on my bus asked me if I could see well. I replied that I was slightly near-sighted, but one of them corrected me, “No, I mean how wide do your eyes open?” I opened my eyes wide. They laughed and asked, “That’s it?” In 11th grade, we learned about the violence inflicted by the Japanese during World War II. A girl in my grade joked, “I guess you have the killing blood, then.” I wondered if she ever told our German friend that she had the killing blood, too. To put things in context, my school, le Lycée Rochambeau, an 11-acre chunk of land just outside Washington, D.C., teaches the national French curriculum in its original French. Thus, most students are from countries with cultural and historical ties to France, making it a mix of students of European, Arab, and African descent, an assorted fusion of international francophonie . In 2009, when I arrived at the Lycée from my San Franciscan home situated thirty minutes away from North America's largest Chinatown, I was the only Asian American on campus. I was shocked. My classmates were shocked. Everyone was very confused at seeing me. I was an outsider even in diversity. I’ve been asked every conceivable race-related question, often with good intentions, but negative implications. For lack of exposure to Asian Americans, my classmates sometimes just don't know better. As I befriended them, I learned to correct them, pleasantly but firmly. In the end, though, their words did affect me. I grew up justifying my ethnicity. I grew up convincing people my grades weren't a product of some intellect-enhancing gene or of Tiger Mom-induced overachievement, but of a neat trick called studying like everyone else. I grew up explaining that I was in a French school because my family and I value humanities and languages, not just math and sciences. I grew up consulted as the representative of all things East Asian, even though I’m just one person, born and raised in the U.S. At first, my gut reaction to being different was to deny it. I didn’t actually tell people, “I’m not Asian,” but I did the subconscious equivalent and alienated myself from my ethnic identity. I played along with the stereotypes and told the jokes I knew kids would laugh at, about my high marks, my subpar P.E. scores, my “weird” food. I realize now how counterproductive it was, but at the time I believed I would be accepted, that I would be that “cool Asian” who wasn’t like the others, who could take a joke! Ethnicity goes beyond being a joke. Racial stereotypes box us in. We only know what we see and hear. Asian Americans are told they’re good at math and science, don’t see many Asian CEOs, hardly ever see Asian actors, never study Asian authors: a vicious cycle of monkey-doesn’t-see-monkey-doesn’t-do. Only recently have I even thought to distinguish my real passions from my socialized ones. I know now that, even if ethnicity is a meaningful part of me, how other people see it does not define me . My interest in art, languages, history, and geography is no less real than my interest in math because of the shape of my eyes or the tint of my skin. 









Six a.m. and my mom’s shaking me awake. I open my crusty eyes and stare at her, bleary-eyed. My eleven year old eyes struggle to focus, in need of glasses and lacking the money to purchase them. She’s dressed in sweats and a ratty T-shirt, and it’s obvious where she needs to be. “You’re not going to school today.” I groan and throw myself back on my bed. “I have to work. Labor Ready.” “Where’s Ted?” I ask. No answer. I still understand. He’s away. Away, with his bloodshot eyes and strange skunk smell. Away, with his hateful words and hard hands. “Get up. Josh and Jeremy are still asleep. You can go tomorrow.” I stretch and stumble downstairs, a big empty house that would be abandoned in two months. My four- and one- year old brothers are sleeping on a couch with “Dora the Explorer” blaring on the TV in front of them. I spend the day cooking, ignoring calls from tax collectors, cleaning, changing diapers, playing games as we pack up our belongings. We ignore the ash burns on the carpets, the holes punched in the walls, the pornographic magazines hidden in kitchen cupboards. After a bout of homelessness, we are holed up in a two bedroom apartment with our pregnant Mom and our loving aunt. He’s away, and only I know that it’s going to be a very long time before he comes back. The four year old, Joshua, looks at me with inquisitive eyes as I struggle to finish my homework at midnight and asks me, “When’s Dad coming back from work?” I give him a tired smile and say, “I don’t know.” Within the years that follow, I become happy and self-assured. My passions grow as I enter middle school and join the marching band, adding on to the love for clarinet I discovered in fourth grade. My sister is born, adding one more to my responsibility list when my aunt left and my mom obtained a full-time job at Motel 6. As I gaze into the eyes of the three people who mean the most to me, I marvel at how something so hateful, so disgustingly abhorrent, could create such beautiful, joyful epitomes of innocence. He comes back, and she goes back to him. He meets the little girl for the first time. They all fall in love with him. I guess that’s the gift of childhood; you forgive so easily. At 13 years old, I was no longer a child, and I hadn’t been for quite some time. Naturally, I did not forgive. Emotionally scarred and impressionable, his hateful comments stabbed me repeatedly; but now I pull them out, cast them aside, and hold my head up high. I push myself to succeed, to be better, to inspire my siblings. To show them that they can be so much more than what their idol of a man is. To show them that they can succeed and they can do so without hurting anyone. To show them that they can be strong and happy and brilliant even with someone yelling insults at them from the sidelines. But how did this experience shape me? Despite all the emotional abuse I dealt with, despite all the times I wanted to slit my wrists and end it all, despite all the times I was forced to miss school because I had to babysit or clean or both, I grew into a self-assured, responsible, caring, and intelligent woman who refused to let a junkie control her life. I learned to be the bigger person, to not swing back when provoked, to not let hateful comments destroy my self-perception. I learned to appreciate the little things, like when my mother decides to smile and not to scowl. I learned that I controlled my future, and that I must do all in my power to make it better and brighter than anything I have ever seen before, and that I can make it that way. I gained an ultimate goal; a goal to succeed. A drive to push me farther than anything ever has and ever will. A love and appreciation for my family, and a respect for the hardships of life. If I could take away one lesson from my life, it’s that yes, hardships hurt. Yes, people want perfection and ease. But where is the reward? What is the purpose of life if you just float around through clear water, never having to avoid reefs and sharks? Yes, life can be painful and heart-breaking, but you need to shark bites to actively, physically live. 









Small things make big differences. This is a truth I have come to see in my own experiences and in the world. A tech-addict since a young age, at thirteen I decided the best way to get my hands on a few smartphones was to start a YouTube channel dedicated to reviewing them. Within nine months, I received my first product for review from a then major tech company, Nokia. In reviewing products, I became a more critical person — often, an obscure weakness can massively diminish an otherwise stellar product. A smartphone could be great in every way, but if you have to contort your hand to reach the power button, the whole package could be ruined. My detailed reviews gained traction with a growing audience and [redacted 1] became quite successful. Our coverage expanded to include news, opinions and longer-form content as well. With expansion, came the challenge of managing a growing team distributed across the United States and Canada. Keeping morale high and motivating people to do their best work was a constant activity. Everyday I would stir up conversation in our ‘team chat’ and try to keep interest levels high. My efforts paid off, and our team stayed attentive and prepared — after all, news could break at any time. Running [redacted 1], I began to find my world and connect to the people who made it up: other journalists, programmers, entrepreneurs, creatives and startup founders all became part of my network. When I was in Las Vegas covering the Consumer Electronics Show, a relationship with the Creative Director of [redacted 2] (a leading tech publication) was sparked over a single tweet when he praised one of our videos — one thing led to another and I found myself completing an internship at their headquarters in NYC only a few months later. My original aspiration to use a few smartphones had led to something far greater. Small things make big differences. My time at [redacted 2] taught me about the importance of beauty in telling stories and communicating ideas. Bit by bit, I was diving deeper into the world of tech. Yet, I'd only scratched the surface and I wanted to do more than cover it as a journalist. I wanted to shape the world of technology myself, how I would do that, I wasn’t yet sure. During the second semester of my junior year, I sent a quick email to the CEO of an interesting startup in Venice, California called [redacted 3]. They had raised capital from Google Ventures, among others, and were building a mobile application that allowed you to anonymously chat with your friends. [redacted 3] offered me an internship and I accepted it. For six short weeks, I was in bliss, the world I'd come to know through the dimensions of a web browser was now all around me. I visited the offices of other startups, met their founders, heard their stories and witnessed first-hand the culture I'd previously been connected to only from afar. Seeing the team at [redacted 3] build digital products, I further grasped the significance of details; a problem might only inconvenience a user a minute a day. But, if it inconveniences a million users a minute a day, it inconveniences humanity as a collective 694 days a day! Small things really do make big differences. It started with wanting to try a few smartphones and became something much bigger. Along the way, I met people that I never would have otherwise, unearthed my passions and discovered who I am today. Reviewing products, leading a team and setting up internships in New York and California were the biggest highlights of my life — but all of this I did from my bedroom, a pretty small place. Small things make big differences. [redacted 1] : My technology YouTube Channel & publication [redacted 2] : A large technology publication [redacted 3] : A small california startup 









There has always been a disconnect between the have and the have-nots in society. Wealth and poverty has been perhaps the single biggest dividing issue since the introduction of money thousands of years ago. It was the Wu-Tang Clan that so famously said that cash ruled everything ‘around me” in their hit single “C.R.E.A.M” and that statement is just as true today as it was in 1994. Money is the equation for freedom in our society, and if we approach it this way then there are thousands of people still enslaved in America today. Wealthy people often seem like they have the world laid out at their feet, especially the ones who are born with a silver spoon in their mouths, so to speak. It often seems very unfair that some people can buy any luxury that their hearts desire while others of us struggle to put food on the table for our families and crawl from paycheck to paycheck like a desert traveler dying of thirst. This discontent is expressed in the recent “Occupy Wall Street movements” who coined the phrase “the 99 percent” to describe how most of society languishes and struggles while a select one percent enjoy unimaginable wealth. While it is true that many of these people worked very hard for their fortunes and in some cases, came up from the very poverty that they are now so far above, it is also true that both poverty and wealth are a cycle. Someone that is born into a poor family will have a harder time pulling themselves out of that situation, not least because they will be unable to access some of the things that wealthy people take for granted, such as access to the best schools and healthcare, connections to other rich and powerful people, freedom from having to worry about daily necessities in life, etc. Conversely, people born into rich families tend to stay rich themselves, whether through support from their parents or by using connections forged to generate their own wealth. Poverty is a condition afflicting about 1 in 6 Americans at some point in their lifetimes. For many people, it is not a temporary condition but rather an ongoing state of being. They must struggle for their next bite to eat or their next night of shelter and warmth, in stark contrast to those rich Americans who choose from among many houses to rest their heads and have personal chefs preparing meals to their every whim. Of course, most people fall somewhere between these two extremes. The average American may not be penniless and struggling. They may have more than one car in their garage and be able to afford recreational items, but the fact is very few people are able to satisfy the almost bottomless wanting that is characteristic of the human condition. So although it may seem that the rich have it all and are therefore happy and the poor have nothing and are therefore miserable, the fact is that anyone can be happy or miserable, depending on how much they appreciate the little or much that they do have 









Garbed in wrinkled footie pajamas, my younger self would sit in front of the television screen for hours watching the misadventures of the lovable clown Loonette and her silent yet sassy rag doll Molly in the show, “The Big Comfy Couch.” The show’s premise is that one can experience an exciting life without ever having to leave the couch—an idea that left a lasting impression on me. When faced with the possibility of failure, I am tempted to bury myself in a mountain of cushions and watch 1980’s sitcom reruns. I regress into a state in which I am untroubled and easily distracted; I return to my childhood on a big comfy couch. Although sitting in front of a television provides me with immediate satisfaction, it also serves as a reminder never to settle. Contrary to the theme song of “The Big Comfy Couch,” life is not all about clowning around. I carry my couch with me wherever I go. When faced with adversity, I find the most convenient alternative is to fall back into my couch and allow the plot of life to develop without my active involvement. “The Big Comfy Couch” taught me that sitting on the sidelines is acceptable as long as one is happy; however, it took my participation in student council to open my eyes to the destructive consequences of this “comfortable” mentality. Since 9th grade, I have served as a student council class representative. Traditionally the representatives serve as the worker-bees of the student government hive in which ideas were developed by student body officers and delivered to the representatives for implementation. This hierarchy of power was even evident in the physical division of the student council classrooms; the officers were located on the top floor of the school whereas the representatives were located on the ground floor. Class representatives were forced to sit on the student council sofa and watch reruns of “The Fabulous Lifestyles of the ASB Officers,” and I was content with my spot on the sofa. In the midst of a commercial break, however, I realized why I had joined the council; my role was not to simply make posters for the next spirit day but to express my voice on behalf of the students I represented. I found that I was excluded from the decisions of the council because I resided in classroom 119 as opposed to 324. This conflict opened my eyes to the years I had wasted being satisfied sitting on the sidelines, and I realized I could either continue to sit on the couch watching others live out their lives or I could turn off the television and change my own. I took it upon myself to eliminate the divisions between the representatives and officers. After organizing multiple meetings between the representatives as well as drafting several revised resolutions of the council’s constitution, my efforts resulted in a more evenly distributed authority within the student council body. For the first time in the school’s history, the student council classrooms now posses an equal number of representatives and officers, and the roles of representatives have been greatly expanded. Though at first fearful of leaving my place of contentment, I have gained more satisfaction by getting off of the couch than by staying glued to it. As a child, I idolized Loonette because she appeared to gain everything she wanted without ever having to leave her couch; however, not even television characters can escape the cruel hands of fate. In 2006, Loonette and Molly were diagnosed with the big “C” known as cancellation. Sitting happily on a sofa was not enough, and this is a lesson I have come to appreciate as I have matured. As I change the channel to begin a new phase of my life, I hope to never settle for the comfort of a big comfy couch. 









My experience designing websites and Internet
applications landed me a job as a Webmaster for Intel Corporation this past
summer. I had the opportunity to work for Intel’s CIO on the development of an
Intranet Video Channel to improve employee communication and productivity. My
task was to research the viability of using web video, a la YouTube, as a
medium for the company management to communicate with employees more
efficiently than the current methods of email and blogging. I presented a proposal for three possible
methods of building an internal video infrastructure. I conducted a thorough
test of each method, and presented my findings to the IT Communications
Department. The solution I recommended was the one that was eventually chosen.
Not only was it the most economical solution for Intel but it was
straightforward and utilized existing workstations and servers. The system
would use Adobe Flash Video technology combined with advanced server-side
scripting and a Cisco Content Distribution Network to ensure speedy downloads
for all of Intel's employees, local and international. The final project
documentation, which I wrote, was 21 pages including graphical aids. My
eight-week internship at Intel not only exposed me to the high-tech industry,
but it helped me to develop critical business knowledge and technical skills
which I’ve put to use in my many endeavors. 









Imagine you are 18. Imagine this is the most important day of your life. We are the best. One class. 35 people. One goal. Four years of hard work. Three days of campaign. Together. Arguments. Tears. Bad days and good days. Great ideas. Movie. Fans. Costumes. Enthusiasm. Dance. I even have learnt how to dance. Love. Pride. Our hearts beat as one. We are ready. Ready for the competition. This is the day of the competition, we performed so well, I do not have any doubts about who is going to have the most votes. We. Everyone in the school even the teachers adore our campaign. The public was shocked. At this moment, I feel it was not wasted time. If we win , everyone will remember us for a long time. We will be respected. I want it. Shock. White. Black. Lights. What? I don't understand. I must be dreaming. Silence. Time slows down. No tears. I never cry. But now where are my tears? They are supposed to be here! One hug. A friend. And she cries. Yes, my tears arrive too. As failure. Second place? No, I cannot believe. It is worse than being the last. I am crying and hugging someone at the same time, not important who is that. It is not supposed to be like this. Let's rewind the time! Not possible. After the shock I just feel blue and endless gloom. I look around and see my friends, my team disappointed and sad. This is the most awful feeling ever. How to survive? I have no idea. So we head to our classroom, where we can be alone with failure. Arriving at the second floor a miracle happens. I look around. I see lots of people. Who are they ? Loved ones, my sister, faces that I see every day. They are wearing the t-shirts we gave them. Are they here to share the failure ? No, they are clapping, and smiling! Is that happiness? No, this is appreciation. My teardrops falling down are not only sad tears anymore. There is other feelings awaking inside me. Thankfulness. Gladness. Pride. Now the crowd is singing our song . It is so touching. What does it mean? I believe, in my friends eyes we are the real winners of today. Failure? Where have you gone? It is such a pure moment. I feel peaceful. Loved. I wish it lasted forever. Now, one year later, I am recalling this all. I learnt a lot. I learnt to love my classmates. Each, one by one. I learnt that not always the winner wins the most. The harder I work, the more I win, the more I learn. In the future I will work harder for my goals. I learnt how to work in a team. Creating the campaign was great teamwork but healing from failure together by helping each other was the real teamwork. I learnt from the failure new things can be born. Relationships. I made friends with people that I did not know well before. I learnt how amazing when people respect my team. When they respect me. 20 years later I will still remember that after getting the second place, how many people said we should have got the first and how proud I was hearing it. I think that was the moment when I realized that I am actually a winner. As a year passed, now I am glad I could feel what failure was. From now on I will look at failure and victory from another perspective. This perspective is how much I can learn from them. 









Perseverant, intelligent, and a problem solver. I would use these three words to describe myself and to say why I believe Carnegie Mellon University is the school where I would find the most success. Carnegie Mellon has a rigorous academic environment and will allow me to reap the rewards of an education fostered on determination and hard work. My passion for learning and gaining knowledge has always shone throughout my life, and I hope to live and study in a place where my values are held in the highest esteem. The interdisciplinary approach of Carnegie Mellon suits me, as I would apply knowledge from political science, computer science, psychology, and economic classes to my primary focus on Decision Science. Carnegie Mellon would allow me to formulate a curriculum where I take classes that are of interest and importance to me so that I can sculpt my ideal education. I will continue my tenacious approach to learning during college and I would love to do so at a school dedicated to “academics, academics, academics.” My passions for politics and economics are both satisfied with a major in Decision Science. As a Decision Science major, I will be able to grasp the full extent of problems, and how people react differently to certain situations. By discovering why people make rational or irrational choices for legal, economic, and political decisions, I can predict outcomes and use this knowledge to the advantage of improving my community. Carnegie Mellon University’s Washington Semester Program is one of the many added benefits to studying at Carnegie Mellon. Getting the opportunity to study political policy and to intern in Washington D.C. is a once in a lifetime chance to turn my love for politics and economics into a concrete reality. Learning through experience in Washington D.C. with a prior knowledge from upper echelon classes at Carnegie Mellon will open doors not available to any other students. With the exceptional education that I receive from Carnegie Mellon I will be able to take full advantage of the interesting and diverse jobs and internships in the city of Pittsburg, Pennsylvania. Pittsburg has 8 Fortune 500 Companies and is a blossoming, booming city. There is a plethora of opportunities to find internships and success in the city and I will take full advantage of every open door in my path. I would love to have all of the choices that are given to Carnegie Mellon students to further my academic and personal pursuits. “My heart is in the work” and I will not squander any opportunities given to me. Not only does Pittsburg provide a variety of opportunities to flourish, but the campus itself is littered with student activities and clubs. My participation in Model UN during high school showed me various vantage points from countries around the world and I would love to continue discovering the interconnectedness and impacts of globalization while at Carnegie Mellon. The diversity of not just ethnicities, but of the academic makeup of the student body, attracts me to Carnegie Mellon. In a globalizing and developing world, it is imperative to know something about everything and the ability to take classes between colleges and schools at Carnegie Mellon will allow me to better accomplish this. As a future CEO, learning from different students and from different classes across campus can help me foster a better sense of global problems and how to solve them. Within diversity there is a strong sense of unity. Diversity is the catalyst for success and I will take full advantage of the cornucopia of people and ideas throughout Carnegie Mellon to create the best solutions to various problems. 









As my thoughts drifted by with snapshots of scenes of the most memorable parts of my summer, I realized more fully than ever why I love engineering: June 21st, 2014 Standing in the dim auditorium at the University of Texas in Austin, I nervously gulped as I nodded at my First Bytes computer science camp teammate. A switch was flipped, a mouse was clicked, and a dub-step version of Demi Lovato's Neon Lights began to play as the multi-colored lights on the board I held started to dance and weave patterns to the beat. When the last note and light faded away, the audience's thundering applause resonated throughout the auditorium. July 31st, 2014 "Yes!" I thought to myself, as I stared excitedly at the 'program completed!' text shown on the statistical analysis software. The graphs and data charts showing the various statistical relationships between different biomarkers and cognitive functions are strewn across the screen in victory. Exhilaration rushed through me as I looked at my months of combing through research paper and hours spent on Saturdays debugging the program come to fruition. Of course, my exposure to engineering had started far earlier than that - in fact, even before I knew what the subject was. While still toddling around, I've watched curiously as my mother drew diagram after diagram of mechanical parts as a mechanical engineer. While still in elementary school, I was already an old friend with the uniquely clean and acidic smell of the laboratory and the churning of the machines due to my father's job as a biomedical engineer. My parents' science and math aura must have affected me, as I have always been more naturally inclined towards logical puzzles and sudokus than crossword puzzles. I still loved to read, but instead of liking gushy romantic dramas like most of the girls I knew at my age, I preferred analytical mysteries. Having been exposed to engineering all my life, I had never fully realized its true beauty until personally experiencing the thrill of programming christmas lights and participating in interdisciplinary research. It is with this same undying passion for discovery and creation that I had crafted cardboard boats, programmed robots, and executed my first Gram-Schmidt. Those moments of self-fulfillment were pure happiness - yet, that intellectual thirst for discovery could not be satisfied. My mind still constantly wanders from one thought to another, seeking new answers to the problems I notice in our world. Because of the current advancements in animation and gaming, my interest in virtual reality stemmed. Because of my research in psychology and my readings, such as Columbine and The Mask of Insanity , my curiosity about psychopathy stemmed. From those two interests an idea bloomed: Why not make a therapeutic treatment for psychopaths in a virtual reality setting? To satiate my appetite for discovery and to fulfill my idea in the ideal facilities, I look to Cornell. With its world-renowned undergraduate research program in the College of Engineering, I would be able to fulfill my dream under the guidance of Professor Kavita Bak, who is well-versed in using computer graphics to model complex virtual worlds, and Professor Harry G. Segal, who focuses on psychopathology and therapeutic processes. With its unique Computer Science with Three-Course specialization feature, I would be able to pursue my interests in computer science as well as psychology. With its Diversity Programs in Engineering, famously recognized by President Obama, and its almost 1:1 gender ratio in a typically skewed engineering world, I will be able to truly fit in among one of the most diverse yet technological crowd. Last but not least, with historical alumni such as Steven Sinofsky and Marc Levoy paving the path before me and some of the most innovative and brilliant peers and faculty surrounding me and inspiring me, I know I will be able to reach further than anywhere else at Cornell. 









 Dear Jack Daniels, Bacardi, Budweiser, the other suppliers of my mother's closet laundry basket, and Edna Ferber Elementary, Thank you. It is the summer before Kindergarten. Face ashen, she stumbles toward me, the heavy footfalls syncing with my throbbing heart. I wait as she feebly attempts to push my twin brother and me into the closed door of my room, moaning incoherently about us needing sleep despite it being only four in the afternoon. My hands extend toward her, the body weaving towards my caved shoulders, and I push on her weak, useless arms, feeling the putrid alcoholic sweat that idles upon her. I release and, though my stomach protests, watch. Moments of indecision pass, her body and clouded mind arguing with gravity. Drop. She lands headfirst, knocking out one of the struts from the second-floor balcony. Despite her size, my mom's body lies limp, almost stationary on the floor, all because of my own dreadful power. Events like these are among my most poignant memories: images of my ghost-like mother, her trips to the alcohol-laden Piggly Wiggly, and her calls from the emergency room and prison. During these episodes, I blindly, frantically served the disease. I cooked and cleaned while my father was away on business trips, but I lived a robot, devoid of a true understanding of my meaning and purpose. She might have been the alcoholic, but the disease belonged to both of us. By the time I was enrolled in Edna Ferber Elementary's kindergarten class, this life had become intrinsic to my identity. Even upon the first day of school, the fear associated with leaving my mom alone created a rift between my classmates and me. While they fretted over cooties, I worried about what awaited me at home, or if anyone would come to retrieve me at all. Though I knew greater problems existed, I felt helpless. To cope, then, I ensconced myself in books, hiding my differences behind knowledge and Nancy Drew in additional fear that my peers' discovery of my mom would distort their perception of me. These novels became my obsession, and, after exhausting Miss Sell's expertise and her "endless" supply of books within the first three weeks of Kindergarten, I was allowed on lone treks to the library, granted time to peruse the aisles generally reserved for the "older kids" in a Matilda-like fashion. From twelve to three-thirty, I fell in love with discovery, uncovering global tumults and the ones trying to correct them. Many of the visionaries I had deemed perfect, I found, had also originated from imperfect childhoods. Amidst the pages of textbooks and math problems, I then discovered purpose and an outlet-a means to display my own personality until I grew confident enough to venture beyond my academics. School became a talent and passion of mine, one that the disease could not withhold from me. For one of the first times in my life, I was more than my memories. Today, I am proud to be the daughter of an alcoholic. Through the disease, I discovered aspects of myself and my passions, even my adoration for knowledge and service. After the spring of last year, I no longer live with my mother; I know now that I cannot be the one to stand between her and her alcoholism. Instead, I use my time to contribute as a leader, from captaining a team of cross country runners and skiers to guiding my forty minion-like campers every summer at Camp Ajawah to building block towers with Amani and Anubis during Tuesday childcare at Solid Ground Homeless Shelter. As I prepare to move across the nation next year, I await the opportunity to impact world relations, law, and the disease within both through my education. Yes, without my mom, I would not be the person that I am today. Perhaps, she deserves the greatest measure of gratitude of all. 









 What three areas of study listed below interest you most? Computer Science, Economics, Italian Why do these areas appeal to you? I see computer science as a refined way of thinking that allows me to find solutions to all types of queries. To me, economics is finding patterns in the ways that people make choices. I want to study both computer science and economics to develop a solid understanding of decision-making, which will prepare me for whatever job I take after graduation. I also hope to develop new technologies that make the world a better place through entrepreneurship and research. Separately, learning languages has always been an exciting challenge, and I think Italian is the most beautiful language of all. Why does Yale appeal to you? I love the supportive and stimulating atmosphere of Yale. The residential college system will allow me to easily become friends with people outside of my classes and build a solid academic support system that includes my freshman counselor. The two-week “shopping period” for classes would allow me to explore classes I wouldn’t usually take as a Computer Science major, such as Game Theory and Constitutional Law. Additionally, as a senior at Yale, I would have the chance to do original scientific research for my senior project, which will give me the chance to explore my independent interests. 









My house has never been quiet, and I do not think it ever will be. Living with six siblings is not the definition of tranquility. My parents’ affinity to invite perfect strangers into our home only adds to the chaos. However, I have learned more from this revolving door than I could have ever been taught in isolated silence. Living with close to fourteen people in the house at any one time is loud, yet below the noise there is a whisper that teaches the benefits of altruism. My siblings taught me the importance of accepting people for their uniqueness through countless hours of listening to Devin's syncopated drumming, judging Elise's pirouettes, and being the subject of Lauren's experiments. I learned to go beyond mere acceptance; I evolved into a person who sees differences as opportunities to expand myself. Rather than shutting out the pounding, dancing, and experimenting, I decided to learn from it. I started playing instruments with Devin to learn a new "language." I went to Elise's recitals to uncover the value of dance expression. And I collaborated in, rather than subjected myself to, Lauren’s experiments to discover foundations of life, even if someone else had discovered them long before us. The people who entered my home and lived alongside my large family taught be about my community’s diversity. Though doing this, they inspired me to pursue a multifaceted education despite my scientific emphasis. John, a Tongan taro farmer, was one of the first individuals that stayed with my family. As a young girl, he opened my eyes to a vastly different culture and encouraged me to respect people of all backgrounds. As I grew older, I met Meghan who represented the lasting effects of crystal meth on the body. Watching her struggle to correct her previous actions encouraged me to spread drug abuse awareness. Rob still serves as an exemplar of the negative effects of stereotyping people with mental illness, and propels me to stand up for equality. Nicole, Rachel, Anthony, and Nicholas serve as daily reminders of the difficulty of poverty. My parents have never ceased to surprise me with the people they take in. Although the loss of a bathroom, a television, or the ability to not wear pants may seem antagonizing, the lessons I have learned from each person that has passed through our home have taught me that a home is not created by the space itself, but rather its utilization. Francis Bacon once wrote, “Silence is the sleep that nourishes wisdom.” Although well acquainted with his method in the Chemistry lab, in my experience this proverb has not proven true. The cacophony of my home life has made me a dynamic learner. I am eager to find the lesson in every experience and interaction. Each unique person that has come into my home has expanded my understanding and fed my aspirations to become an informed, intricate and animate member of society. Their lives, including their wisdom and their downfalls that brought them into my life, inspire me to keep an open mind and learn from various perspectives despite any one particular subject I may major within. I dream of being admitted to a school that encourages holistic learning spurring me onward in my investigations as a student in all subjects. I want to grow as a student inside and outside of the classroom. Leaving for college may be daunting, but one of the best parts is the anticipation of seeing who might next occupy my room. 









At a college visit this year, I met a Columbia alumnus named Ayushi, whose stories helped me develop a thorough understanding of Columbia. Ayushi told me that Columbia funded both her summer trip to Syria to interview refugees and her seed money for a start-up she launched. As an aspiring entrepreneur, I’m impressed by a university that encourages students to pursue their own independent creations instead of simply offering the option to work on faculty projects. Columbia’s four entrepreneurship organizations, among them the Columbia Organization of Rising Entrepreneurs, provide a dynamic start-up community for me to launch my own business. In addition, when I explored Columbia online, the emphasis put on interdisciplinary studies particularly excited me. The Columbia Engineering website is rich with stories of engineering students who are also involved in Shakespeare troupes, service projects, and multicultural groups. In my opinion, diverse experiences are the foundation of creative thinking. At Columbia, I will continue to diversify my experiences by not just joining the Parliamentary Debate Team, but also by making new friends on the intramural soccer field and starting a cultural club for Italian heritage students who wish to learn more about Italian history, language, food, and current events. Columbia Engineering stands uniquely apart from other programs by incorporating several in-depth humanities and writing classes into the graduation requirements. I believe that looking at critical issues with an open mind and sophisticated grasp of the humanities is extremely important to being an engineer. For example, I could not imagine exploring the future of quantum cryptography without considering the political ripple effects of Edward Snowden, the moral ramifications of the quantum encryption revolution, and the relationship between technology and income inequality. I am confident that I will thrive in the Columbia culture of passionate engagement and vibrant, energetic conversation. 









 I never seem to make it all the way. I’m a half-sister, half-Jewish, half-Christian, half-Canadian. I have one parent not two. I sleep with one leg under the covers and one leg out. I’m blonde in the summer but brunette in the winter. Even the stars don’t align; Teen Vogue declares I’m a Pisces while Seventeen swears it’s Aquarius. More importantly, I have a sort-of, kind-of, twin brother named Alex. It all started in the freezer. While my brother and two other nameless embryos were, as Alex sees it, “selectively” chosen to make their grand debut in the spring of 1990, I was left behind—frozen in time. Alex emerged exactly nine months later, forceful and headstrong. I, however, was forced to bear an unforgiving two-year winter in the depths of New York Presbyterian (a possible explanation for my fear of freezer-burn). It was nearly three years later that I finally received orders to defrost. And just as I was beginning to warm up, I entered the world on an exceptionally frigid February morning…and cried about it. My brother and I have never thought twice about the technicality of being twins. It has always been, for us, a matter of fact. Growing up, our mom was completely open about it, rarely missing the opportunity to point across East 68th street to remind us, “And that’s where you were frozen” before pointing out where we were having lunch. For me, this level of comfort is why I have never seen myself as “half” of anything at all. My half-siblings, Lorin, Edward, and Josh may rival a few of my friends’ parents in age (or taste in music), but they were never less a brother or a sister for it. When my classmates were boasting about the latest Pokémon card they had bought, I was boasting about my latest niece or nephew who had been born. Because no one in my life ever defined “normal,” I was given the extraordinary opportunity to define it for myself. Normal is going to Seder for Passover and Church for Easter. It is spinning dreidels and singing carols. It is being called “Aunt Grace” before even knowing how to spell those words. It is losing a father but finding a hero in your mother. While many students experience standardized tests as stressful, I tend to start sweating well before section one. As the proctor politely asks us to “check the box which is most applicable to yourself,” I start wishing I had some sort of chart or diagram to guide me through my religious background. Instead of mentally reviewing vocabulary like “concomitant” and “vituperate,” I find myself trying to rationalize how many siblings to write down. But I would never choose to have any fewer halves than I do. One might be surprised at how many topics of conversation you can extract from Edward’s passion for squash or Lorin’s latest photography adventure. Just last week I was able to survive an entire dinner party talking solely about the charter school Josh established up in Harlem. I sit comfortably at a Christmas Eve feast with ham and potatoes or at a Shabbat dinner with challah and gefilte fish. With every new thing that I try or place that I go, I relish it as yet another “box to check” or “half” to add to myself. I know quality is usually weighted much heavier than quantity. I have been exposed to “a little bit of this and a little bit of that” but have not yet had the chance to truly explore and develop each side of myself. But at this point in my life, I’d like to think time is in my favor. Right now, I choose to say “Shabbat shalom” and “May peace be with you.” I choose to read two horoscopes in every magazine and let my hair lighten with the seasons. And I choose to call Alex my twin, regardless of the fact that he’s three years older than me. Perhaps most importantly, being comprised of many different pieces doesn’t leave me feeling incomplete. It has made my life richer, less predictable, more interesting. Maybe the whole really can be greater than the sum of its parts. 









 Please briefly elaborate on one of your extracurricular activities or work experiences that was particularly meaningful to you. (About 150 words) For the last three years, I have savored the intellectual stimulation and pressure-filled competition of Public Forum debate, but I have also grown tired of my favorite activity being dominated by boys. This year, as debate captain, I strengthened my high school team into a female-majority powerhouse ten times as large as last year. Easily spending more than 12 hours a week preparing for meetings and practices, I implemented a system of accountability by checking my teammates' cases for completion in a shared online folder and holding them responsible for organizing their own practice debates before competition. I also trained them in attitude, instructing the quieter girls to speak with confidence because they are more brilliant than they realize. Slowly, I watched my smattering of nervous freshman transform into an army of fearless champions who hugged me with pride every time they took home a top trophy. Please tell us how you have spent the last two summers (or vacations between school years), including any jobs you have held. (About 150 words) I pursued my enthusiasm for cryptography in two ways: traditionally, by taking advanced hacking classes at a national laboratory, and untraditionally, by learning to design ambigrams. In between, I wrote high school computer science curriculum for the government, read Tolstoy for the first time, and debated constitutional law on national television. I saw U2 perform the best rock concert of my life in Chicago, tutored middle school kids in geometry, and used a GoPro camera to make a music video of my family taking surf lessons. I spoke only Spanish for 5 weeks while traveling abroad, volunteered to test an ancient myth by locking myself in a castle morgue, and cheered hysterically for Team USA during the FIFA World Cup. I survived pre-season training with my varsity volleyball team and sat wide-eyed next to a Ukrainian engineer on a two-hour plane ride as he told me his life story and helped me reflect on the difference between majors and professions. 









 There is an old saying, “there is no place like home.” That philosophy has been spread everywhere from generation to generation, lands to lands, and families far and wide. Even in the popular old Hollywood smash hit, The Wizard of Oz , that of all the exotic places you may roam, and all the beautiful scenery that captures your sight, the only thing everyday that crosses your mind is the will to trudge on and return to where your heart resides. This phenomena that resides with so many of us unconsciously is the grave illness of being homesick. But what is the alleviation of this powerful yearning that has infected so many of us? As I commemorate the past occurrences of my past self, the word homesickness has taken on a new meaning now more than ever. I was born in a different country called Nigeria, over 7,000 miles away, in the Northwestern region of Africa. It was a beautiful place, with long flowing rivers like the Niger River that intersects almost three countries in the region. It also grazed rich, fertile, brown humus soil that made farming life easier. It grew beautiful trees from the ones that stood tall with pride, like palm trees, coconut trees cashew trees, to the petite and modest saplings including willow, Langley, empress and chestnut trees. It resembled one of those mystic lands that people assumes is a myth, like Atlantis . But with all the grace and elegance my country shared, I being a blossoming, yet crude toddler with a mouth as sharp as knives, only perceived the negatives of my blissful hometown. From the crowded, bustling streets filled with pollutants and exhausts in the air. To the busy market days clogged the air with the wretched scent of dead animals. Then even, the unkempt roads, and crumbling villages made of clay and sand, that in the ancient times would have been royalty, but is now considered poverty. I was repulsed that this trembling land was where I referred to as home. My biggest fear was to end up living my whole life there, as a slum. That is why when We got the news that We were going to the new “promised land of the world,” known as the United States of America, I was overjoyed beyond belief. Everything from the more prestige schools, soaring buildings, advanced technology, state of the art electronics, current fashion, modernistic approach and the promise of a better future to every aspect of my life fascinated and resonated with me through all my years living there. And after 7 years of experiencing the “American dream”, I must say it did meet, even exceed my expectations. I am grateful for all the amazing opportunities I have received after living here. But, there has always been a hole in my soul, a longing for more, and a serene emptiness that can only be filled by one place. The only place that you can begin your life long business dreams without needing approval from anyone, where you can graduate high school at 15, because school starts 3 years earlier, where you can leave your door open and smile to your neighbours without fear of wrong doing. That was the place where I belong. But alas, I am too young and cannot repair that hole until about six more years. I will carry this feeling and a new sense of being more appreciative of all the positives and the negatives in life. So as we spend various precious hours fearing the inevitable, the nostalgia for the familiar, the urge for the past, or even the longing for something that never was. It would be wise to use that time adorning our friends, cherishing our families, and living our lives. For, everything that glitters is not gold. 









Daydreams are often regarded as a distraction and a sign of laziness. However, I believe in the creative power of daydreams, which allows me to escape from reality. Daydreaming allows me to look within my mind, which I need as an introvert. It's essential for introverts to recharge themselves after socializing with people. Recently, my dad brought me a Time magazine featuring a small boy holding a megaphone at the corner of a white room. As I read the article, “The Upside of Being an Introvert,” by Bryan Walsh, I noticed that his description of an introvert mirrored my everyday life. Socially, I prefer to interact with a few close friends than to interact with a large group of acquaintances. After socializing with people, I find a quiet place and run an intricate inner monologue. Like the small boy on the cover, I prefer to voice out my opinions without having to draw attention to myself. By reading this article, I discovered that I was not just shy, but an introvert, which empowered me to embrace my quiet temperament. I was fascinated, so I watched a TED Talk featuring Susan Cain, the author of Quiet: The Power of Introverts in a World that Can’t Stop Talking . In this book, she advocates the benefits of being an introvert in a society like America, where much emphasis is put on extroversion. She speaks about her personal experiences as an introvert and the misconceptions introverts deal with. For example, introverts are often labeled as antisocial and are repeatedly told by their peers to come out of their shell. In reality, introverts are crucial for social gatherings, as they listen before they speak and think through their actions. Without introverts, no one would not take the time to listen to other people and thus there would be no conversation. After watching Susan Cain's talk, I came across another video describing some of the introverted personality types. Rather than reading the text, my attention was caught by a song, by Kate Nash, playing in the background. “People used to say she’s as quiet as a mouse. She just doesn’t make a peep.” These lyrics sounded like me, because I tend to not talk at all when I am around people I do not know well. After hearing the song, I drifted off into a daydream and slipped into the persona of Mariella, named after the protagonist of the song. She wears black from head to toe and no makeup. She despises the color pink and pearls because she finds them too feminine and girly. Some people find her strange because she does not like to interact in groups. She does not like to go to social events, preferring to stay at home in her bedroom alone. People find her unusual and tell her to talk to people more, which annoys her immensely because she is perfectly content with holding conversations and creating stories in her head. She has the habit of writing every single thought in her “brown book,” which is actually her diary. She writes about her daily life and her thoughts, dreams, observations, and plans. Mariella feels more comfortable writing her thoughts down than saying them out loud because she does not like to speak at all. Daydreaming is an essential part for my imagination. By detaching myself from the physical world, I look through the eyes of another person. I prefer to explore new, unrealistic ideas and understand how other people view the world than to just face the harsh realities of life nonstop. It's fine to have the occasional daydream as a way to relax from powering through my tasks and responsibilities. 









The most important research project I have worked on is the massively parallel propagation-delay algorithm and FPGA (field-programmable gate array) microchip I independently designed for the Intel science Talent search. The chip was demonstrated to solve certain computationally difficult problems - graph theoretic shortest path problems - an order of magnitude more quickly than traditional computers, and the novel theoretical approach was shown to be generalizable to other, even more difficult problems such as the zubset sum problem. These innovations have applications in fields from network routing to cryptography to missile interception to computational biology. My research abstract is below. "This paper describes: the development, optimization, simulation, and practical FPGA (Xilinx Spartan-3E X3S500E) implementation of a new parallel algorithm for the NSSP (single source shortest path problem with nonnegative edge weights). Its run time has an upper bound of O(min(n, ?)), and it uses hardware resources on the order of O(m), the theoretical optimum. It was applied to standard benchmark problem instances and its performance was compared to that of the fastest general case implementation of Dijkstra's algorithm -- O(m + n log n). For practical instances of the problem, the propagation delay algorithm required on the order of 200-300 times fewer clock cycles. The hardware implementation achieved is fully scalable, and the paper proposes a second-generation chip architecture which, when implemented, will make the device efficiently problem-reconfigurable in real-time. The relatively low cost of the chip combined with its power and flexibility make it broadly applicable in a wide variety of laboratory and field situations. Moreover, the underlying algorithm is the product of a new parallel computing paradigm, which will be termed "accelerated propagation delay" because it is based on controlling and recording the relative speed of signals propagating in parallel through a network. This paradigm is generalizable to solve other problems that are even more computationally intensive than pathfinding, including the NF-complete subset sum and Hamiltonian path problems. An accelerated design to solve the first of these problems was developed as part of this project and is proposed briefly in the discussion." 









Greetings future roommate! I look forward to sharing a room and a brand new experience altogether as college freshmen! If there is one thing that you should know about me, it is that although my personality is splotched with hundreds of shades, akin to a Jackson Pollock painting, you can most certainly count on my character, which boils down to a couple traits: calm and content. I would like to compare my personality to the ocean – it has its ebb and flow, its crests and trenches, but one can always expect it to return to its natural gentle state. The ocean has remained relevant to life for millions of years. Just like the ocean spans across eras, my interests capture that same duality, being split between vintage and modern. So don’t be intimidated to ask me to go see the new Star Wars movie when I’m still toting around my Nintendo 64 and PlayStation 2. The ocean also has its stagnant parts, like the Dead Sea. Parts of my character can be immobile, such as my surprisingly unvaried palate. Don’t bat an eye when I enjoy pizza for an entire lunar cycle! The ocean also nurtures indiscriminately. I can relate because of my sense of duty to help others, so don’t ever be afraid to ask for advice or reassurance. I’m always happy to assist! Overall, just how the ocean always flows in a gentle manner, you can always count on me to remain loyal and retain a level head and attitude. 









"Yes!" I stared excitedly at the "program completed" text shown on the Statistical Analysis Software. Graphs and data charts showing various statistical relationships between different biomarkers and cognitive functions are strewn across the screen in victory. Exhilaration rushed through me as I looked at my months of combing through research paper and hours spent on Saturdays debugging the program come to fruition. It is with this same undying passion for discovery and creation that I had crafted cardboard boats, programmed robots, and executed my first Gram-Schmidt problem. That moment of self-fulfillment was genuine happiness - yet, that intellectual thirst for discovery is unsatiated. To further nurture my passion in science and engineering, I look to Rice. With a whirlpool of innovative ideas from many top thinkers in the world for inspiration and the multi-purpose Oshman Engineering Design Kitchen for resources, George R. Brown School of Engineering is a dream come true. 









My grandmother was born and raised in Nigeria. Eunice Iwuchukwu was an old soul, who used to preach the word of God. My grandma had lived with my aunt, but moved in with my mom to assist with my care. Since I rarely saw my mother, or my father, or really any of my family, I had no one to teach me the art of verbal speech. My grandma did not know a lick of English, but it was only she that I heard. She’d come to my carriage every morning, and hover over my carriage; draw the cross of Christ on my forehead, and say, “Chineke ga-agọzi gị ruo mgbe ebighị ebi”: God will forever bless you. By the age of two I had the ability to speak and write Igbo. Unfortunately, I started kindergarten and my grandma moved away, which resulted in me losing my first language. Having the ability to speak and communicate with my grandma was heart-warming. It was like we had our own inside joke that the rest of my siblings wanted to be part of. After losing that, I always had a passion to learn other languages, just so I could be able to connect with people. To me, language has never been some form of speech that we needed learn. Instead, I saw language as an art form that connected people throughout the world. Since losing my first language, I now understand French and Spanish, while being able to speak Igbo and English. 









I sauntered under the rotting wooden arch, careful not to hit the throng of dwarf-like minions that ran and clung to my side. "SEPHORA, Natasha said she would show me her booger but it was just mud and water and I just don't think that's fair and she's being really mean and I need help." "SEPHORA, Taytym said that she didn't like my dress." "SEPHORA, Vindya pushed me and whipped me with her towel." After my daily run, Camp Ajawah's youngest members always greeted me with their usual, sometimes ludicrous dilemmas. It often surprised me how easily they had accepted my new name, my new identity as their counselor. Just two years ago, I had been among their ranks, sleeping in their military-esque tents and allowing myself to be shaped by my then-counselors' seemingly infinite wisdom. At that time, they called me "Audrey" or "Hepburn" for my namesake. Now, the titles had seemingly slipped from their vocabularies. Very rarely are we given a chance to rename ourselves, to redefine personas. I spent two years trying to choose my counselor name and sifted through thousands of possibilities. I wanted a name that would exude my identity, something that conveyed meaning beyond a couple of letters and syllables. I sometimes wanted to be Coda for my love of music or Rajah for my passion for all things Disney. Still, I struggled to find a name that would account for all of my complexities and desires, for all that I wanted new campers and peers to perceive about me. Walking around the Mall of America on the typical twenty-degrees-below-zero Minnesota day, I stumbled upon my chosen name unexpectedly. Yet, like a line in an archetypal karate movie, it was destiny. "Sephora" was superficial, overused, and nothing like what I had imagined. However, it was perfect. After deeper study, I realized Sephora was not merely the brand name of a Parisian make-up franchise. It was the name of Moses' wife, a woman who abandoned social regulations to follow her religion and passions. In Hebrew, it even signified "bird", someone who travels and overcomes. While it did not convey everything, it displayed pieces of my character and became me. After living as Sephora for two summers, I now know that it is not the name that shapes us, but we who shape the name. "Sephora" was not perfect, but it was mystical and strong and reminded me of where I was and my roots. In my mind, I came to associate it with my religion and experiences. My peers, on the other hand, simply came to associate it with the girl dressed in a cow suit, laughing and enjoying the numbered days at her home. That, too, was okay with me. 









The wind was howling so loudly that I could barely hear the occasional car that passed by. It was raining very heavily. Muddy water clung to my pants as I made each step. "I have to go on!" I said to myself. As I reached school at 8.05am, I noticed that the hall was almost empty. Only four of us were present.The rain was petering out and the sky brightening, but I felt a shadow enveloping me. By 8.30am, two more members had arrived but we were still missing 29 members. My head started to ache and I could almost feel rage and frustration churning in my stomach. It had been my four-year dream to form and lead the school choral speaking team. However, now that I had formed a team, it did not seem as if I was doing a good job of leading them. "What kind of leader is unable to get even a third of his team to attend a practice session?" I thought to myself. I had failed as a leader. By 8.35am, I could take no more. I told the others that they could go home and left without another word. On my way home, I could think of nothing but of how I had failed to gather my team for the session. At first, I blamed my teammates for choosing to ignore our practice schedule. By the time I reached home, I was blaming myself and considering resigning from my position as team leader and conductor. However, luck was on my side because, just as I was about to get myself a glass of water, I noticed a bookmark sticking out of a book on the dining table. "Superior form of leadership: to inspire and not to force," it said. Reading this quote made me realise something: I had forced my teammates to come for practice. Although I may have not done it in the literal sense, I had not given them a reason to come to practice. All I had done was to arrange an official practice session. In short, I did not inspire them. I was never exceptional at speeches. So, I knew that to inspire my teammates; I had to gain their trust. The next day was a school day. I seized this opportunity and made an announcement requesting all my teammates to gather at the canteen during recess. It was to their surprise that I did not plan on actually practising choral speaking. Instead, I said, "Let's have lunch together!" While everyone was eating, I did my best to make friends with as many members as possible. I made this a routine for the next five days. Towards the end of the fourth day, I could see that the team had begun to bond. On the fifth day, I decided that we should practise. I was frankly surprised to see that most of the members had really strong voices. At the end of the half-hour practice, I thought that it was about time I addressed the whole team. While I have forgotten most of what I said that day, I vividly remember the last sentence: "Give me your commitment and in return I promise that I will lead us to be one of the top three teams in the district!" I also informed them that we would be having another practice session the coming Saturday. On Saturday, I was pleasantly surprised to see that not only was the entire team present but everyone was also very enthusiastic. Looking back, I am actually thankful that my teammates did not turn up for practice on the 6th of July 2012. It was that failure that taught me what it truly meant to be a leader. Since then, I have always held to the principle that a leader should not force rather inspire. Oh, and did I mention that we got into the top 3? 









What matters. It's one of those riddles a kindergartner knows they can sincerely answer and adults think they can logically answer. I, however, am a teenager, stuck awkwardly between that simplicity and heightened logic, and my dilemma is evident: is it my actions or feelings that really matter? Is it what I do for others or what others do for me that matters? The question has been a dim lantern down a path of reflection on my past twelve years of high school and eighteen years of life, traversed in order to find what has, does, and will matter to me. As I trekked through the depths of my heart, mind, and adolescence, I found a common thread that united the three fundamental pieces of my life: my family, my country, and my faith. The string that sewed them all together was a unique crafting of my mind through experience: more simply stated, my education. Socrates defined education as "the kindling of a flame, not the filling of a vessel." I agree. My flame is what matters to me. My flame blazes with the tinder piled on by others: my brother's burning passion for music is an inspiration for me in pursuing my dreams with confidence; while my calves and quads physically burn, my cross country coach lights the candles of discipline and determination that structure me mentally; my grandmother's lesson of undying faith as an orphan in Chicago burns in my heart and teaches me the importance of taking advantage of opportunities; and the patriotism, innovation, and diversity of my country ignite my sense of duty in all that I do. The flame is tall enough now to reach the why; selfishly this flame matters because I matter, and I matter because I will matter. What I can teach--through instruction and continued exploration--will change someone's world. It matters to me because it will matter to someone else. It matters to you because the single greatest lesson that my collective experiences have taught me is that no action or word goes without impact. 









 Activity type: Community Service (Volunteer) Position/Leadership description and organization name, if applicable: Key Club: Club President; Kiwanis Coordinator (1) Details, honors won, and accomplishments: High school community service organization which I helped coordinate as Club President. Earned the Gold Member Award as well as 300+ service hours. Activity type: Work (Paid) Position/Leadership description and organization name, if applicable: Kumon Learning Center: Grader/Assistant (2) Details, honors won, and accomplishments: Assisted in the grading of math and reading papers, as well as tutoring for higher level math students of the Kumon Program. Activity type: Science/Math Position/Leadership description and organization name, if applicable: Physics Club: Secretary (6) Details, honors won, and accomplishments: Input data sheets and maintained minutes for the Physics Club, especially in regards to fundraisers and experimental activities. Activity type: Academic Position/Leadership description and organization name, if applicable: AP Club Details, honors won, and accomplishments: Attended club meetings to gain information on college and high school advancement programs, as well as the end-of-the-year college trip. (9) Activity type: Work (Paid) Position/Leadership description and organization name, if applicable: Precalculus Tutor (5) Details, honors won, and accomplishments: Pro vided paid tu tor ing for a high school se nior en rolled in a high school Pre cal cu lus course. Activity type: Community Service (Volunteer) Position/Leadership description and organization name, if applicable: Scott Peters' Midterm Campaign (8) Details, honors won, and accomplishments: Helped inform registered voters with the intentions to advertise the reelection of Congressman Scott Peters to the 52nd Congressional District. Serrandipity: Senior Editor Pro vided final edits for the school news pa per and its con trib u tors while still re tain ing the re spon si bil i ties as a Staff Writer for the school paper. (3) Serrandipity: Staff Writer (4) Con tributed to the school news pa per through writ ing one to three ar ti cles per month, along with con duct ing stu dent in ter views to re port stu dent opin ions. Jus' Sayin (7) Helped form lunch bags for San Diego's home less pop u la tion, then helped dis trib ute these bags and do nated clothes to this par tic u lar de mo graphic. High School Math Tutoring (?) Participated in lunchtime and afterschool tutoring for students in precalculus, calculus, and physics. Awarded Golden Student Award for contributions. APIASF Scholarship Work Descriptions (Dropped scholarship) PreCalculus Tutor Mar 2014 - Jun 2014 Position: Precalculus/ELM Math Tutor Average hours per week: 2 During my junior year, I worked with a senior as a tutor for three different math classes and tests. The first, and most important, reason I worked with the student was to help him understand and work through his online credit recovery course in first semester Precalculus. As I worked with him in the online course, I took the methods I gained from Kumon and my enthusiastic love for the subject to provide him a greater understanding for his course, and he earned the credit he needed towards graduation. I also assisted him in trigonometry for second semester precalculus, which he was enrolled in at the time, as well as assisted him in mathematics practice for the ELM. The ELM is the CSU placement test for mathematics which includes algebra and geometry questions. I furthered his understanding of the ELM, and he later passed the test as he entered SDSU. Kumon Learning Center Mar 2014 - Nov 2014 Position: Grader/Teaching Assistant Average hours per week: 8 As a Kumon assistant, I provided students with help in their reading and mathematics Kumon work. I initially learned how to grade papers of the programs and served as a grader for the facility's classwork from students, but I later became a teaching assistant. Most of the help I provided as an assistant was for students in high school math topics such as trigonometry, algebra, and calculus. As teaching assistant, I became engaged in working with the students one-on-one to ensure they understood their independent studies, and also worked in creating their curriculum and topic plans. This involved a careful scheduling of their coursework and analysis of their curriculum progress. Through the work program, I discovered methods of teaching that created my stronger career interest in education and research such as teaching through graphical analysis or diagrams. This job occurred off school hours during summer and the school year. 









 While grabbing lunch between games at a water polo tournament, I noticed one of my new teammates rarely looked me in the eye. Instead of taking the empty seat next to me, he opted to sit across the table. Even when I tried to start a conversation with him, he only looked down, and mumbled, “Oh, hey,” and walked away. This type of cold-shoulder treatment wasn’t new to me. I’m a big guy. In bare feet, I’m about 6 feet 7 inches tall, and I’m pushing 300 pounds. Yes, it can be a pain. I bump my head going through doorways, I don’t fit in most mid-size cars, and I can barely squeeze into most classroom desks. But I understand that the world is made for average-sized people, and I like to think I’m above average. One thing, however, is hard for me to take: People who don’t know me assume I’m mean. Like my frosty water polo teammate. I understand why he was intimidated by me, especially since he was one of the smaller players. I would have felt the same way. When I meet people for the first time, I often draw conclusions or make assumptions. Almost all my life, I’ve had to deal with the expectations and judgments people make about me just because I’m often the largest kid in the room. Ever since I was a kid there has been pressure for me to perform athletically because of my size and strength. When I went to grocery store, random people consistently asked me if I played football. When I told them, “No,” the men always lectured me not only about why I should play football, but what I should be doing with my life, with my body, and with my potential. I normally just nodded and smiled, but it bothered me that they thought they knew what was best for me. Not only did I never play football, but I defied many of the assumptions people made about me. How many people my size love nothing more than mixing up a chocolate batter, and decorating a three-layer cake? Beside my passion for baking, I also love working with little kids. For the last two summers, I volunteered at a camp where I taught kids how to surf. My nickname was Teddy Bear. And if I wanted to make my friends fall on the ground laughing, I reminded them of my dream to learn to play the violin. In general, I ignore what people say to me or think about me when it comes to my size. Instead of reacting, I usually just give them a smile. On many levels, there are advantages to towering over most of the world. I always get the front seat since I don’t fit in the back. No one even dares call “shotgun.” I usually have the best seat in the house, whether it’s a rock concert or a ball game, no matter where I sit. And if people are getting rowdy and making my friends uncomfortable, all I need to do is step in the middle and simply ask, “What’s going on?” and they disperse. Even the people who are intimidated at first by me eventually come around once they get to know me. Like the water polo player at the restaurant. Within about two weeks, we finally had a conversation and ended up finding we had a lot in common. In fact, he ended up as my best friend. For me, it is a small world after all, but I wouldn’t have it any other way. 









On Christmas 2010, the one person I was working hardest for disappeared from my life. My Dad fought leukemia all throughout 2010. In his struggle for survival, I found a means to work harder in my academic studies as a means to please him. I had disappointed him in my middle school years before, and his lectures reminding me how I could continuously improve impacted me by providing me with a motivation to succeed. While I did have motivation to succeed for my own gain years later in high school, I fought to impress the one person who cared most about me, my father, as he fought his own struggles. But with his death, I was floundering in confusion as to whom I would show my success to. I had felt like no one cared much about my successes; it seemed as if everyone was merely impressed by the numbers I had instead of being impressed by the work I put in. My Dad allowed me to realize the need for kindness and determination. What matters now is not gaining academic success and doing community projects for others to see, but to grow for myself and become the person I had seen in my father. My Dad always worked hard in what he did even after becoming unemployed, and even after my family’s financial instability he still offered a helping hand to those he cared about. These are the qualities that matter most to me and my growth. --- SAT: 2070 (630 CR 770 M 670 W, Essay Score: 10) ACT: 34 (31 English, 35 Math, 33 Reading, 35 Science, 32 English *After Essay*, Essay Score: 12) SAT IIs: Math Level II - 730, US History - 680 









I want to use technology to change the world through innovation. Through the Jerome Fisher Program in Management and Technology, I’ll pursue a Bachelor’s degree in both Computer Engineering and Economics. As a Bay Area native, it’s no surprise that I’ve grown up with an entrepreneurial spirit and a deep respect for risk-taking. To be a student in Silicon Valley is to be naturally competitive, hungry for challenges, and to believe that anything is possible with enough hard work. My dad and I share the motto, “Failure is a good thing”, which motivates me to constantly try new things such as trying out for the volleyball team or applying for a job. My personal and professional attitude toward business matches Penn’s Jerome Fisher dual-degree program because the programs that Wharton offers to supplement my computer science education are very focused in entrepreneurship. For example, as a Penn undergraduate, I would participate in classes that fall under the Goergen Entrepreneurial Management Program, meaning that they are based on combining economic theory with the research conclusions made in Wharton’s Sol C. Snider Entrepreneurial Research Center. This distinguished program would give me the opportunity to apply my learning to the real-world experiences of others, thereby forming a stronger understanding of how to manage the finances of my start-up. I would also have the chance to participate in Wharton’s Entrepreneur in Residence program and meet one-on-one with a successful Wharton business owner. The personalized mentorship I would receive would allow me to avoid common mistakes and strengthen my understanding of what it takes to run a prosperous business. Finally, I’d get to build a company from scratch, following the guidelines of Wharton’s Small Business Development Center and applying for the numerous funding opportunities that Wharton offers. With my Computer Engineering degree, I’ll learn how to design and prototype the ideas that I invent for apps or web services that will change the world. Concurrently, with my Economics degree, I’ll learn how to transfer my prototype into a working corporation and then grow the company without going bankrupt. While most people gain the knowledge for how to run a business after graduating by going back to college for an MBA, studying business as an undergraduate will give me a unique edge by preparing me to be a technology entrepreneur from the moment I step outside campus. Taking business and engineering classes together will allow me to frame my understanding of programming in a way that prepares me to be most successful. For example, in a programming class, I’ll learn how to build an app to allow in-app purchases, and then in a business class, I’ll learn whether this revenue will be sufficient to sustain my costs. If not, then I’ll change the design of my app so I can attain more revenue, thereby learning how to develop practical technology that I can transfer into the real world by starting a corporation. 









The letter X is a two-dimensional figure, but it takes three dimensions to draw. After tracing the first line on the paper, you need to pull the pen upwards and move across a third dimension, through the air, before dropping it back down onto the paper and making a second stroke to complete the X. The short period in which the pen leaves the paper is critical. The pen cannot perform its duty in the air. It cannot write. It is deactivated, stuck in a limbo that cannot be avoided, until the writer decides to return it to the page. For me, that limbo is called Bollinger Canyon Road. Bollinger is the longest stretch of asphalt that connects my mom’s house and my dad’s house. I drive it nearly every day, sometimes multiple times, because parental custody of myself and my siblings switches every one or two days. I know the street so well that I’ve memorized the speed limits, and I move into the correct lane many miles before I have to. My journey across Bollinger is repetitive, but I’ve made the best of it by using the fifteen minutes of driving to relax and expand my mind. I’ve blown off steam after a frustrating volleyball loss by blasting U2 songs and letting the emotion of the lyrics wash over my body like rainwater. I’ve pictured what my life will be like in ten years, imagining myself holding business meetings in a New York skyscraper or flying across the Atlantic Ocean to consult with the prime minister of the UK about STEM education. I dream of being a modern Renaissance woman, a person released from the expectation to only master one subject, who instead chooses to excel in sports, business, writing, music, and several languages. I’ve even fought my way through four albums of Italian language learning podcasts. Repeating every conjugation of the verb “mangare” while I wait at a red light might seem ridiculous to the driver next to me, but I know that it will be worth it when I can one day write poetry in the most beautiful language in the world. For a long time, Bollinger Canyon Road made me feel like the pen in mid-air: lost, empty, and caught between two destinies. It was easy to solve my impatience with the drive; I simply filled it up with music, daydreams, and language tutorials. The more difficult task was reconciling my feeling of home, since I felt torn between my mom’s house and my dad’s house. I thought I had to prioritize one over the other in order to feel grounded and whole. Some days, I would tell myself that my dad’s house was my real home, and other days I would believe the exact opposite. I was so busy trying to make a decision that I didn’t realize that I was forming powerful connections to both my mom’s house and my dad’s house. While I was looking inward, the unconscious part of my mind found sanctuary under both roofs and savored the traditions of both halves of my family. If I had spent all my time at one house, I would never have felt connected to both, and I would be incomplete. It was the constant transition I thought was a burden that eventually brought me balance. When I finally complete the drive, I’ll walk into one of two very different dwellings. My dad’s house is simple and clean, full of high-tech gear and a spacious couch. It feels like a college dorm, rich with intellectual opportunity and midnight rock duets starring my siblings and me on piano, guitar, and vocals. My dad and I love to spar about politics over our microwaved dinner and then watch the news afterward. Late nights are filled with Nova documentaries, piano duets, and s’mores with my siblings in the backyard, as we gaze at the stars and debate the existence of God. At my mom’s house, I’ll walk into a forest of homey decorations, dirty laundry, and mouth-watering Polish food. It feels like a camp, with adventures hiding in every room. I’ll build a pillow fort with my little sister, snuggle next to my dog for a nap, and engage in high-stakes negotiation with my brother for the one laptop charger that hasn’t disappeared. After dinner, I’ll battle for control of the TV remote and lose out to The Bachelorette every time. It’s a bit louder and busier, but it also feels more full. The letter X is also balanced. To lift the pen from the paper, drag it through the unfamiliar air, and re-enter it into the black-and-white world is to temporarily sacrifice comfort for magnificent symmetry. My life will always have a transition period, whether it’s starting my own technology business, writing a book of iambic tetrameter poems, or conducting cryptography research in Switzerland. I know now that the transition is more than a short time of uncertainty between important events. It is a crossroads, an opportunity to be welcomed and chased. To find X is to break from continuum and draw a new line at a surprising angle. By embracing the transitions in my everyday life, I give myself the chance to be change my mind and find personal growth in unexpected circumstances. 









 The modern teenager craves information. Be it personal, political, or pointless, information has become the American teenager’s drug of choice. Information is an inebriant, and smart phones are the bottle in which it is stored. Without a comfortable flow of status updates and news segments bombarding them wherever they go, users face the worst symptom of withdrawal: reality. Modern adolescents have grown addicted to the constant flow of information afforded by their smart phones, and many have grown more secure in the virtual world than they are in the real one. We can’t get lost anymore. We can try, but who will? Efficiency permeates our daily lives. We get where we need to go, do what we need to do, and return home having documented the entire ordeal. No corner has been left uncharted, no route left unconsidered by the tinny, mechanical voices leading us to our destination. Adventure is a necessity to leading a healthy life, but with smart phones keeping us stuck to our path, adventure is scarce and spontaneity scarcer. We can’t get lost anymore, but we are lost. We are lost in a sea of technology, drowning in information. Should we continue to invest so much of our time in a life that is not real – zapping pictures through cyberspace, recognizing others’ accomplishments with the push of a button – the lives of all those who come after us will be utterly different than ours. We can’t get lost, but they won’t be able to be found. 









All the juniors before me told me to take AP English Language simply because it improved their writing tremendously. But the individuals before me never told me about the intellectual growth that comes from the English language. My English teacher, Elizabeth Ward, encouraged us to think analytically in terms of what we read and the world around us, and the class became more exploration-based compared to past courses that were more memorization-based. The first exploration involved what I learned in writing. Many people view writing to be a process. A five paragraph “intro-body-conclusion” essay, with the commas in the right places, and no contractions defines this prototypical procedure. In writing, I realized that including my own personal tone in what I wrote allowed writing essays to be less cumbersome. Instead of seeing writing as some technical procedure, I realized the necessity of including my own voice and modifying syntax and diction in my own way. But the thinking aspect involved the most development. Instead of merely memorizing facts and being tested on them, I learned to analyze the world around me with more depth than objective details. In taking current events and applying them to my argument, along with an exploratory analysis of texts, I discovered how to think with greater insight and depth beyond facts. Subjective insight of the world around me with objective facts has granted me the abilities to apply what I know into different modes of study past tests, even within my diverse math studies. --- SAT: 2070 (630 CR 770 M 670 W, Essay Score: 10) ACT: 34 (31 English, 35 Math, 33 Reading, 35 Science, 32 English *After Essay*, Essay Score: 12) SAT IIs: Math Level II - 730, US History - 680 









Hey roommate! Looks like we both made it. Great! Just wanted to let you know a bit about my best traits, and hopefully in the end we won’t end up as room-hates. I hail from the burbs of Chicago, and, yes, it snows all the way to your nose, and blackens your toes, but in the Windy City it really does not blow. Truly, in this town I’ve found out who I am: innovative and energetic like the mighty Hoover dam. And with my brute ambition I make no contractions out of can; the “t” stays in my only knot that reminds me who I am. Now, I guess I’ll have you know, that I’m a Yankees fan. Born in New York, I could say it’s not my plan, but really that it evolved from a friendship that I had when I moved to California ‘cause a job was offered to my dad. Living in the Golden State for my years from 2-8 created a base for me to create the open-minded me. Free of care, a child there is open to just breathe fresh air and inhale ideas free of fares. It’s how kids’ lives should be. But times did change, as they do, because of towers and planes we decided we should move. To be closer to family is a decision made without blinkin’, so I had to pack up shirts and shoes and head Midwest towards the Land of Lincoln. Tears in eyes, I waved good-bye to my friends of the C-A-L-I. It was bright and oh-so-fly, but Illinois would get me thinkin’. From the start I could tell the schools were very diff’rent: content based and standards soaring with no lax or relent. But I thrived and pushed myself past each class’s torment, and in the end my informed thoughts furthered in their ferment. Now each day I question, not out of spite or mad aggression, but because improvement has become this glad man’s mad obsession. So be prepared to stay up late, involved in friendly, long debates or conversations about fate or even simply what we ate. I promise you, my new roommate, I will not ever demonstrate any shape or form of hate, ‘cause that is not life’s lesson. I’ll be your Kobe, you’ll be my Shaq—well… I mean, before that all went whack. Sorry, man, that was on the wrong track, but cut me some slack, ‘cause now we’ve got each other’s backs. Let’s keep it cool, be friends and scholars, to you at school I’ll pop my collar and maybe even lend a dollar, all you’ve got to do is… holler. 









Through our educational years, my fellow students and I were incessantly forced to read books on racism and inequality. The towers of books grudgingly read by the most dedicated students, but mostly left untouched by the general population, always stirred groans of, "Why should we even care, "This was ages ago! Move on!" and my favorite, " Why don't we read about discrimination on whites!" In truth, most of these books had limited domains to choose from: either Hispanic discrimination, African inequality, or if the authors were really unconventional,Indian intolerance. But I felt the same way as everyone else; this stuff doesn't actually exist. I grew up differently from all the other children around me. Being a Mexican American, I spent my childhood at religious events, family gatherings that are as far from cookouts as classical music is from reggae, and boasting a closet filled with traditional Mexican dresses that resemble the marvelous triple-decker pastries from, "Cake Boss." But even all these differences never made me truly stand out, because no one knew who I really was. My mother, having earned a degree in another country, had neither "legitimate" work experience nor education in America. Always believing in the importance of employment, she began working as a housecleaner. From a young age, I would accompany her and never saw this job as demeaning; I simply thought this was life. Then, one afternoon, while I was making a bed and my mother dusted, a warm, Chanel smelling woman walked in to say hello. She strolled around, noticeably uncomfortable. I eventually made small talk, asked about her pure breed German Shepherds and lost brain cells as I heard about the dog's wedding day. Eventually, the woman shortened the gap between us and asked, almost ashamed, " What are your plans after high school honey?" Though seemingly innocent, I was taken aback by this question. This was a random woman asking me if I had any future plans other than folding her laundry. I simply answered, " College has always been my plan, ma'am," determined to escape the situation. With a sympathetic look, she said, "Good for you. I'm glad you know being Mexican doesn't mean you don't have potential." I have never been ashamed of my background, always gladly checking off the Hispanic option on my annual school questionnaire. But if my friends knew my mother cleaned houses, or that my father works as a groundskeeper on the weekends, would I be viewed differently? Would I be prone to the comments and jokes that my dusty books say exist? That afternoon, I realized society still categorized people by race. But instead of letting it restrict me, I decided it was up to me to define myself. I let that feeling of degradation empower me to become someone great, someone not defined by race. 









To understand why I want to attend the University of Chicago, take a look inside my mind. Hundreds of years ago, you would identify me by my scarlet-and-gold family crest, proudly painted on a battered yet unbroken shield. I would dismount from my midnight black stallion, long hair spilling out from under my helmet, and confront you with a respectful bow. Today, I wear jeans instead of armor, but if you look in my eyes today, you’ll see the person I really am: a warrior princess. I have traveled alone to many lands, not on horseback but on airplanes, meeting strangers and spending hours reading stories of other warrior princesses like me. The most valuable career advice I ever received was from a brilliant Ukrainian engineer with a rags-to-riches story, whom I met on a flight from Detroit to Baltimore. Once I was old enough to declare myself an atheist, I still attentively listened to hours upon hours of lectures on morality and religion from Chinese ladies on late-night plane rides and Uber drivers with wide, soulful eyes. Each time I meet another fellow traveler by the side of the road, I find myself telling a different story of who I am and where I am from - and that, I suppose, is how warrior princesses grow up. When I was young, I engaged in traditional warrior princess activities. I carved my own bows out of tree branches and shot chopstick arrows across the driveway in furious pursuit of perfect aim. I wrote love songs, memorized Morse Code, and engaged my father, the king, in many long nights of chess games. I became the best tree-climber on my suburban California street and even gave private lessons to my siblings (the other heirs, I called them). Every weekend, I gathered the neighborhood children together, divided up the Nerf weapons evenly, and set the boundaries of a street-wide Capture the Flag with elaborate rules. In these battles, I learned many things - how to give instructions to packs of unruly children, how to develop innovative strategies to confuse the enemy. How to lead. How to lose everything and lose gracefully. These qualities would become much more useful to me in high school. When I became a teenager, I moved on to paths less common to traditional warrior princesses, but all the more engaging and stimulating. I served as an apprentice to my government, learning and teaching the fine art of hacking while writing code with other team members. At seventeen, I fought an epic duel on live television, debating with defensive shields of impact analysis and freshly sharpened statistics and facts to prove my case. Warrior princesses must be apt in their studies, but I believe this means more than excelling at school subjects; it means pushing my academic skill to my absolute limits. For example, after reading the book Moonwalking with Einstein by Joshua Foer, I applied fresh mnemonic techniques to memorizing an entire AP course in psychology, a class I never took, on the day before the AP test. I spent one summer speaking practically no English and exploring castles in the faraway kingdom of Spain, volunteering to lock myself in a castle morgue to test an ancient myth. Back at home, I studied how to design a rare art form called the ambigram, and I dropped my atheism after deciding that modern science better supports the theory of intelligent design. As I prepare to leave my home for a university, I dream of joining the University of Chicago community. In all honesty, UChicago is probably the only university that will accept and even encourage my eclectic thinking and passion for finding adventure in everyday life. Although I hope to major in Computer Science, I also want to study political science and the Italian language to the extent that I can confidently debate Thomas Hobbes’ Leviathan and copy Dante’s style of terza rima poetry. I want to learn about game theory and astrophysics not just in surface-level introductory classes, but through in-depth discussion and analysis. At UChicago, the Core curriculum will feed my hunger for a broad undergraduate education by guaranteeing that one-third of my studies will be dedicated to the exploration of the humanities, sciences, and arts. I yearn to engage in vibrant discussion with UChicago musicians who study neuroscience, business majors who star in theater productions, and psychology students who are learning Mandarin. At any other school, I would be an untraditional student, but at UChicago, I will fit right in. Traditional warrior princesses feel at home in castles; it is no surprise that UChicago's campus is full of them. At UChicago, surrounded by diverse thinkers and unique personalities of every kind, I know that I will feel at home, too. 









Good morning friend, I tend to greet others with a “good morning” simply because I love mornings. This is ironic though, because I also have a great desire to stay up and really venture into the late night. Late night, when one resides in barren quiet and introspective analysis, is often my favorite time to work simply because it is distraction-free, and my exhaust allows my creativity to flourish. I don’t stay up late when I study for grades, but I do stay up for my own personal research in obscure topics ranging from Paul Gauguin’s personal life to budget functions applied mathematically. I won’t keep you up. I promise. I hope you can accept the objects I bring. I have a bookcase that I like to live with because I aspire to have a large library of my own. I might buy a mini stove to make pancakes and eggs for dinner because breakfast foods are my favorite foods. I may actually put a mini kitchen above the bookcase, with a blender too, because my craving for milkshakes is excruciatingly insatiable. Don’t worry, I’ll give you some too. But do know that I want to know you. I genuinely am curious as to what opinions you have over my interests, and hopefully you aren’t fond of sports. But if you are, that’s okay. I can tolerate who you are as long as you can accept who I am, and we can become great roommates. - Darian --- SAT: 2070 (630 CR 770 M 670 W, Essay Score: 10) ACT: 34 (31 English, 35 Math, 33 Reading, 35 Science, 32 English *After Essay*, Essay Score: 12) SAT IIs: Math Level II - 730, US History - 680 









You may have heard of the importance of “STEM education” and “STEM jobs.” It seems like everyone is talking about it, from President Obama to officials at your university. So what exactly does the acronym STEM stand for? STEM is an acronym for the fields of science, technology, engineering and math. Discussion of STEM-related programs has become a presidential priority because too few college students are pursuing degrees in these fields. The U.S. Department of Labor expects that there will be 1.2 million job openings in STEM related fields by 2018, but there won’t be enough qualified graduates to fill them. Many people would agree that STEM is the key to innovation and job creation in the United States. President Obama continually references the importance of STEM education in making the United States more competitive in the global economy. Getting U.S. students interested in studying STEM-related fields is only part of the picture. Educating the best and brightest international students in STEM fields is also a major priority for the United States. In a May 2010 speech in El Paso, Texas, President Obama pointed out that immigrants founded some of the great American companies like Intel, Google, Yahoo and eBay and helped the United States to become a leader in the high-tech industry. In that same speech, Obama said the following about international students and their importance to the United States: We should make it easier for the best and the brightest to not only stay here, but also to start businesses and create jobs here. In recent years, a full 25 percent of high-tech startups in the U.S. were founded by immigrants. That led to 200,000 jobs here in America. I’m glad those jobs are here. I want to see more of them created in this country. We need to provide them the chance. Are you interested in the chance to study in a STEM field? This infographic provides some useful information about STEM careers from a recent Harris Interactive study. The U.S. Department of Labor’s O*Net is another great place to learn about the possible fields you can go into by studying in a STEM major, such as computer science, engineering, or physics. 









So many characters and universes appear before me as I sit in front of the television screen, watching cartoons. Nothing quells my thirst for an escape from reality more than animation. When seeing animated worlds unfurl, senses of absolute euphoria, freedom, and tranquility surge through me. Anything able is suddenly real, the hero always wins, and the physical laws of reality don't have to be followed. Cartoons have made me who I was as a child and am now. By using my talents of the written word, I hope to make millions of others as content as I am in the animated world. After a long day of reality, a few hours of animated zaniness and boundless possibilities are definitely a welcomed change. Sensations of exhilaration, liberty, and contentment flood my mind in the animated world. I also have the opportunity to experience other characters' lives in fictional universes where my imagination truly gets to grow. A lingering truth slowly ascends as I visit the worlds that I love so much — what I see isn't real, what I experience can never be. Even so, I am happy in the animated worlds that I visit. I may not ever be able to visit them, but I can create them and help others feel what I feel: pure happiness and the sense that anything is possible. As with wonderful music, when I experience a masterfully made animated story, I succumb to my emotions and just let them pour out, more often than not, in a wave of tears. When I see a heartbreakingly beautiful scene, I suddenly experience this ecstatic frisson, as if a storm of fire has been poured over me — a visual Gemütlichkeit on the screen. It is because of these experiences and sensations, that I feel so content in the animated world. My story is like a Bildungsroman. Pages upon pages narrate my psychological evolution from childish naïveté to adult worldliness, all centered around the pivotal moments and people that consequently make me who I am today, and will be in the future. All of my problems, the antagonists of my life, began in my first year starting Andries Hudde Junior High School. Being a vertically challenged, talkative, and atheistic Caucasian boy in a school where the majority of students were West Indian American and Catholic, I was a very easy target for bullying. I was beaten and degraded for not believing in God, for being so talkative, and for being white. On top of all that suffering, my mother developed breast cancer which then metastasized to her lungs, making her unfit to work. Losing her very successful job left an immense financial strain on our family. These events would have emotionally crippled me were it not for the television screen and the animated worlds that I saw inside. For as long as I could remember, I would always sit there, shedding all of my pain and suffering in exchange for laughter and optimism. Seeing my dreams in the daytime made me happier than I ever was before. Animation is everything to me for those reasons. The animated world is my home away from home. I experience every nuance on-screen as a change in my own life; I live the characters and the plots. Tempests of warmth, optimism, shivers, and tears burst through me when I watch a wonderful piece of animation. When I watch the screen, it helps me forget the sadness of my past experiences and pushes me to live life to the fullest. It has made me into a better person. The animated world is, and always will be, my special place. 









The whistle pierced through my ear drums, heralding the end of a 90-minute session of utter humiliation. I left the pitch, eyes fixed on the turf that has just witnessed this football massacre, as the gleaming summer sun of Dubai sent its flaming tongues licking the back of my stooped neck, and the eyes of the audience radiating looks of belittling with their tongues lashing with callous mockery. The series of physical and mental torture continued as I made my way to the changing room. I didn't know what these people wanted; we were the least qualified team in this league. But I knew exactly what I wanted; a shower. Even the mighty endocrine system was losing the game of thermoregulation against this arid weather, so you wouldn't really expect much from the youngest team in a 'stache-dominated league', and the changing room testifies to my statement. That place boasted withTESTOSTERONE and GH! But that wasn't for me. At the age of 16, I was a David Copperfield in terms of literature, the far left end of a height normal distribution curve in terms of statistics and probably a gratuitous prey for stabilizing selection pressure in terms of ecology. I could represent myself in terms of all sciences with such wit I'm trying to claim, but I could never be able to answer why I was so. My mom would say that no one gets everything, and would remind me of my decent grades and my merely gaffe-less social life. But I wasn't exactly jumping to my mother's courtesy; for as the Egyptian proverb says "A monkey is a deer in his mother's eyes". And the fact that my Dad shaves twice a day and is almost 2 meters tall ruled out the cause was due to genetics. I just hoped that with time, things might change. Back to the changing room, where everything changed. As I turned the faucet, I was turning onto a new page of my life. As I put on clean, new clothes, a new identity of my own self was discovered. I saw it. Carved on me was the mark of the beast; the odd-shaped seal that proclaimed the arrival of the beast, whose name makes hairs stand on ends in awe. In such a lost state of disbelief and mental bafflement, all I could do was cover the mark with my jeans. The mighty beast felt humiliated. For having his tyranny covered by a piece of denim cloth, he hid what he had for me by the cloak of the unknown tomorrow. For my humble attempt to overlook his deleterious might and ignore his fearsome roars, he distorted my perception; I lost sense of my surroundings, all I saw around me was rapid, meaningless blurs, all I heard was chaotic noise, life was turning bland. As a 'David' against this mighty Goliath, my last pebble was that of acceptance. I stuffed the beast with what he wanted, a tasteless meal of fearless acknowledgement. The beast grew physically, but was aging. His fearsome roars amplified beyond my audible range of fear. His ravaging fangs of depression grew ever larger and sharper, injecting into his very mouth his own venomous despair. He grew too weary to rip me apart with his claws of fatality and he laid there: a silent, defeated Goliath. I was visited by the emperor of all maladies, captured to be sent to the land of the hopeless and dead. I was visited by the beast with the fearful given name of "Cancer". Ironically, I owe him my life, for the change he has brought to it. I lived with him for 2 years that were crowned by a meaningful perspective of my life. Oh, about the league, we went through the next 2 rounds, and our terrible loss was crowned by a silver medal. 









The clock struck four, and I was lost in the city of Zaragoza. I meant to take the five-minute walk from my Spanish exchange summer school to my host family’s apartment on Calle Don Jaime. Distracted by street musicians and fascinated by chance encounters with structures that were already ancient when the first Europeans came to the shores of America, I had taken a few wrong turns and wandered into an unfamiliar barrio. I soon found myself in a crowded plaza, mesmerized by my first close-up sight of the basilica. Overlooking the Ebro River like a fearsome fortress, it dominates the city with its soaring walls flanked by perfectly symmetrical golden turrets. Incorporating elements of Christian and Islamic iconography, the basilica reflects the complex blending of cultures that makes Spain so uniquely fascinating. I had come to Zaragoza to master the Spanish language and immerse myself in the multicultural heritage of the city, so I spent every possible moment engaging the local people in conversations about their culture, politics, and society. At that moment, I wished those conversations had more to do with local geography, since I had no clue how to return to my host family’s apartment. Lost was not an unfamiliar or uncomfortable feeling. I find that the sensation of being lost is usually a prelude to some discovery. A few years earlier, I felt intellectually lost when I tried to teach myself how to write computer code for a Blackjack game. I quickly discovered that programming the game was much more complex than the tutorial videos had suggested. Staring at my glowing computing screen while trying to figure out how to translate my intentions for the game into the esoteric language of computer code was like knowing what to say but not knowing how to speak. After a few days of frustration, I realized that I could approach computer science in the same way I approached learning Spanish, and later Arabic and Italian. I would first decipher the basic syntax of the new language and then fill in the blanks with new vocabulary. This approach worked, and since then I have thought of all new programming languages as merely different dialects that could be used to communicate with the electrical signals inside computers. Applying my passion and talent for understanding foreign languages to computer languages enabled me to progress from being intellectually lost to finding my way to a level of sophisticated understanding of the computer. In the future, I would use this understanding to write coding projects in my math class, my Leadership executive team, my internship, and my spare time. This memory of figuring out how to grapple with the language of computer programming gave me an idea about how to find my way home. I decided to think like a programmer, transforming my challenge into a series of rational statements while gathering information that could be manipulated to find a solution. I assembled useful inputs from helpful strangers in the plaza and soon discovered the route back to my apartment. There is nothing quite like the feeling of being lost in a problem to motivate the search for new ideas to solve that problem. I can’t wait to get lost in my next challenge. 









I wasn’t sure why I had come to this temple. To get away from the stares and the vulnerability I felt on the streets? The shameless leering and whistling of Indian men made me feel exposed to my core – a constant reminder that I didn’t belong in this country, that no matter how much mehindi I painted on my hands, I would always stick out to the men loitering at chai stalls. I rarely felt as weak as I had these past few weeks, as overwhelmed and as used. Everywhere I went, I was judged purely on the way I look. Rich enough that no matter how many gruff “nahis” I uttered, rickshaw drivers always cajoled me to go places I didn’t need to and charged triple the local price. Blonde enough to be a picture of Western promiscuity, an opportunity to practice broken pick-up lines and lean in for the occasional butt-squeeze. At first, this temple seemed an unlikely place to seek relief. Garish, it didn’t fit in a city of faded buildings; the din of incessant ringing bells and chanted mantras penetrated the cracks of the paint. Dirty too – remains of milk offerings and hibiscus flowers clung to my bare feet. Crowds hoping for a blessing by the goddess rhythmically circled the temple. No space to think. And it reeked; the unmistakable smell of India, that raw, intimate stench of human flesh. Yet, in the midst of all this chaos, I felt calm. Looking up, Ma-Durga’s enormous painted eyes were penetrating. Was she what comforted me? Durga is a strong, fearless goddess who doesn’t let anyone get in the way of accomplishing her goals. I thought of Durga’s tectonic laughter, her patience, her bravery and her confidence – the strength to defeat demons. Is it these human qualities that separate her from every other Goddess, that make her the kind of woman I want to be? Beneath the dirt, the smell, and the noise, this temple represented a touchstone for my aspirations. These walls didn’t break under the stress of high standards. They flourished. This temple inspired people. As I looked around, I realized that everyone seemed happy – the stark contrast of smiling white teeth on brown skin. This temple gave me a sense of comfortable familiarity in an otherwise foreign place, and reminded me that to belong is more complicated than simply fitting in. I slipped on my sandals and made my way into the street. My frustration wouldn’t change anything. In fact, my self-consciousness kept me from immersing myself in the culture and the community that surrounded me. Laughter, patience, bravery, confidence. I feel the strength of Durga within me. I am my own temple. 









Rather than a single idea or experience, an entire series has been key to my intellectual development. Manifesting itself as a pointy-eared, green tunic-clad, tunic-wearing, Master Sword wielding hero on a quest to overthrow a treacherous warlord, sorcerer, or other malcontent and rescue the princess, Shigeru Miyamoto’s Legend of Zelda is a provocative, action-adventure video game series that has captivated my interest (and parent’s money) since before I was even in pre-K. The game series has been crucial in testing the limits of my mind, pitting my pixelated, suspiciously elf-like hero against merciless dungeons, filled with a plethora of puzzles and enemies, and mystifying challenges, spawning from the deep recesses of the creator’s wickedly brilliant minds. Instead of being a mere hack-n-slash game, the Legend of Zelda series is a thought-provoking one, challenging the player’s observation skills, resourcefulness, shrewdness, tactic, ability to relate the part to the whole, and curiosity to unlock all the games’ secrets. Only in this game would such questions as whether pushing a block in a certain manner would block your path later on, or what the fastest route up a spiral structure would be in order to get to a treasure chest on time, or what convoluted series of trades would you execute in order to get an upgraded weapon be asked by the player. The series is an inquisitive and complex one; after all, what do you make of the fact that even the game creator’s timeline of the series was picked apart and proven flawed? 









 Name your favorite books, authors, films, and/or musical artists. Books: Wuthering Heights, Harry Potter, The Adventures of Tom Sawyer, Rebecca Films: V for Vendetta, The King’s Speech, The Social Network, Transformers Musical Artists: Chopin and Prokofiev What newspapers, magazines, and/or websites do you enjoy? Websites: The Onion, Food Gawker, Washington Post, Forbes Magazines: TIME, The Economist, Popular Science, National Geographic What is the most significant challenge that society faces today? Society should learn to use technology as an aid, not as a substitute for thinking or for communicating face-to-face with others. How did you spend your last two summers? I spent my days either working at a technology consulting firm, designing the website and managing records, or conducting research on breast cancer at the Karmanos Cancer Institute. What were your favorite events (e.g., performances, exhibits, sporting events, etc.) this past year? Watching The Phantom of the Opera on Broadway was truly breathtaking just as seeing BLAST!, a marching ensemble incorporated with music, dancing, and singing, was inspirational. What historical moment or event do you wish you could have witnessed? I want to witness the making of the Mayan calendar. These Mayans have imposed upon people today the belief that the world will end... in 2012. So how much of it is true? What five words best describe you? Sweet, sociable, studious, sincere, spirited 









Key Club is not simply another community service organization, it is my high school family. Key Club spurs excitement within me as it represents a tolerant organization that brings positive change through community service events and fundraisers. My commitment to Key Club increased as I gained the position of Club President within my home club. My shy shell of a self cracked as soon as I began hosting weekly meetings and workshop presentations, impacting me with improvements in public speaking and presenting information to a wide group of people—important for my future career interest in research and teaching. Not only did I find confidence through these experiences, but I improved my organizational skills in planning club meetings, service events, and fundraisers. With all these events under my plate, I also learned to grasp diverse groups of people and their distinctive personalities, ultimately allowing me to become more tolerant and accepting. --- SAT: 2070 (630 CR 770 M 670 W, Essay Score: 10) ACT: 34 (31 English, 35 Math, 33 Reading, 35 Science, 32 English *After Essay*, Essay Score: 12) SAT IIs: Math Level II - 730, US History - 680 









As a gentle breeze from the Thüringen countryside blows by, I anxiously approach the Altenburg, the residence of the pianist/composer Franz Liszt. When I reach the door, a maid greets me and gestures toward the piano room. Cigar smoke fills the air and glasses of half-drank cognac left behind by his students clutter the end tables, but the irresistible sound of Liszt’s piano playing bring the room to perfect harmony. His fingers dance across the keys and his long hair wildly bounces about as I watch in awe. When my hero finishes playing, he warmly receives me and inquires as to what brought me here; my reply to him was that I had admired him and wanted to learn about his life and music. He agrees, and in the candlelit room we speak for hours. I’ve spent years researching Liszt but conversing with him in person reveals more to me than I could ever learn from books. Once the night is through, I bid him farewell, and after the most enlightening experience of my life, return to the 21 st century. 









 October 29th, 2011: I am alone. I am tired. I am at a Snoop Dogg concert. The drumbeat rattling my teeth is nearly overpowered by my deafening crash onto rock bottom. The 2011 school year cut me to pieces. I was a sophomore – a year notorious for being easier than the rest at my school – attending the New Orleans Center for Creative Arts after school. I got home at 7 every evening, rarely getting to bed before midnight. I struggled to keep my head above water, craving the happiness summer would surely bring. October 26th, 2012: I am alone. I am ecstatic. I am at a Skrillex concert. The electronica master charges my body with his fancy musical gadgets; I release the energy by losing myself in the pulsing crowd. The 2012 school year took one look at me and couldn’t help but laugh. I spent the entire summer at a summer camp in the mountains of North Carolina, and I came home feeling invincible. I found myself staring at my glass of water, just because. Water, ya know? Water! On my rollercoaster ride through high school, I realized that I am in control of my state of mind. As I embark on my next big journey, I’m glad to know that I have the ability to take control of my life when it seems terrible and stay grounded when it seems fantastic. I’ve always hated rollercoasters, but this is one ride I won’t regret. 









I can sit there and stare at it for hours - sometimes watching, not watching others. "There" is a stair case of the 1st floor of a business center, and "it" is a view of the pavement outside through a 100 X 100cm window directly in front. To the open-minded, it is classically picturesque: cars in a myriad of colors passing by; a scantily clad teenager on the heels of the formally dressed businessman. To the idealist, it is a sneak peek of the onset of creation. More than this two dimensional scene, I imagine I see the infinite dimensions of life just the way the creator might see it. I call this place God's View. I think of this window as a zoomed in picture of the world. I try to capture the central motif of the story we call life in a single pixel; I look for the pattern that connects. For a thinker, patterns are not made with shapes, colors or words, but by questions. How does the Earth's radius and gravitational orientation affect the whereabouts of Waldo? What does "6" think of the letter "c"? What defines a human experience?I try to placate my utterly discordant and ever wondering mind by letting my questions run rampant. I look for the answers within the stream of passersby and then simply stare at the people, too absorbed in their movements. The bedlam in my head merges with the bedlam of a rush hour. Maybe it's because I love chaos. I believe that there is an unconventional beauty in commotion. Isn't all clutter, after all, a higher degree of order? It's in clutter where my imagination resides. It's in the time of confusion when I ask the most important questions. But some days I just play with numbers. I calculate the frequency with which people appear and disappear, guess their ages or try to construct a sequence out of the numbers. And some days I'm simply human. I laugh at God's cosmic jokes and take time to appreciate the ironies of my life. Take the instance of my name: "Bitya" directly translates to "daughter of God", whose existence I've doubted since I was nine. I am the class math geek who often miscalculates her taxi fare. I'm the hyperactive girl who moves too much; yet the girl seen sitting motionless for hours, lost in thought. I am head of student body and captain of the debate team; and I have the audacity to describe myself as slightly shy and reserved. Sometimes, I cry at misfortunes: a fight with my mother, fear of oblivion or a child I see through the window falling and hurting her knees. I curse my intense empathy, my capacity to feel more than the average person. Then I appreciate the beauty in poignancy. But most times, I simply think. I've always thought myselfan artist. But I don't paint and I'm not a poet: my thoughts are too vague to make a dent on canvas, and too elusive to be done justice by words. My art lies in contemplation. I love to think. Despite having many little piles of "to-do's" lying around, I still find time to experiment with my ideas. God's View is the perfect place - a window looking out that allows me to look in. Half the time, I'm found within the confinements of my head, contemplating and reflecting, and my addictive rumination does have its evils. Too often, I do neglect practical matters, and I've many a time been horribly frustrated at the 'dead-end' of an idea. But thinking gives me the only validation for my existence; "I think therefore I am". But maybe I don't exist, I only think I do. Maybe nothing is the way we think it, or maybe nothing is. But you know what? Subjectivity is proof of God's great kindness. I can still think about it. 









The Illuminati changed my life. Three years ago, I found my first ambigram in one of my favorite novels, Angels and Demons by Dan Brown. I turned the page, and there it was: the word “Illuminati” printed into the exact center of the book. It was styled like a newspaper masthead, exquisite and complex, yet oddly symmetric. Curious, I rotated the book upside-down. Impossibly, the inverted word was still “Illuminati”. Gazing closer, I realized that the letters, I-L-L-U-M, actually shaped a flipped I-N-A-T-I. Suddenly, I was reading it in both directions. My eyes waltzed along the broad curves and sharp twists of the calligraphy, striking poses in a glamorous font against a sheet of creamy whiteness, sliding between the dense vertical strokes, peering at the edge of the defined serif as it angled away, then bent boldly toward me. Every line was deliberate, every flourish smiling with purpose, and the whole word balanced on the delicate cord that joined two letters into one. It was unforgettable. Ambigrams are words that can be read from different directions. Actually, “ambigram” is an umbrella term that encompasses dozens of distinct types of visual wordplay. The most popular ones are rotational, mirror image, and – my personal favorites – symbiotic ambigrams, which can spell two different things when viewed normally and upside-down. Compelled by the striking art, I could not help but try my own hand at designing ambigrams, and slowly I felt the pitiful stick-figure artist inside me shrink away as my inner energetic graphic designer sprang up. Before early volleyball tournaments, I woke myself up by filling up pages and pages of experimental letter combinations, gleefully satisfied at the way that a rounded lowercase “a” was a perfect upside-down lowercase “e”. In my AP Literature class, I drew “She’s a witch!” which revealed, when flipped, “Communist” to reflect Arthur Miller’s contemporary motives for writing The Crucible . On a challenge from a friend, I even drew an ambigram of “Jay-Z” and “Beyoncé” on a bumpy bus ride back from a Leadership retreat. In the last few months, I have also practiced drawing ambigrams as fast as I can. I dream about the day when I can effortlessly write out a message saying “Hi, how are you today?” normally and “The password is cherry268” upside-down, without pausing or rotating the paper. I imagine a world in which everyone had this ability, and could literally write two things at once. How would that change communication? Encryption? Trust? My legs swing comfortably from this innovative edge, excited to take a stab at the answers. The best part about the ambigram is that it refuses to define itself as just one thing. It is a linguistic passion, a cryptographic endeavor, an artistic design, and an ironic illusion. I relish the fact that ambigrams force both the artist and the audience to reject first glances and embrace secret identities. This may just be a nerdy obsession, but ambigrams have taught me more than how to sketch fancy words. Their multidimensional truth implies that my hobbies of both writing Italian sonnets and solving logic riddles are not opposing functions of my left and right brains, but rather, a perfect conglomeration of my passion for creating and solving puzzles. The beauty of the most surprising combinations reminds me to take bold risks in both my life and my designs. Above all else, ambigrams have taught me that I can create the impossible. I can make true and false the same word depending on something as simple as a 180-degree head turn. Victory can be defeat. Open can be closed. An amateur piano player with an obsession with cryptology can learn to program iPhone apps and get the game-winning kill at the varsity volleyball championship. A girl with divorced parents can make time for both families, and an inspired teenager from California can write her name into world history – both normally and upside-down. 









 I get lost. Ninth grade geometry began my fascination of the world and its principles. The unified and coherent system of geometry built around simple concepts--lines, circles, and polygons--captured my interest, as the idea of a system with so much clear depth seemed so unreal. How can an individual such as Euclid build such a strong base of conclusions? Soon after this class, I became lost in a world tied into my reality--a world which spurred an intellectual curiosity and greater understanding of the world that had to be built upon. This happens to be the world of mathematics. The world of math is surrounded by treasures meant to be discovered. In a sea of unknowns, I find the answer with only a few scribbles, only a few careful deductions. With just a few observations, I can make predictions of the future--I become the psychic with symbols. In examining graphs, with their paths dispersed in all directions, I can discover where these paths travel. I can see, and prove, where these graphs halt, fall into infinity, or split in their direction. Even with one’s velocity, I can discover their future destination. I can even discover the volume of shapes as contorted as the Walt Disney Concert Hall. This world is all fabricated. With just a few simple ideas, I build my understanding and explore this world further, and use what I know from this world and apply its ideas to what is reality. In this new world known as math, I am its explorer. It is these very explorations that have shaped my life and the direction I intend to go with it. My abilities to discover new forms of learning within math has served as both an escape and an aid. My work at Kumon Learning Center and my many tutoring ventures have intertwined with my love for service to allow me to not only discover new concepts and how others view them, but how I can shape them into different forms of problem solving. Even outside of work or volunteering, math is a leisure through the lectures I find on Coursera or MIT Courseware. In my future, I will find new direction in my explorations by seeking the seemingly endless quantities of mathematical knowledge at the university level. My goal is to breakdown the world of analysis--to discover the theorems and headaches of understanding infinity--and to apply this knowledge to other fields such as economics. With this appreciation I hold for math and its energetic depth, I will harness its energy and transfer my explorations onto others as a teacher or professor. But that is not to say that all the learning from math has been purely mathematical. Existing within an unexplored world allowed my mind to seek out all possible solutions to problems--ones that exist within math and ones within reality, as well. Immersing into the math world has revealed the multifacetedness of life; I have discovered that reality is more than a single perspective, and that every step within life lays new perspectives. The conflicts of today do not bound me by the consequences present in my life: the solutions and many perspectives I seek in problems within reality always exist, if given enough insight. My world is not meant to be bounded by unforeseen consequences or opinions; it is the world I shape on my own through my own explorations, and college will be yet another medium meant to be explored. Insights from college advisor: "It can be particularly difficult for students who are talented in math to articulate their interest through words, but you are a man of many talents. The way you see math as a medium to explore the world shows that you think subjectively. Your rich ideas on building a base of mathematical knowledge and applying this knowledge to other fields show that your thinking extends across multiple disciplines, a trademark that you share with Stanford. Not only that, but the way you intertwine your love of math with your love of service has allowed you to serve as a role model to others, and if your essays are any indication, that enthusiasm is contagious. Congratulations!" 









 Name your favorite books, authors, films, and/or artists. Favorite: Books - Euclid's Elements, Love & Misadventure, Annotated Mona Lisa, The Catcher in the Rye, The Picture of Dorian Gray, Selected Poems (by TS Eliot) Authors - F Scott Fitzgerald, John Steinbeck, Oscar Wilde Films - The Social Network, Up, A Brilliant Madness, Inception Artists - Hieronymus Bosch, James Whistler, Edgar Degas, Pierre-Auguste Renoir What newspapers, magazines, and/or websites do you enjoy? Favorite: Newspaper - The New York Times Magazine(s) - Time, The Economist Website(s) - Tumblr, Humans of New York, Coursera, MIT Open Courseware What is the most significant challenge that society faces today? (50 word limit.) Lack of tolerance. Society, and the world, would be greatly improved with greater tolerance. For extremist groups, criminals, and corrupt and/or inefficient leaders—their harm in failing to consider and tolerate others' feelings/beliefs leads to a stagnation of social progress and a breakdown of moral values. How did you spend your last two summers? (50 word limit.) My summers were both sporadic and productive. I explored online math lectures and bookstores to extend my learning. Other than the International Convention mentioned above, I also continued my community service efforts with Key Club and homeless-aid organizations, while I went to the beach and explored Southern California. What were your favorite events (e.g., performances, exhibits, sporting events, etc.) this past year? (50 word limit.) The 2014 Key Club International Convention in Anaheim proved to be my favorite event in the sphere of this past year. The community of altruistic individuals, the stories of those who have inspired local change, and the leisurely freedom of the convention were favorable attributes to my experience. What historical moment or event do you wish you could have witnessed? (50 word limit.) To be in the jury for the case in which painter James Whistler sues art critic John Ruskin for libel—under Ruskin’s claims that one of Whistler’s paintings was “slovenly.” Whistler argued for the painting, claiming it to diverge from any identifiable object and argued his “art-for-art’s sake” philosophy. What five words best describe you? Curious, incendiary, confident, introspective, analytical --- SAT: 2070 (630 CR 770 M 670 W, Essay Score: 10) ACT: 34 (31 English, 35 Math, 33 Reading, 35 Science, 32 English *After Essay*, Essay Score: 12) SAT IIs: Math Level II - 730, US History - 680 









A command window pops onto my laptop screen; “C:\Users\Admin>” is written in white against a black background as I stare curiously at what this means. Just at the end of 10th grade, I applied to intern for a technology consulting firm, COMPANY_NAME. As it was a newly founded company, the opportunities it could offer were tremendous. Being with a company from its inception and watching it expand, I realized how valuable this internship would be for what I wanted to pursue—information technology management. “What do you know about website design?” The interviewer waited patiently for my answer. “I’m sorry ma’am. I do not have very much experience in that area. But, I am a fast learner so if you could give me a few days...” Applying for the internship, I did not expect the firm to assign such a task to me, a girl still in high school who had shown no expertise in website design. We talked for a few more minutes and just as I stood up to leave, the interviewer placed a book in my hands: Using HTML . “Please take a look at this. You will begin next Tuesday.” As I sat on the couch at home, reading the first page aloud, I became determined to take this chance to explore fields outside my comfort zone and discover where my true potential lies. The challenge for me was to not only build an artistic user interface, but to also understand the HTML codes behind the templates in order to modify certain colors, pictures, or positions of various elements. Working for hours a week with an IT expert, I started to develop a deeper, more intimate relationship with the subject. Two summers have passed since I first started interning. This website, this project, that has taken me months to create, while far from perfect, has helped prove what I am capable of, simultaneously encouraging me to take every opportunity and strive for greater knowledge. 









One thing that bears great importance to me is that those who cannot otherwise provide safety and security for themselves are given the appropriate help. To me, this matter manifested itself in the form of animals. Ever since I was little, my life was filled with the abandoned, the left behind, the mistreated, the rescued. With a local SPCA chapter, my mother and I took on litters of kitties to foster. I remember the first litter we brought home. I remember watching the litters grow up, turning from helpless, damaged creatures into busy, self-sufficient adults. I remember the first pet fair I attended. I remember the first adoption, the initial sorrow from losing contact, and the burst of joy from hearing back from the new owner, knowing that I had helped this animal to achieve happiness and security. Rescue animals reinserted itself into my life once again five years ago, when I stumbled upon a litter of abandoned kittens, struggling to survive. It would be one of the most rewarding experiences watching these once frail, fraught animals transform into vigorous beings. My effort to raise these kittens would be repaid in full with their affection and lovable quirkiness. After all, what more is there to ask for from a living being? All beasts should be able to display their full personalities - it is their right as living creatures. Unlocking that potential is the sole motivation for my role as a nurturer. 









 Order. Call the drink. Pump, ice, milk. Blend. Fruit and pour and seal. Seven months ago, I had a job interview to work at a bubble tea store called Fruitealicious (serving the people of north Texas their tea and smoothie needs since 2008!), and to say it went badly would be like calling a tornado a slight breeze. To sum it up, anxiety led to a half hour of far too much forceful smiling and far too loud laughter. Out of sheer pity cloaked in a mask of "hidden potential," I was hired. Seven months ago, I was a nervous wreck with insanely high levels of self-criticism and low amounts of self-esteem. I was scared of possibilities and terrified of failure, but these past months of my life have completely changed where I feel comfortable and the limits to which I feel I can push myself. The first week was horrific. My only work experience had been a counseling job that consisted of being expected to lounge around in a lake, eat pizza, and ensure that seven year old kids didn't drown (which, while easy and resulted in one of the greatest tans known to humankind, was so boring I often considered leaving as my absence would not have been felt whatsoever). To say the least, Fruitealicious was a wake up call. I was forced onto register in the middle of a busy afternoon while my bosses hovered over my shoulder, barking orders and corrections at me for four hours straight. Nothing I did was correct, and no amount of hard work was enough. Gradually, I was broken down and rebuilt in order to instill me with the confidence and leadership skills my boss swore he saw in me upon my hiring. I have spent the past seven months continually pushing myself to be the best worker and person I can possibly be, and because of this I've grown to assume some of the responsibilities of running the store. I know the place like the back of my hand; it's my second home. When it's busy at work, time seems to slow down. If there is a line out the door wrapped around the side of the building, I don't have time to worry. I am perfectly in my element. Those on shift with me anticipate my actions before they even register to me and I do the same to them. We become a machine characterized by a simple ebb and flow, push and pull that allows everyone to remain calm and collected. When it's slow, we pass the time by dumping ice on one another, creating handshakes, inventing drinks, and generally acting like ourselves in ways that we can rarely show others. I know that I can trust my coworkers with my secrets, dreams, and aspirations because they trust me with theirs. I have created some of the most solid friendships I have ever had and possibly ever will, and I have found a group of people I want to remain in my life for as long as possible. They have extended the same love and warmth my own family shows me, and for that I am forever grateful to them. Fruitealicious isn't just a job; it's a second home. I have no idea who I want to be or where I want my life to take me, but I know that the incredible people I have grown to know and love will always be there to welcome me back with open arms. I can't imagine where I would be without them, and I can't imagine a place where I am more content. 









I find it really hard to be perfectly content. I'm always distracted by math homework and that book I need to finish and the scarf I'm knitting and my friends and getting my license. Worrying consumes my days and I don't always realize it. Sometimes I get tired of it and I'll go outside and sit under a tree to read. I'll be content for a while, listening to the wind and feeling the sunlight then I realize that I've had something on my mind the whole time and I checked my phone thirty times in five minutes. It's sad that I live in such a beautiful place and I don't even give it the appreciation it deserves. There is one place that I love more than anything in the world. It is the only place that there is nothing on my mind but appreciation for its beauty and how many pieces of sea glass I can collect. The one place I can say that I am perfectly content. Since I moved to Kentucky, I only get to go here once a year. That used to bother me but I've learned that the distance makes it more special. I will never live here for fear of it becoming a monotonous part of everyday life. People hear "beach" and they immediately think sunny days and swimming. This place isn't like that. Cloudy days are the best days to go. It is always breathtaking. There's more room to explore and only the expert beach combers are out. There are so many amazing things to see. Baby ducks with their mother, hermit crabs, sea glass, clams, lobster traps, driftwood, sea urchins, the smoothest rocks I've ever felt. Even the seaweed fascinates me. I love this place. I love the fact that we build up walls to contain her. We fear her and love her. She destroys families and monuments and we have to forgive her. We forgive her because we all admire her perseverance. We all want to be fighters too. As soon as I arrive I immediately feel relief. This is my haven. This unforgiving coast is my favorite place in the world. I've been coming here since I was a baby and I will always have a connection to it. I'm sure there is still sand in my system from how much I ate as a child. The stairs down to sea level look worse every year. She never gives up on destroying them. Something about my feet hitting that rocky sand makes everything better. The water is always absolutely freezing but it has never bothered me. It wakes up all of my senses, from my toes all the way to my brain. It makes me realize just how beautiful our world can be. I could stay here all day long. I could sleep here, listening to the waves roll in. Listening to that icy water get closer and closer to the wall only to pull back and start over. Leaving is the hardest part. I can never get my fill of the most perfect place on earth. I can't take my contentedness with me and that is heartbreaking. I can take the sea glass and the shells and some sand but even those things can't replace the salt smell and the sound of the waves. They can't replace how determined I feel, how important I feel when I am on that sand looking out and I can see to the end of the earth. I leave willingly though, because all good things must come to an end even if the end is only temporary. I just hope my oldest friend in the world decides to go easy on the stairs so I can make the trek down them again next year. 









 I am Chopin. Preparing to strike the G in Chopin’s Sonata No. 3, I let myself melt and mold into the greatest performer of this piece–Chopin himself. Led through a maze of notes and rhythms, I challenge my mind to track every movement I make. With the multiple melodic lines running beneath the ink stained paper, music flows through my fingertips, transforming a boisterous girl into a sensitive, mellow lady. I am Prokofiev. Stepping back from Chopin, I throw myself into the world of Prokofiev. He is a man of strength and authority and so I must be, too. A female pianist can only exert so much force before her muscles stress out and catapult the performance to an unfortunate end. However, when I become Prokofiev, my power is unbounded. Like a lion living inside, I have the energy to roar through an entire concert and still have enough vigor for an encore. They are my creators, my teachers, my confidants. 









I came out to my best friend as bisexual the summer before ninth grade. Unlike the countless "coming out" YouTube videos I had watched to prepare myself, I don't really remember the sigh of relief or heart fuzzies of acceptance when she said that it was fine. All I can remember is the dizzying, trembling, gut-wrenching fear of rejection, something that I still feel today from time to time. This is definitely cliched, but I don't want anyone else to have to feel this way. LGBTQ equality and safety is something I wish somebody had told me freshman year I deserved; either way, I know now that being different is ordinary . I want to create safe spaces for others who identify as gay or queer and give them more representation in politics and media. I want to become a role model for my past self and kids just like her, somebody who is connected to but not defined by her gender or who she wants to date. I want to show parents that their child isn't a bizarre freak or that they raised their kid wrong, that their child has an unbelievable amount of potential and that even when politicians, celebrities, church leaders, and everyone else tells them they can't succeed, they can and they will. I still have yet to come out to several of my friends and family, but I know that when the time comes, I’ll be ready because this will always be about more than just myself. 









By allowing myself to realize a greater connection to the rest of humanity, in the respect that health is a major essence of the human experience, as well as excavating deeper into my own interests, my experience interning in Dr. Loeser’s lab at Wake Forest was by far the most remarkable. Being in an environment that was exploding with inquiry, analysis, and discovery, all while in close collaboration with some of the most intelligent and colorful individuals I had ever met, was truly enthralling. Not only was it because of the amazing science involved, but also because of the sense of belonging I felt to this extraordinary group whose valiant cause to unearth the mysteries behind arthritis proved all-encompassing that I kept wanting to come back. Knowing that a career may lead me to a similar atmosphere and ethereal feeling is motivation enough to pursue such a career. 









To me, the real hero of the James Bond movies isn’t James Bond - it’s Q, the genius hacker who engineers Bond’s gadgets, cracks his codes, and makes all of his missions possible. When I was fourteen, I watched a real-life Q demonstrate ethical hacking at a presentation hosted by my summer camp. The smiling, charismatic man invited a girl in the front to create a password on his laptop. He then tapped a few keys, launched a projector screen, and announced that he would crack the password in less than three minutes. I didn’t believe him, but then I watched, breathless, as the phrase “wheat_thins” crawled across the screen, letter by letter. I was awestruck. I later decided to find out more about hacking by applying to the Cyber Technologies Academy, an after-school cybersecurity training program offered by Sandia National Laboratories. Arriving to my first class, I felt insecure about my abilities because I had little experience with cybersecurity. However, as soon as the class started, my insecurity dissolved into a pool of bubbly excitement. Through challenging lessons, I was learning how to hack. My favorite exercise was called “Infiltrate the Death Star.” When I launched the exercise, my screen went black, and bright green text popped up every five seconds to remind me that the Death Star was secure, meaning that the firewall was still up. I rapidly typed phrases like “sudo ifconfig” and “netcat 1148”, commands I’d learned only a few days earlier, to navigate through the computer networks like Luke Skywalker zooming through space. Typing the commands felt like speaking a new language - confusing, off-balance, but electric with excitement. When I finally won the game, I didn’t stop grinning for hours. One of the instructors noticed my enthusiasm, and asked me to apply for a summer internship at the Academy for the summer. Several weeks later, I found myself standing in front of the room as a teaching assistant for the same class that had triggered such anxiety when I first took the course. I helped guide the new students through the exercises, and I often got the chance to lecture when the instructor was busy. I’ve always been an impatient learner, but presenting new and complex material such as the architecture of web servers to teenagers required me to slow down and consider how best to teach a class of diverse thinkers. I was also hired as a developer, writing new code to help make the course accessible to people outside of Sandia, such as local high school students and teachers. My work contributed to the U.S. government’s interest in expanding cybersecurity education to strengthen the technical workforce and bolster national security. Cybersecurity is a fascinating intersection of two of my passions: computer science and political science. It is powerfully relevant to every aspect of society today, from the military to the medical sector. To explore such a complex topic, I look to Carnegie Mellon’s School of Computer Science. The requirements to earn a B.S. in Computer Science include a required minor or double major in a second subject, meaning that I will have the chance to investigate cybersecurity outside of its purely technical characteristics. At Carnegie Mellon, I will have a multitude of opportunities to participate in world-changing cybersecurity research, even as a freshman, at places such as the CyLab Mobility Research Center. I am also intrigued by the fact that Carnegie Mellon’s core Computer Science curriculum includes an in-depth study of topics such as cultural analysis and economic, political, and social institutions. I believe that looking at critical issues in technology with an open mind and a mature grasp of the humanities is extremely important to being a computer scientist. For example, I could not imagine exploring the future of cybersecurity without considering the political ripple effects of Edward Snowden, the moral ramifications of the quantum encryption revolution, and the relationship between technology and income inequality. Curious and excited to engage in a multifaceted study of computer science, I am confident that I will find a home at Carnegie Mellon. 









By all accounts, I have lived a blessed life. Though my family has never been wealthy, my parents’ self-sacrifice provided me with more than some children ever dream of: a nice home and access to a quality education. I am forever appreciative for this and have striven to make the most of the opportunities granted to me. My strongest desire is to give back to the community that has entrusted me with so much, an ambition that I aim to accomplish with continued hard work. As such, it is my tireless work ethic that defines me and has driven me to complete my undergraduate studies in three years: one at Carnegie Mellon and two at Cornell. Having achieved great academic success, I consider a career in engineering research to be the primary avenue through which I can make a positive impact on the lives of others. To this end, I now seek admission to Stanford’s Master of Science program in mechanical engineering to, with the ultimate intention of earning a Ph.D., develop research skills that I will utilize to contribute to the world in a significant fashion. I intend to concentrate my graduate studies within a dynamic realm of energy research with applications in sustainable transportation, such as biofuel or fuel cell technology. Given both volatile oil prices due to geopolitical instability and continued concerns regarding climate change, I believe that renewable transportation fuels will assume a significant role in meeting the next century’s increased energy demand in a robust yet carbon-neutral manner. I am very interested in thermochemical biomass conversion processes like pyrolysis and gasification, as well biochemical processes, which have all shown great potential in producing second-generation biofuels that do not disrupt primary food supply and prices. In particular, I would like to conduct research that utilizes a balance of experimental investigation and numerical simulation to improve the scientific community’s understanding of the intra-particle heat and mass transport present in such conversions. Furthermore, I would like to construct kinetic models that better describe biofuel combustion. In addition to biofuel, I am interested in the reaction mechanisms and catalyst design principles that dictate energy efficiency in low temperature electrochemical devices such as fuel cells (PEMFCs and AMFCs). I would like to pursue the discovery of electrocatalytic surfaces that improve these fuel cells’ conversion efficiency, which has thus far been limited by slow electro-kinetics. Such progress would serve a critical role in enabling greater commercialization of fuel cell vehicles. While I am resolute in my decision to pursue sustainable transportation research at the graduate level, I would welcome the opportunity to study other energy-related subjects if there are no matching projects immediately available at Stanford. In the long term, after earning my Ph.D. and becoming seasoned through professional experience, I hope to lead an R&D facility that not only advances biofuel and fuel cells scientifically, but also creates economies of scale that enable these technologies’ large-scale industrialization. Given my stated aspirations, Stanford is an ideal institution at which to earn my MS, and ultimately my Ph.D., in mechanical engineering. World renown and at the forefront of innovation, Stanford has built itself a legacy upon countless scientific and technological advancements, forming a rich tradition that I hope to become a part of. The Department of Mechanical Engineering features accomplished faculty working in cutting-edge fields of energy research and, in reading their academic papers, I have identified several professors that I would be eager to work for. I have reached out to Professor Reginald Mitchell to express my interest in his studies aimed at developing fuel cells powered by coal or biomass. Likewise, I have spoken over the phone with Professor Hai Wang and discussed his current projects pertaining to combustion, nanocatalysis, and nanostructures for supercapacitors. Finally, I have contacted Professor Xiaolin Zheng, whose interdisciplinary research in combustion, nanomaterials, and energy conversion is also of great interest to me. Although some of these projects are not directly related to my intended concentration in biofuel or fuel cell technology, they would serve as fantastic learning opportunities and perhaps prompt me to modify my focus within energy. I am confident that, in exchange for access to Stanford’s outstanding faculty and immense array of advanced energy courses, I would add great value to any research group. Despite only five college semesters to date, I have acquired a broad range of research, project, and work experience that makes me a strong candidate for Stanford’s MS program. This fall I am working in Professor Mason Peck’s research group within the propulsion subsystem of his lunar CubeSat project, an electrolysis-powered nano-satellite that will eventually orbit the Moon. My contributions have included a series of propulsion characterization tests in which I have measured key thrust and efficiency metrics in a thermal vacuum chamber to corroborate our system’s predicted performance based on theory and numerical simulation. I have also investigated the performance levels of existing nano-satellite propulsion techniques to demonstrate the techno-economic viability of the electrolysis platform. Last spring I served on Professor Peck’s student project team, “Violet,” which is producing another CubeSat that will orbit Earth next year as the first nano-satellite steered by control-moment gyroscopes. As part of the integration and testing subsystem, I devised several tests that ensured proper functioning of various data transfer mechanisms and created a module that enabled the team to accurately monitor the power board. In addition to Violet, I gained further project team experience through two semesters on Cornell Rocketry designing and manufacturing major components of two rockets reaching ten thousand foot apogees. Rounding out my technical exposure is a January 2014 internship at Brayton Energy, an alternative energy R&D firm in New Hampshire where I conducted three thermal tests of a new heat exchanger design. This past summer I interned within an asset management division at J.P. Morgan to test the waters of finance, a lingering interest of mine that I felt I needed to explore. Missing the technical rigor of the work, however, I declined a full-time offer and reaffirmed my commitment to an engineering career. I will bring an energy focus to the breadth of aforementioned experience through biomass-to-biofuel conversion research in Professor Perrine Pepiot’s group next semester and hopefully an internship at the National Renewable Energy Laboratory next summer. With this collective body of work, I am primed for success in graduate studies at Stanford. In short, Stanford’s MS program in mechanical engineering would offer me the greatest opportunity to develop the knowledge and research skills that I will need to spur innovation in sustainable fuel technology. As is exemplified in my completion of undergraduate studies in three years, I am an extremely driven individual who is no stranger to steep workloads and high expectations. The combination of my unwavering work ethic and deep commitment to societal advancement through energy research will propel me to great achievements at Stanford and in future career pursuits. 









I can honestly say that my most recent intellectually stimulating experience was a trip to the movie theater; I saw Rise of the Planet of the Apes. Of course the CGI was visually stimulating, and talking monkeys are always intriguing, but what really hit me was the rapid advancement of the apes. Their progress was astonishing, beyond any potential human development. Coupled with their natural physical advantages, the apes’ elevated intellect made them unbeatable. Walking out of the theater, a theory initiated itself in my head: humans also once stole the torch of supremacy from a formerly great species. (Sound familiar, Prometheus?) Obviously, our superior intellect and opposable thumbs allowed us to surpass our ecological rivals and deliver us to primacy. Just as obviously, about 150 years ago Charlie Darwin expressed this theory of evolution… but let me take you on a hypothetical journey in order to complete my theory. Hypothetically, a species lived on a dull, flat Earth before the homo sapien sapiens. From this bland, spherical planet they raised mountains, gorged out bodies of water, and, in their ultimate masterpiece, constructed other, more complex beings. Eventually, these innovative creatures were overrun by humans, who took their turn in manifesting progress by advancing the world’s technology by “aping” what their predecessors left behind; the nervous system inspired computers, with the capacity to store knowledge and calculate equations; the circulatory system prompted irrigation, the dispersion of a vital liquid to many cells. Visible parallels between our make-up and our made-up are virtually everywhere. Is an iPhone as complex as a living cell? Absolutely not. Do we have the resources and the intellect to create something that is? I believe so. Progress is inevitable when the blueprints to the future are quite literally in your hands. We have a road map and a Chevy filled with (rather expensive) gas. Now it’s time to continue our journey. Let’s go ape. 









I can sit there and stare at it for hours - sometimes watching, not watching others. "There" is a stair case of the 1st floor of a business center, and "it" is a view of the pavement outside through a 100 X 100cm window directly in front. To the open-minded, it is classically picturesque: cars in a myriad of colors passing by; a scantily clad teenager on the heels of the formally dressed businessman. To the idealist, it is a sneak peek of the onset of creation. More than this two dimensional scene, I imagine I see the infinite dimensions of life just the way the creator might see it. I call this place God's View. I think of this window as a zoomed in picture of the world. I try to capture the central motif of the story we call life in a single pixel; I look for the pattern that connects. For a thinker, patterns are not made with shapes, colors or words, but by questions. How does the Earth's radius and gravitational orientation affect the whereabouts of Waldo? What does "6" think of the letter "c"? What defines a human experience? I try to placate my utterly discordant and ever wondering mind by letting my questions run rampant. I look for the answers within the stream of passersby and then simply stare at the people, too absorbed in their movements. The bedlam in my head merges with the bedlam of a rush hour. Maybe it's because I love chaos. I believe that there is an unconventional beauty in commotion. Isn't all clutter, after all, a higher degree of order? It's in clutter where my imagination resides. It's in the time of confusion when I ask the most important questions. But some days I just play with numbers. I calculate the frequency with which people appear and disappear, guess their ages or try to construct a sequence out of the numbers. And some days I'm simply human. I laugh at God's cosmic jokes and take time to appreciate the ironies of my life. Take the instance of my name: "Bitya" directly translates to "daughter of God", whose existence I've doubted since I was nine. I am the class math geek who often miscalculates her taxi fare. I'm the hyperactive girl who moves too much; yet the girl seen sitting motionless for hours, lost in thought. I am head of student body and captain of the debate team; and I have the audacity to describe myself as slightly shy and reserved. Sometimes, I cry at misfortunes: a fight with my mother, fear of oblivion or a child I see through the window falling and hurting her knees. I curse my intense empathy, my capacity to feel more than the average person. Then I appreciate the beauty in poignancy. But most times, I simply think. I've always thought myself an artist. But I don't paint and I'm not a poet: my thoughts are too vague to make a dent on canvas, and too elusive to be done justice by words. My art lies in contemplation. I love to think. Despite having many little piles of "to-do's" lying around, I still find time to experiment with my ideas. God's View is the perfect place - a window looking out that allows me to look in. Half the time, I'm found within the confinements of my head, contemplating and reflecting, and my addictive rumination does have its evils. Too often, I do neglect practical matters, and I've many a time been horribly frustrated at the 'dead-end' of an idea. But thinking gives me the only validation for my existence; "I think therefore I am". But maybe I don't exist, I only think I do. Maybe nothing is the way we think it, or maybe nothing is. But you know what? Subjectivity is proof of God's great kindness. I can still think about it. 









